I was surprised that we were able to get a patio table on a Hot sunny Friday afternoon with no wait. Now I understand why. Slow service, bored staff, mediocre food and an over all unpleasant experience. It's burgers and salad...! How do you mess that up? Apparently you can. You're better off dining on street food. 1 2
Been here three times. My last time here!! Service was ok apart from the fact the server had no idea about the wine or how much it cost. Calamari was sent back we ordered several plates of this and all were sent back. Mussels came half open half closed , clams were like rubber. Our whole party had issues with their apps! Nachos had one shrimp and was so congealed it was unrecognizable ! If your going to offer Moscow mules on the menu please know how to make it and have the right cups ! 1 2
Usually this bar is fun and friendly.. however not on sunday nights apparently!!!! Liam our waiter was condescending and aloof to our group. The late night menu is terrible and the nachos were soggy with very little toppings. No one cared about our satisfaction, in fact no staff seemed interested in any patrons that night!!! Never going back. 1 2
I went for iPad screen repairs I had three  I was handed me two of them back and told I'm not even going to try to fix these  I knew they weren't  I said I appreciate you trying! But this one I can have back for you tomorrow I told him no he's not even getting the chance when about a mile down the road to Arizona's best iPad repairshe said no problem I can fix all three and be ready in three hours 1 5
If you are college student trying to use the discount coupons, don't go here they don't accept coupons. Just walk across to Yonge street. Thank me for saving your time. :) 1 4
I have been a customer for the past few years and love this place, unfortunately about 3 hours ago their rude staff got the best of me when I brought clients to discuss a brief over coffee (at their request).I brushed it off more than a few times in my years of being a patron thinking it might have just been a bad day for whoever was working. I've worked in similar situations and understand that you can't always be perfect but this was just unacceptable. I'm talking huffing and puffing, rolling their eyes & slamming cups! Not once, but TWICE when my clients ordered.I was absolutely mortified! I had to apologize to my clients for even suggesting the place.I won't be returning. 1 2
Are you kidding me with the 4 star reviews?! This place lacks quality fresh fish and is very expensive for the type of food they serve. We got a small roll combo, and legit half of it was California rolls and rolls with sweet potato in the middle. If you want better sushi, head to north York. Better prices, better fish. 1 3
ok do you guys know that fresh restaurant sells some items  GMO I was told that by a watier an i was very mad because I go there all the time.. and I really thought they celebrate more Farmers Market & local market knowing full well the studies done on genetically modified organism will never go back again tks 1 2
Oh Metro. It is the only grocery store near my house so I find myself coming here even though honestly its terrible. The produce is never fresh. It is always busy (due to great location). In general the staff are unfriendly - but it's hard to blame considering most of the customers I have seen hear are nastier than the rotting oranges up front. One positive of Metro is that are typically good deals if you check the flyer. Unfortunately if anything that is on sale will not be in stock. However, they are kind of okay about giving out rainchecks. If you can go somewhere else do it, but if you are in a pinch Metro is okay - I just wouldn't buy produce here. 1 2
The horrible thing about all the time people make to write reviews to help steer patrons away from The Gypsy Bar, is that The Gypsy Bar DOES NOT CARE.  It's futile and they seem to have their own vision that doesn't really include quality service anyway.  Funny thing is the current owner got rid off all the staff that made it this way before and still currently has the same problem.  So to understand where the problem lies is a complete mystery.  We have been patrons for the majority of the time The Gypsy Bar has been open.  Coming in for the amazing happy hour menu and the soothing tunes of the live music on Friday nights.  Jessica our server was always wonderful.  She always remembered our faces and what we drank and was a bright spot that we looked for every Friday night.  However, around mid January the establishment took a turn in feel and service.  Consecutive times of coming in (in grid lock traffic from south Chandler) we were turned away due to "private parties" booking the entire area that supports the live music.  I have been in the fine Resort/Hotel industry since I was old enough to work (over half my life) so I understand catering to a client and still taking care of the regulars who keep you alive.  The way they handled this however seemed to be a lack of what to do for the normal patrons by the front line service staff.  We don't choose to go out that often, and when we do we are very specific.  To be turned away the first time then the next consecutive week when we had family in town specifically there to do two things...one, see us and two see the music the gypsy had on friday nights to be treated by the staff where we actually were insulted and scolded for where we were sitting(mind you with no one sitting in this area but us...with 15 minutes left to open it up to the public)...this server was an asian female with two toned hair like the girl on last season's The Voice....then the bartender...James I think ,barked at  my husband when he was only asking for happy hour menus...saying, "Im not the one you need to talk to"...Graham, the manager tried to smooth it over with buying a couple rounds of drinks, which was nice, however we feel no matter when we go in there from now on we will be treated second rate and have evidence that we will.  Staff, outside of a couple female servers was arrogant. The people who run things from the kitchen are exempt from this statement.  I was a concierge for almost a decade and I would steer clear of this atmosphere until the management does another complete overhaul and the guest is really seen as the guest. 1 2
I was hopeful for this restaurant because it is close, but I was extremely disappointed at the service. The waitress (who appeared to be an owner) seemed very rude as though she was rushing to get my party of two out of the restaurant. As we were standing up and leaving, she was already clearing our table. Keep in mind the restaurant was very slow and we were one table out of a total of three occupied tables in the restaurant. When I tipped the waitress and thanked her, she just replied "bye".  We were only there for less than 30 minutes and business was slow so I didn't understand her curt behavior. The sushi itself was unremarkable. The rolls tasted quite dry, which I am not used to. 1 2
Please read full review before eating there. Food is great! No doubt about that and the price is excellent as well. You will have no server problems until the end when you're about ready to leave. & this is the reason I give it 1 star... Is because of the service from the "manager" and "cashier" that was received from them. The manager's name is Debbie I think and the cashier's name is Cathy. Debbie is just a rude manager but Cathy is something else! I've dealt with her 2 times already and 2 of the 2 times; I've never had someone give me such terrible attitude. I mean you do get terrible customers but I've never had such a bad vibe and attitude that Cathy has given. She needs to be retrained as an "employee." 1 2
HATED HATED HATED it. Won't go back and here's why. TINY menu and 1/4 of that was breakfast. Some of our menus had TO GO stamped on them, not a big deal but wtf? There is a chicken in the logo but only one chicken item. Appetizers - needed the waiter to explain what they were. Only one vegetarian dish on entire menu. We had a party of 10, 3 of us ordered tacos, they were all served together even though we were at opposite ends of the table. It feels like this restaurant is just an experiment and if it doesn't work they'll replace it again. If you are going to do something, commit to it. Out of a party of 10 the BEST comment was the burger was good (followed by a shrug of the shoulders.)I sent the owner an e-mail letting him know about my experience. Got a snotty response saying things like "We serve it one way and one way only"BTW let's be very clear...the Clarendon and the restaurant are separately owned and different experiences. 1 2
Been to this store twice. First time was to check out selection. Didn't really find anything too great or worth buying for myself or my 2 daughters. Second time was to sell... Now that was a huge joke!  Had almost new and new high end clothing and shoes and after an hour of waiting they only offered to buy one shirt.. Now the whole time I was waiting I was checking out the clothing they had. I can tell you they had no idea what to buy and sale. Joke..just a joke.. Just go to Ross and sales etc to buy and don't bother to bring in items to sale to them. 1 2
I will start off by saying that I have been to social house more than once and my first visit was excellent and couldn't wait to bring everyone i knew... that was 3 years ago. My second trip was medium to great and my last experience this past Saturday was absolutely horrible. The front desk reservation person was completely off the wall and gave the puppy eyes as if that was going to make the 45 minute late seating after our reservation worth it. Furthermore, she said it would be 5 min, not 45.  the bartender tried to remedy the situation by feeding me alcohol. ONTO THE FOODThe waiter was a super nice guy, understands the business and knows how to deal with people and the feed, sit in Nate's section if you can, he gets it. The manager came by, I tried to explain my disappointment with the host, and he gave me the I'm on top of it, but i could give two bits of crap. The fake smile and talking about how great his restaurant was and how great rolls were .... if you are proud of something and want people to try it... bring them a sample.   cucumber salad was excellent, sushi was medium to okay... kobi salad was great....  curry lobster roll ... that roll keeps them in business in addition to the explosions by treasure island. Michael, the sake sommelier, was very smart and knew his sake... talk to him if you want sake . hamachi with the tempura jalapenos...seemed like a knockoff from nobu ..nonetheless it was tasty.. i ordered a half lobster, it came out TWO TIMES UNDERCOOKED....    so no more social house for me... the manager did nothing to want to keep me there... i feel bad because nate and michael the waiter and sommelier knew their stuff....  impression from management..... we are social house... wait for our half bad food.... reservations are a joke... and we can get leftover tourists who want sushisad .. first time i was dreaming of eating there... its felt like it was a completely different restaurant 1 2
Ordered for delivery to work today with a group of folks. I can't speak on the topic of their pizzas, but as for my portion of the order...First, the price quoted for a personal pizza over the phone was higher than stated on the menu on the website. As well, my portion of the order was charged a separate delivery charge from the main order - though it was all delivered together. Second, the garlic bread was burnt, tough, and gross. Even if you were willing to handle the texture and crumbling bread, you could taste burnt garlic, not just burnt bread. We threw it away. Third, the personal pan pizza (cheese with pineapple). I've had better pizza at various fastfood chains that don't claim to be "authentic Chicago pizza". The sauce especially - yuck. As stated in other reviews, extremely greasy and messy. If you want good pizza in Madison, go to Ian's. 1 2
I highly do no recommend this place. I am sure the doctor is great but the prices were out of control. I was quoted close to $500 for a new set of lenses on one pair of glasses. She made up some bogus remark that the mounting position made it more expensive. I went down the street to Las Vegas Optometry Care and paid $475 for the same lenses and a brand new pair of sunglasses with prescription. Erika definitely had a better selection but the price was ridiculous. 1 2
I agree with all the 1 and 2 star reviews. This particular location just does not care about customers. I have had more than one bad experience and will not be back to this location. 1 2
We Used a coupon deal they had. They only gave us one garlic breadstick,which was just half of a hoagie bun and no marinate with it. The garlic white sauce was nonexistent on the pizza. The picture showed lots of tomatoes and broccoli on the pizza but each slice had one sliver of tomato and only broccoli stems. Won't eat here again 1 2
The only reason I rated this place one star at all because the waitress was so sweet. She was very nice. But the food... was greasy and gross. I am very dissatisified. I have the grilled cheese which appears to have been made with wonderbread and kraft chese, with grease coated fries. Everything is fried and hard to swallow. No sodas (which did not bother me because I do not like soda, but it is unusual) , and no milk/lemonade, and you are served in plastic cups... I come for good food and a nice resturaunt experience. Only plus is the waitresses are darlings... Do. Not. Eat. Here. If. You. Love. Your. Body. 1 2
I asked to get the sleeves of my nice wool coat taken out.  I paid $30, which is not that cheap for this kind of work. The work was so sloppy that the hemming started falling apart as soon as I got home and I also noticed a hole in the pocket that wasn't there when I had dropped my coat off. Honestly, the work was a hack-job. If you have any really nice/expensive items of clothing, do NOT take it here or you risk having to get the work re-done elsewhere. Really disappointed with the services after having read such positive reviews. 1 2
Okay, for starters I myself am Mexican and I cannot stress this enough. This is NOT Mexican food. It was so bad. The food was overpriced, everything was bombarded with onions and bell peppers. The service was super bad, took my mom 15 minutes to get a margarita and that was because she called a waitress and asked about it. There were about 4 other parties there, so I do not know what could take so long. The band that played tonight was BAD. I'm all for giving local bands a chance but this band just seemed like a bunch of 30 year old hipsters that needed to prove they could still be in a band. I don't like trashing places but this place was just not a good experience. their water was probably the best thing there. oh, and parking is expensive too, so good luck if you decide to come here. 1 2
(I was a tourist to Vegas and came with about 10 guys) Don't expect to get served if you come in at 4am.  We left because they didn't want to serve us.  Didn't take any order for drinks or food.  Didn't even bother to properly seat us.  Just grabbed the menus and placed it on the table without telling us to follow.  When we asked if we were suppose to be seated, he gave a light nod so it was hard to tell what he wanted us to do.  His communication skills was lacking as if he didn't want us there.   After 15 minutes of being ignored, we left.  I don't know what their problem was but if you're going to open a restaurant until 5:30 am in the morning, you should treat all guest like they are wanted there.  Don't be surprised if any of the other 10 guys from my group rates your restaurant with a 1 star. 1 2
This place doesn't seem to know what it is and has taken on too many things, all of which are done poorly. The food is bland and tasteless and overpriced. $6 for a mediocre latte? The market carries a random assortment of useless iyems. Avoid. I hope it closes and a better restaurant takes the good location. 1 2
The other location has seemed to close, (noticed while walking to pizza place next door) saw that coming! Don't waste your time over paying for this food. Not very good customer service either! 1 2
Buy a mop, hire a janitor, please do something.  I love the food, drinks, location and vibe but I'm giving up after being a regular customer for 3 months!  It's gross.  Tables are sticky, railings and fixtures are covered in a thick layer of dust, the floors and stairs look like they have never been swept much less mopped.  Swarms of fruit flies around the dish return and trash cans.  Today the flies drove me to the competition and I won't be back. 1 2
Well I never Lived Here. But I got a really nice look at the place when I tracked my stolen iPhone To an apartment there.  You have to love the find my iPhone app! You could see it was in one specific section of the apartments... The police was nice enough to come out and knock on the doors, However most of the people who live there simply turn off the lights and didn't answer the door.  It's that kind of friendly place. So here's what you do if you want to live with people who will steal somebody's iPhone from a clothing store Changing room, Definitely move there. 1 4
The food is not good. Enchilada sauce taste very bland and strange. Kids meal are bad and it's all over priced. It's an open kitchen too. I don't see how they pass health inspections . Won't go back. 1 2
I'm great that you had such a great experience with the staff. Maybe I should call you to come and talk to the staff for giving me the return on the skids. I am a landscaper that does many backyards. I don't do one backyard I do over 10 in the season minimal.  They need to refund me for the returned skids. I am sure that you don't have much with this company will you just a plain friend. People should know the honest truth before they go spending their large amount of money and time. As I said I am a landscaper that does many backyards. If I kept on using this business my business would be just simply closed.  People should know the truth before they get hurt.  If companies don't like that then I suggest that they train their customer service department. Set up good customer service and I would definitely go there but for now they don't have it. 1 2
I usually go to my usual wax girl Alyssa (who is AMAZING) I love her. She knows exactly what I want without even me telling her and she always checks with me towards the end to see if Im happy with the results. However, because of certain events coming up, I had no choice but to go with someone else because Alyssa wasn't working that day so I went in with a girl named Bri. I have to say that this was the worst waxing appointment ever. I have natural thick eyebrows and this girl waxed off so much of my eyebrow that it didn't even look like the other one. She completely ruined my perfect brows that Alyssa had already created. Not only that, I also asked her to wax off the baby hairs that I have on my forehead and she WAXED MY HAIRLINE OFF to the point that I looked like Lebron James. Now I have these little hairs that stick in the middle of my forehead and are taking months to grow back. I would NOT recommend going to Bri. She does not know what she's doing at all. 1 2
Ok.  All you can't eat sushi. Well... It's as bad as you think it would be. The fish selection is limited, no yellowtail, no octopus. And when you do get a piece of fish it's sliced very thin. But my favorite part of the evening was when I asked if my hand roll could contain less rice than normal, I was told... "That's not how the machine makes it".  Somehow every bite I tried became the new worst thing I ever tasted.   The coconut shrimp just made me sad. I tried to find the shrimp. The octopus balls had 2 pieces of octopus that were the size of half a pea.  To end on a positive note - the sesame balls were good, and the tiramisu was akin to tiramisu, yet good. 1 2
Just no. Line was long but had the longest wait when we got to the front. The host was also being very unprofessional. Yes, it was hot but fanning yourself when all you're doing is telling the waiters how many people are in a party ... They have a big selection of food but everything was eh. Seems like they add sooooooooooooo much salt into everything :/ also, their "gelato" do not taste like gelato. Not even froyo or ice cream. It tasted like cold melting milk ... Bleh , was very disappointed. 1 2
Third World country quality, Vegas prices. Avoid this place 1 5
Everything is barely mediocre. It doesnt have anything special, the owner is incredibly rude/cheap, and everything is so unnecessarily expensive. You have to pay extra to get a few more pieces of lettuce, and food quality is sub par at best.For better kbbq, i recommend... well anywhere else! 1 2
Saw a car I liked on the internet on Monday for a price I thought was very fair. Got quoted a different price over the phone, went in on Thursday and yet ANOTHER price. Sat down and worked some numbers and couldn't get where I wanted to be so I left.....came home and? You guessed it, a different price AGAIN!!!!!!! This place is shady! I have fantastic credit and have purchased a multitude of cars and trucks.....run away and run away FAST!!!!! 1 5
So basically I made a reservation for bottle service for my birthday, letting them know it's my birthday on Thursday at Candi bar for 5 people and everything was good. I had done this for my boyfriend's birthday last year so we knew what it was like. They called me around 4pm the day of (Saturday) confirming our booth leaving a voicemail message while I was sleeping so I hear it and call them back at 6pm confirming it and everything was good. They told us to come around 10 or 11. It's 1045 and I call them telling them that we will be there in 45 minutes and everything was good. So we get there and the bouncer says we aren't on the list and there was never a reservation for us. He's being a rude prick and was trying to find a way to not let us in like looking at the guys clothes, but they were dressed up so that wasn't the problem. So after pleading with the bouncer and manager they let us in telling us to go to coat check so we go and pay. Then another manager comes up to us and is all nice shaking my hand knowing that I made the reservation. And leads us away from where the booths that we expected are to the corner of the club to these shitty little wobbly cafe tables that only fit three people. So I'm like no this isn't what I asked for and they said that since we are only five he bumped us down the list for a party of 7 even though I made the reservation first. So we are going back and forth with the manager being like we want a booth since we are still paying the same to sit at these tables as the people in the booths. So we then decide fuck them let's go to another bar. When the guys are getting their coats I'm like well I'm here I paid for coat check I might as well have a shot or something before I go. As I'm ordering the manager comes up to me, taps me on the shoulder and tells me I have to leave because I don't have a table anymore. So I'm like fuming and almost crying. So we get our coats and leave. And the only nice employee was the coat check girl and a big bouncer inside that asked me if I was alright when I was about to cry. So we leave and walk a couple blocks to Edgar Hypertaverne where I spent my birthday last year and have some drinks served by nice employees. 1 2
We stopped in last Friday to have a quick bite to eat and take advantage of happy hour specials.  In a city full of great food, we couldn't have regretted our choice more.  It's partially our fault, as we were in "we're on vacation and we can eat whatever we want mode" and ordered fried calamari, fried cheese sticks, and fried chicken fingers.  No, the menu doesn't state fried so redundantly.  Taking the blame for our unhealthy choices, I still have to say this is the worst food I've ever had in the Phoenix area. We were raking our brains trying to come up with any other place that was even close to this bad, and couldn't come up with anything to compare it to.  My boyfriend's comment, "how can you screw up fries?"  The only plus was that our waitress was quick, and nice.  She offered to replace my beer (ordered the special, terrible!) with something I would like, and was very pleasant. 1 2
Pizza is cooked ahead and slices are reheated when you order.  Tasteless and expensive. $7 for cheese slice and $8 with topping. 1 2
Super Expensive and quoted one price by the owner Michelle and charged another that was three times the amount.  Quoted minimum amount for maintenance of $100 and charged $525.  In fact, my card was said invalid funds as I did not expect to pay the much. I ended up writing a cheque for very cheap hair and I got taken.  Not a pleasant feeling especially when she knew I wasn't working.  Used the worst quality hair that came out within five weeks (extensions) - not a good experience for me.  I always had to wait for service and I was never treated nicely.  I thought it was a racist thing.  Luckily I found a wonderful place that does great extensions and colour called Wave Length Hair by Joyce Jones who is amazing.  In fact, she couldn't believe how bad my hair looked and ha to take out the extensions that I had in for only five weeks from this salon and put in her own extensions using high quality hair and didn't charge me.  She only charged me for maintenance because that is what she quoted me on the phone.  Her colour was beautiful.  I had many compliments two hours after I left.  I thank God I met her.  She's been doing hair/extensions for 35 years and is truly the best and very honest! 1 5
So, based on my prior review, the district manager sent me a few complimentary meal vouchers.  I was hesitant to even go back . . . and I shouldn't have.  I got a cheddar, bacon burger that was so full of grissle and bone that I nearly pucked on the second bite.  I ordered a steak for my mother.  It was smothered with  . . . oh heck, I don't know . . but it tasted awful.  The steak was ordered medium, received well done, but did have good taste.  Sadly, and 85 year old woman couldn't chew the well done lump of a steak.  The chips and dip were as nasty as before.  The oil is old and tastes rancid.  The only good part of the meal was the dessert.  The brownie and ice cream were delicious, and about the only decent part of a $40 meal.  I'll never go there again, comp or no comp.  Not good food. 1 2
The food was so bland. My wife got shrimp fried rice and I've had better at the food court in the mall. And I had a seafood soup that lacked a lot of seafood... both of our shrimps in our meals were dehydrated flavorless  not fresh shrimp ...we will not eat there again .. not sure what all the stars were about 1 2
Our group of 4 was seated 40 minutes later than our reservation without an apology from anyone. After the meal we found the service was so slow it was no wonder why we were seated so late. Food was cold and quite bland. I ordered the chef's sampler menu and only the bananas foster was above average. The worst part of the night was having to ask for the manager after never receiving so much as an apology for having to wait so long for a reserved table. The manager (Tony) had no idea and could not have cared less. One of the worst dining experiences I've had in Pittsburgh. If you are looking for a nice place on Mount Washington, Monterey Bay is about the same price point with much better food and vastly superior service. Although your local Applebees would have better service. 1 2
I started to write a good review but I am glad I waited.  I went into the store to just pay my bill and of course they try to up sale and I took the bait.  However, 5 days later I still have no new phone and no response from my sales rep.  He was so attentive and as soon as he knew he made the sale.....screw me......was told I would have a phone today and I even called before going and they said they had it but when I got to the store I could not get not 1 person, not even the manager, to acknowledge me.  Granted I was on my lunch break, however, I was in that store for 30 mins. and on the way out I get from my sales rep, who is trying to make another sale, that he has my phone if I can just wait....I don't know about most people but I have a job and can't spend 6 more hours at that store.  I spent 6 hours at that store Monday and I should not have to continue to wait when all I want is my new phone.  Jeez, thanks Jermaine... 1 2
So, yeah....I actually got food poisoning the last time I ate here.  It's probably my fault, having grabbed a late lunch, ordering soup and sandwich around 3:30pm, which I'm guessing meant the food stayed out quite a while after the lunch rush.  But, um, that'll do it for me!  So if you do go here, go when it's busy. I guess. 1 2
This place is right across from the Westin in downtown Pittsburgh.  First, Music was too loud, with no one in the restaurant, making it difficult to even talk to the person sitting next to you.  Food was almost inedible (fish tacos) and the staff was less than attentive.  The bar/restaurant decor was cold and minimalist, but not good minimalist....cheap in all respects.  If this place hasn't been around long, my suspicion is they wont be here next time I come to Pittsburgh. 1 2
Good luck trying to get in contact with someone here. It's next to impossible. The phone only goes to a voice message, and I'm pretty sure any emails you send go straight to the trash folder. 1 2
It seems we got taken in by similar things as other yelpers.  The idea sounded really good and the menu is very inventive.  While the salt air margarita was tasty, the twenty vegetable fried rice was average, and for average way over priced.  I don't know which food network chef thought this was the best thing he ever ate, but that chef should get out more.Noodle dish was weak(ocean's nest) but the pork buns were tastey.  And at the end all was extremely over priced. 2 3
I used to order from Stephanos at least twice a week but not anymore! Last THREE times I ordered they messed up my order which is not very hard. Two gyro plates pita on the side. No salad. The nice guy that works the counter isn't there anymore and the new girl just doesn't get how to work the register or understand the menu. I'm on a search for a new Greek place! 2 1
Pretty hilarious that you have to watch your language in a bar for 21 and up only but whatever.  This bar isn't in the best location,  Boulder Highway has lots of transients and this location is no exception.  The food, bartenders,  and atmosphere is barely average.  Wouldn't suggest it to friends, family, or anyone else 2 3
The waitress we had was a school teacher working during her vacation to supplement her school salary. She was the best part of the experience.. The cheese crisp was so so, the beef chimi's were not the best or worst we ever ate.The buss service was terrible, no setups on the table . We finished our cheese crisp and the buss person brought our chimi's, never took the empty plates. I asked for additional verde salsa it never came.. To be honest with usually go to Nando's on Mcdowell but they were closed for the holiday.Rosa'a can't hold a candle to Nando's. 2 1
Check your receipts. I bought an onion and a couple of jalapenos here and was wondering how it was $3.50, but after I got home I noticed the onion rang up as 2 pounds and the jalapenos as 1 pound. Their scale is definitely off, resulting in being overcharged by probably at least double. If you pay the proper price though, this place is very cheap and a good deal. 2 3
Paid for an Escalade but got picked up by an old Yukon. Driver also talked on the phone while driving. 2 1
Good food but misses the mark overall. Bathrooms are horrible, 2 single stall unisex ones that have long lines even at slow times. Service is slow. Seating for many people is awful , where we were lined up  in a picnic table like row of tables with half of the seats facing the butts of people at the bar.  Food is good but expensive . Rib Eye is $40, scallops are $9 ea.   One time was enough for me. 2 3
I know live in Vegas and always wanted to try pinks. It's nothing special. I'd rather buy a better tasting & more robust hotdog & a drink @ Costco for just $1.50 than spend $6-$7 for something less appealing @ pinks. 2 3
Disappointing - met a friend there for dinner; he had been there several times but this was our first visit. My friend and I had the quarter chicken natural, which was fine, but on the small side. It was tasty enough, but not particularly juicy ( the kind of moist chicken that I would expect for $11). My wife ordered the " famous" six small shrimp for $17. Seriously?We also ordered three sides - the corn, the beats and the succotash - all were fine but not unique in any way.Since we split the bill with our friend, my part was $45 and some change for the chicken, 6 shrimp and two rather small sides. We left feeling a bit hungry.There are many, many more excellent restaurants in the area where $45 + tip would have gotten us a more interesting and unique meal for that amount. Cafe Monte on Fairview, Upstream, and Village Tavern immediately come to mind.Bottom line: food didn't have any pizazz, the prices were way out of line and we'll not likely give Roosters our patronage in the future. Just too many other good places in the South Park area 2 3
I usually love Chompie's, not today.. Service was bad, food was cold, when I order a HOT pastrami I like it HOT.. Fry's were cold too.. Had an appointment to get to or I would have had them warm my meal but the server was hard to track down and when she ask me how my meal was I told her it was not very hot and she told me its just suppose to be warm... Really this was not my first Hot Pastrami here... I don't like to complain but every thing about my $13.00 HALF  sandwich meal was terrible including the service.... 2 1
My mom and I have been coming here for years and it's been the same every time. No matter what, you will wait and wait and wait for AT LEAST an hour, no matter when your appointment is or if you show up on the dot or early. They have no concept of time management.  None. For example, I had an appt today at 11A. I showed up 5 mins early. It is now 12 and they JUST called me in. Mind you that was only for my temp, BP, and weight. Im still sitting here waiting. That's 1 hour and counting! Im trying very very hard to not curse quite a bit right now because this is so unprofessional. It tells the patient that their time doesn't matter & that they aren't important. It is extremely rude. They are a good enough staff. Everyone is nice and friendly. Years ago the old PA caught a life threatening issue that saved my life. That's why Im not giving it 1star.UPDATE:  It's 12:35 PM now and the PA just walked in. So that's a 1hr & 35 minute wait. Did I get an apology for my wait? No. Obviously me telling her that I was upset because of their lack of professionalism made her angry because she was super short with me afterwards.  I said, "I am very frustrated right now because I have been waiting for way too long. That is unprofessional and extremely rude." Apparently that made me a jerk. Whatever,  I am never going back there again. I have been to many doctors and that is NOT how a professional office treats their patients.  And I won't even get started on how when I walked back into the room she was talking about my results with my mother who had come with me. Im in my 30's. Patient confidentiality? Seriously, no respect or professionalism from this PA. 2 1
Food was Good - that is where they get the two star rating. Everything else, a lack of communication and caring. First off, I understand that this a business, I get that. I really do. But when a company puts in a large order online, one would think that there will be checks and double checks prior to someone coming to pick up the order. This was not done. A part of the order was incorrect, some of it was missing. (I know that I am not entirely blameless, but before I left the restaurant, I asked and was reassured that I had a complete order.) Called the restaurant back with my issue, wait time was long (but I was calling at the end of a peak time, no fault there) and it will be delivered.  Ok, cool. 2 hours and 4 calls later, I found out that they did try to deliver the missing order, wrote the number down wrong to contact me. The Rep on the phone told me that the missing order was the left at the front desk - that was a lie, The Delivery Driver took it and left.  When I called, I was told that there was a shift change; they have no idea what is going on and hung up. At that point, I believe that we will not be ordering from this establishment in the future. TL:DR - If you place a large order from this restaurant, don't. Save yourself the trouble and go elsewhere. 2 1
2.5 StarsMaybe it was becuz I order take out? but not after reading similar reviewsThe sushi I order was okay, except "the I love sushi roll", it was chopped of tomatoes and salmon chunks mixed in sum tangy sauce, not glazed over the sushi, but more like dumped on.  Visually not pleasing.Rice with Beef Teriyaki was super dry. Same as the salmon teriyaki I got for my mother.  My brother order the Spicy Salmon Bowl, which was the same concept as "i love sushi roll" but the stuff was dumped over your lettuce. I eat a lot of sushi, I don't think this place will make it in my rotation. 2 3
I will start off by saying I did enjoy the food here although we were only there for their happy hour special for $3 sliders.The service was good as well, our server was friendly and helpful.  We tried the lamb, duck, chicken and soft shell crab sliders.  The duck wasn't my favorite but still good.  The buns used for the sliders is heavy and gets gummy after the second or third one.  Our cocktails were pretty good as well, mine was wrapped in a brown paper bag, would never ever pay full price for it though.Ok so sounds better than 2 stars right?  I would've given this place 4 stars however here's two things that really annoyed me.1. They charge for tap water...tap water, are you serious? Of course we weren't informed of this until the bill came.  2. It's an open kitchen, nothing wrong with this, however I could see everything.  The cooks were playing with their phones in between preparing the food and NOT washing their hands after.  Unless the phones have been sanitized before their shifts which I'm assuming they weren't, this is super nasty to see.  Also another cook started having a sneezing fit in the kitchen, yes she sneezed into her arm, however blew her nose in the tight kitchen area and again didn't wash her hands. 2 3
Boy this place has gone seriously downhill the past few years. Last time I took my car in for service (Apr-2017), I got it back and one thing was broken. And I was "missing" a personal item as well. Yes I try not to leave anything valuable in the car when I drop off for service. And this item wasn't valuable. But it was mine, and somehow grew legs and walked.Service people giving me the runaround since April about replacing the item that mysteriously broke. And for a ridiculously minor part no less. Wasted more of my time than it's worth and will fix it myself at this point.So it's So-long to Solon BMW for me. Too bad too, they used to be much better. 2 1
The following is a cautionary tale about the PRICE OF CONVENIENCE:I've taken my car here 3 or 4 times, due to fact that they're within walking distance of my apartment. I wish now that I had gone to another place a bit farther off and waited or taken the bus back. Here are some things I noticed:1) They're "those kind" of mechanics who offer services you don't need. I'm not just talking about those kind of mechanics who offer obviously unneeded rack and pinion jobs. After the first visit, they said one of the things I needed was a new air filter. Since this is such an easy DIY thing, I declined it and went and bought an air filter. When I went to change the filter, I discovered the one in the car was white as a ghost and completely see-through. On subsequent visits, they have also recommended this.2) They don't adhere to their own policy of not working on your car without approval from you. On what will be my last visit, I was told that a single tire change (yeah, I know it's dumb to get one tire but my guy became flat and I'm po' okay?!) would cost around $80. Maybe it was dumb to think that meant the total with labor, but ON PAPER I authorized up to a $90 expense, with anything further having to be approved by me, first. This was not done. They put on the tire and then told me it was going to be $117. As for the tire ordeal, there was more insult to the injury; I took the car in on Friday afternoon. Of course I knew I wouldn't be able to have it serviced that day, but left it there and was assured that it would be dealt with first thing. I told them I had to work the next morning as close to 7 as possible, and they said they'd get the tire ordered and put on as quickly as they could. I know it was a Saturday, but the car wasn't ready till about 1. That means it took them almost 6 hours to have somebody drive and get a tire and put it on. Like I said, I know it was a Saturday, but is it really that hard to order a tire from their supplier and have someone go pick it up? Did they even attempt to order the tire on the Friday afternoon? Who knows? 3) Also on my last visit, my ignition key inexplicably got stuck in the trunk when I was showing the tech my busted tire. He said not to worry about it, that they would get it out. Well, their method of doing that was to break it off in the trunk. Probably an honest accident and maybe I have a trunk-opening latch in the car, but they didn't even offer me a measly 2 bucks off to make a copy of the key at a hardware store- just a kind of "yeah, eh, sorry."I guess all I can really say else is that I never felt completely comfortable around these guys. It just feels like one of those big-name shops where you know you're bending over and they're giving it to you good. I'll just recommend Mitch's Econo Lube down the street for those who live near PV, and Larry Harker's Auto Repair for those in the West. 2 1
What is it about high-end restaurants these days-- they crank up the music so doggone loud that you cannot hear the person next to you talk, let alone hear yourself think!!!  I had looked forward to my meal here, but honestly, the very good food was overshadowed by the busy-ness of the restaurant and the too-loud rock music blasting away throughout the place.  Honestly-- I love music, I love rock music, and I enjoy ambiance with music-- but this was just insane.  Never again.  Where do you go these days to have a nice meal in peace and quiet, to have a little intimacy, to have just a conversation with the person next to you without shouting so much that you have a sore or froggy throat the next day? 2 3
Not the friendliest service.. I placed my order and the man held out his hand for money. Didn't bother to tell me my total until I asked. Chicken biryani is mostly fat. Samosas nothing special. For 2 samosas and a small biryani to go was just a some change under 20 dollars. Ridiculous. 2 1
My mom went as part of a deal: $30 for wash, cut, style, head and shoulder massage, and a winter hand moisturizing treatment.  There was NO shoulder massage and the head massage was a token 1 minute patting of her scalp.  The moisturizing treatment consisted of a masque applied to the hands and wrapped in plastic. When my mom arrived for her early morning appointment, the stylists from the night before hadn't swept up.  The stylist was nice and they had a good chat, and my mom thought the hair cut was fine.  Still, she won't be back and will likely go back to her regular stylist. 2 3
TERRIBLE SCHEDULERS - The doctors here are warm, welcoming, and knowledgeable. We love going to them. However, the scheduling ladies are rarely able to accommodate requests for appointments (even serious ones!), and are VERY RUDE in the process. The last two times I called to request appointments, the scheduler couldn't get us in for two weeks and refused to make the second appointment at all, respectively. For a child that sees the doctor one or twice a year, that seems a little ridiculous. Even their 'help hotline' respondent was extremely rude and refused to help, only sent us to the hospital- for an ear infection- and then lied saying there were no Saturday appointments! This place is great, but management should really reevaluate who is representing them on the phone and know about how they are refusing business. They have definitely lost ours. 2 1
I'm not really a fan of BMV.  The staff are not helpful AT ALL and I find it peculiar that they have all these books that are supposedly "used" but in fact look brand new.   Remember the guy who had all the bikes for super dirt cheap and they turned out to be stolen goods?  I'm just saying that when something is too good to be true, someone is paying for it.  Also, they only take cash which is inconvenient. 2 1
The GVR has clean rooms but can use some dusting as with many other parts of the hotel and casino. Definitely need to change their pool hours! Its summer and pools should at least be open till 10:30pm for god sakes it is hot out! Had dinner at the grand cafe.......its basically a Denny's potato was not cook and steak was over done beef jerky. Lucky they did have a fat burger in there that was awesome. The employees canuse a good six months of intense customer service. The casino I would not waste a dime here payouts are scarce. 2 3
Pretty brutal place. Not sure where the positive reviews are coming from. My beef shawarma sandwich was awful. I saw someone mention how cold their sandwich was which was the same case for me. The meat was very gross did not taste good at all. It was cheap I will give it that but I would def not recommend. I guess my search for great shawarma in the annex continues... 2 1
I was expecting more from the Sharp Edge. I wasn't pleased with the pomme frites at all because they were just regular french fries and weren't good ones at that. The Margherita pizza was subpar. I did like my beer sampler and the salad was ok. The server couldn't remember our order and which beers were which in the sampler rack, so we had to guess, and she wasn't new. I wouldn't recommend coming here to eat. 2 3
Writing this review as I'm eating this for lunch and well, I'm highly disappointed. This was my first time trying dirt belly and it looked quite appealing to me as I walked by it so I decided to give it a shot. I ordered two salads, chicken, and one of those 'energy balls'. The salads are mediocre (I feel like Sunterra's are better) and the chicken is just disgusting! I don't really know how its cooked but it has absolutely no flavour and an odd texture. Would not go here again, not to mention that my total was $16! 2 1
Ok so I'd like to start out saying I've been to Top Golf a few times and have always had a good time hitting balls and hanging out with friends. The food is pretty good and I've always had good experiences with the host staff.....that was until my friend's 40th bday party on Dec 4th. There was a large group of us (4 bays worth plus some that did not hit any balls). My friend paid a pretty penny for this party with food and drinks included for everyone. The party was booked for 2 hours. 40 minutes before our time was up the staff started clearing away everything, including the drink tokens (again...prepaid) and food. We asked for to go boxes for the left over food and were told no, they don't give to go boxes (hello...already paid for food AND they do have to go boxes because I've taken my leftovers home from there before) due to "health codes". When asked to let us use the drink tokens, we were told that they called "last call". Along comes the "manager" gal who listens to the complaints and then promptly begins arguing with my friend stating that "her staff is VERY well trained and asked everyone if they wanted to use the tokens (last call)" This was a complete lie...not one person in our large party was told it was last call (again, 40 minutes before our time was up). I've never heard anyone argue with a customer the way she did. My friend was being very calm and asked her why they didn't come directly to her and inform her that there were tokens left so she could tell everyone. The manager just kept insisting that her staff asked everyone. Never offered a solution. So then along comes another manager, I believe his name was Shane, but I can't recall. Anyway, he was better at solving some of the problems and after learning we had planned to go to the bar there afterward (and spend more money I might add) he did offer to use the remaining tokens (I believe there were 9 in all...do the math on mixed drinks at say a minimum of $7) and did bring 2 buckets of beer to use at the bar. I can understand the "party rules", but I've never been to a place that starts cleaning up before the booked time is up and usually they ask the host if they would like the left over food wrapped up, after all it is paid for.Would I go back...sure because it is a fun place, however I will NEVER book a party there and would not recommend it to anyone else. (I'd be surprised if anyone who attended this party would book one here). The main reason...the complete lack of customer service by the 1st "manager", she was horrible and was borderline belligerent. Might want to send her back to training, just saying. 2 1
El buffet  no posee mucha variedad de  platos el buffet del aria tiene mas , los postres son muy pocos y poca variedad, la calidad es muy buena de la comida igualmente 2 5
This place is average at best. Came here since I work in the area kinda and read good things here on Yelp. I have to say it's just not that amazing. It was decent, I have nothing to complain about specifically but it certainly didn't impress me or blow my mind in any sort of way. I ordered the shrimp po boy sandwich and again, it was just very plain. Not much flavour and the breading was not tastey as well as the shrimp did not taste very fresh. 2 3
I had gotten a gel manicure after months of not having anything on my nails.  I saw them on FB and wanted to go there because of all of the sparkle and glitter.  I got pink gel with added glitter and rhinestones, this was on a Friday.  By Saturday, my rhinestones on my right hand came off completely by the afternoon.  On Sunday, my left hand rhinestones were completely gone followed by 2 chipped nails.  Really? I've had gel manicures before and never had this happen before, I wasn't doing anything out the my normal routine.  I emailed them explaining my disappointment, however, not a word was returned.  So with that being said, I will no longer return... 2 1
Being a girl who loves red meat the Keg is my go to for quality and consistency. We went to have a nice celebratory dinner and all I can say is I'm very disappointed. I always get the same dish at the Keg the prime rib. I mean my grandma makes a crazy good prime rib but for eating out the keg never disappoints me with their prime rib. However this time I was not a fan of the meal at all. The prime rib I ordered was supposed to be a Medium it was far from that mostly over cooked. Lacked any sort of flavour and the size I asked for seemed much smaller than what I'm used to. I also ordered a skewer of jumbo prawns. I always eat my prawns first because they are my favourite and although they were cooked properly they were cold for something that was "hot" off the grill. I like my food hot simple as that.The layout of the dining room is really bizarre. You are seated next to people who are practically eating their dinner with you. Not the greatest setting to have a nice meal out and conversation. I would have rather we ate our meal in the lounge which had better seating and it was actually more intimate for a conversation and meal. (Had I known this at the time of course)The wine list is great however over priced for sure. I could bring my own bottle if I really wanted to fork out so much money for a basic generic wine. The service was really good though I always find the staff at any Keg really friendly and helpful. I'm over the Keg for the time being though. I will have to journey to new prime rib horizons. 2 3
OK, what is everyone else seeing here that I didn't?  Yeah, I went for a weekday lunch instead of for Sunday brunch but shouldn't it still be at least a good experience?On the plus side, the physical space is special - lots of exposed brick, high ceilings, worn wood floors, lots of windows for natural light.  The restaurant was only about 1/3 full at 12:30 pm on a Wednesday.  It is definitely NOT handicapped accessible.  The only access to the space is a very long, very steep flight of stairs.  (Even the server told us that cases of food, wine and beer kegs have to be lugged up those stairs, there isn't even a freight elevator in the building.)I ordered the potato bisque (a menu staple) and the chef salad special.  Our server forgot my soup and brought it out after she'd served my entree salad.  The meats in the salad seemed like cold cuts - in fact, rather than being served julienned or chopped in the salad, they were simply layered on - rounds pieces of cold cuts in the salad!  The ranch dressing was likely homemade but was runny in texture and bland in flavor.  My chocolate cake dessert was okay - but not $7 worth of okay.My companion enjoyed the crab cake on top of an otherwise ordinary looking salad and she raved about the tiramisu.Our server does get points for assisting my companion with a wine selection.  She brought out two bottles, let my aunt try both and make a selection.  She even let the unchosed sample stay on the table instead of quickly whisking it back to the bar.Parking is a private lot off of South Blvd - but it's very easy to miss the entrance to the parking lot - and once you miss it, you can't access it from any of the neighboring parking lots either!Maybe I'll try again with a Sunday brunch - but the experience will have to be world class amazing to erase my memory of this lunch. 2 3
Good food...but won't return because they sell shark fin items. And I don't believe in finning a shark and because I don't know how it was harvested (properly or not) I won't be returning to eat there. 2 3
For many years, all Wanda's pies were heaven, our favorites were the pecan, the apple, the banana cream and coconut cream. We used to but them from a small shop on Yorkville, near Yonge.Somewhere along the line, since moving to Kensington Market, I have found a slow and stead decline in the quality, and most important freshness of her pies. I don't know if upscaling for greater distribution or loss of hands on quality control is the reason, but her pies are certainly not near what they used to be. I have had stale blueberry pies, as well as others, that seemed past their due date, I can't even eat her banana or coconut cream pies anymore, I am not a baker, but it's like the have made some substitutions for the fresh cream they used to use in the cream pies (coconut as well). I guess as they they say, things change, but for a time I considered her pies not only the best in the city, but the best I ever ate, alas, no longer. 2 3
The food and craft cocktails are worth a visit.  However, I don't recommend this place for parties or if you have a large group of people.  We tried to hold a birthday party at H & R last night and were told beforehand by the owner that it would be no problem.  Unfortunately there were plenty of problems including really bad service and the staff not being alerted that we were coming.  Our waitress seemed far more interested in hiding in the back than taking our drink orders.  Everyone left hungry, thirsty and frustrated.  I will go back but never to do anything but sit at the bar with no more than one or two other people. 2 1
This is not a Lebanon's restaurant the food is ok but for the price NOT that's good at all the portion is very small for the price I will not be going there again 2 3
Despite the fact this place is a 5 minute walk from our home I've probably only been inside once or twice.  It just never looked very clean to me.  Recently, my partner and I went for brunch on a Sunday.  I will admit the pancakes are delicious and that's exactly what I ordered.  Unfortunately, the young man who brought our plates to the table carried a plate of eggs on top of my blueberry pancakes - YUCK.  When I asked him to please take back my pancakes and explained why he assured me the bottom of plate had not touched my food, however, he was unable to explain how blueberry sauce managed to get all over the bottom of the plate of eggs.  He took the dish back to the kitchen and I watched as he told the "cook" what happened.  The cook appeared to laugh and share the story with several others behind the counter (apparently oblivious to the fact that the "kitchen" is open and in plain view of the diners.)  The cook then put a glove on and used his hand to scrape off the blueberries and put new new blueberries on the same pancakes.  The server brought my "new" pancakes back and I promptly sent them back.  In all fairness, our original server did not know anything about this and she apologized and offered to bring me another meal.  Needless to say, we both had lost our appetites. I knew there was a reason I didn't eat here... 2 1
Good concept, way over priced for a very limited small menu. I was hoping we'd find a new it place to go but this place is just mehhhhh. We'd still drive all way to Easy Life or Sp Mtn. 2 3
I was a walk in for an eyebrow waxing.  Place was clean.  I didn't have to wait, but the lady who did the waxing stopped in the middle of doing a manicure? with another lady.  I think this made her do a rush job.  If not, then she is just not very good at eyebrow waxing.  When I got home, I still had wax on me.  My right eyebrow is thinner with a high arch.  My left is thicker with no arch.   I have never had an uneven job like this before.  Had to fix it myself.  I am not a happy camper right now.  Ugh. 2 1
I went 2 weeks ago on a Saturday; I've been to Sushi 168 'pre' and 'post' renovation, and over time the quality has substantially diminished. They've become busier, and as a result, they've stopped making (or giving off the appearance that their food is made) to order. I believe that's the biggest mistake a restaurant can make - feed more customers at the expense of quality and freshness.The food came out quickly...a little too quickly, suggesting that the restaurant simply wants to turn tables as quickly as possible. The hot foods came out cold, and did not look or taste fresh. They should hire more sushi chefs to do things right, and make food to order, rather than churn out a lot of rolls at once, that are left sitting there until they're ordered. It's backwards management and a symptom of greed in my opinion.You can find better elsewhere, unfortunately Mississauga doesn't have much, so this restaurant has succeeded in attracting customers for the time being. Go elsewhere...the service and quality will be a lot better. It's worth the drive to Toronto or further east for better quality AYCE. 2 1
Taste is alright, coming from LA this spot is def not on par with what we got out there. First thing that I thought was how come the fishes aren't put into a separate bowl and mixed with the sauces and certain toppings. Instead it was just thrown on top of the rice along with everything else. Overall is just okay moving great would not come again. On top of that is $11 I think is def overpriced for two scoops of protein. The fish is def not fresh Does not have a good vibe, no music, and needs friendlier customer service....the guy seemed like he hated his life. 2 3
Not a fan.  I am a huge breakfast fan and the food here is so so, at best.   Don't waste your money. 2 1
I am giving Vine two stars because the atmosphere was great and the food, once we received it was good. We had a reservation for Mother's Day so we expected it to be busy and a little slower. What we experienced was terrible service and a restaurant that was completely unprepared. We started out good and ordered drinks and an appetizer for the table. Some drinks arrived but we were told they were out of the appetizer. We then ordered our food and noticed my parents never received their water. We asked for their water and then after a reasonable amount a time a server came out and put a plate in front of my mother. It was what she ordered. Another server then came a took it away giving it to the table next to us because that is where it was supposed to go. 30 minutes after we ordered our food had not yet arrived. The manager came over and apologized and suggested we order some desserts on the house. The server and manager must not have communicated well because he then came and told us lunch was on them. He was wrong. Our food finally arrived and it was good. We had to ask for several missing items that were never brought out. My husbands water glass was never refilled so he started drinking mine. We waited a long time for them to finally bring us dessert menus. We ordered three desserts for our group of 7 and asked for the check since we were tired of waiting. The server finally noticed my husband needed water and said he would bring it. He never did. Twenty minutes later our server reappeared to tell us they were out of one of the desserts. We said we didn't need any dessert and just wanted the check. It arrived with desserts on the bill as well as three extra beverages that we did not order. The check was finally fixed and we were given two desserts to go for our trouble. I hardly think it was compensation. Lunch took us over two hours. Management should have been more proactive and apologetic. 2 1
We were really disappointed here.  It took 70 minutes from checking in to getting our entree - 10 minutes of that was waiting in the bar.  The salad (organic greens) took forever to be served.  My husband's filet was tasteless - we've had better from Costco.  My scallops were very good, but were served cold.  When we left, no one said thank you or goodbye  Save your $$ and go elsewhere. 2 1
Fun for kids to see the ducks, turtles and fish but this place is a trainwreck. Had fond memories, but the last time I was there was 16 years ago. I remember it being yummy and a fun place to go. Unfortunately, it is now old and dirty, very dirty. They should close for a few weeks just to clean and maybe paint.  Had the fish taco special, was supposed to be mahi, it was a formed fish stick with fillers. Really bad. Tomatillo salsa had no tomatillo flavor. Actually nothing had much flavor. Two stars only because the pond makes it interesting, though it was gross and green. 2 3
Didn't love my pedi. The massage was nice on the legs but my polish was rushed and I had to go home and clean up the edges with polish remover. I won't likely go back. 2 3
The food is okay, though pricey. They know they are one of few choices for a resort, and the service reflects it. They wait staff could really care less. 2 3
Came here for brunch. I thought it was super overpriced at $35. Good selection, but the food was pretty average overall. 2 3
I'm from Cincinnati but working in Cleveland and was searching for a "sushi" buffet.  Regrettably this was the 5th entry and shame on me for not looking closely enough at the description.  Needless to say, upon arriving I was terribly disappointed to find no sushi.  Just an average chinese buffet.  The hot and sour soup was good.  The eggrolls, not so much.  The selection of entrees was good and everything was reasonably well presented but nothing really stirred my imagination.  So, I had stir fry prepared on the mongolian grille, which - despite having only 5 sauces and a very limited selection of veggies - wasn't too bad.  All-in-all, if chinese is how your pleasure tends, then you probably won't be disappointed.  However, if it's sushi you seek: look elsewhere. 2 3
Very small family run restaurant... with not much uniqueness of dishes. Ordered many "different" foods just to find out that they were all the same as in they used the same sauce in every dish and stir fried everything. The only significant difference i could see was they they used different vegetables... other than that... they all tasted the same. A LOT of MSG was also used in their foods which made my mother sick. I will definetly not be going back. Worst Vegetarian Experience. 2 1
I used to love Magpie but the last two times I've been there it just hasn't been the same. The pizza is way too salty. Most of my party agreed but that wasn't the worst of it. The service was so bad, it really put a damper on the evening. Our waitress brought us our food and then we never saw her again. She never once came by to check on us. It took way too much time and effort to wave her over so we could order some dessert. Once again she brought the dessert and left us never to return. We finally had it, put on our coats and went to the cash to pay. This has happened to us twice now. Don't think I'll be going back. 2 1
I've been here a few times. The good:- Very strong drinks. Almost, if there is such a thing, too strong.- Our first order of cheese curds. Hot, gooey, greasy.- Cheese soup + chunky tomato soup = delicious bowl of soup.The bad: - Slooow service.- Our second order of cheese curds. They were made with a different kind of cheese than the first (?) and were rather cold.I wonder what will change now that they're under new management. 2 3
2 stars because the food (once it got there) was delicious.  Had the sliders and the beef cheek stew.  Sliders are served with a whipped aioli and were solid juicy slidersBeef cheek stew has a decadent jus and the meat was tender as a butcher's heart.  HOWEVER!  Service was absolutely atrocious!  Our server was aloof and did next to nothing.  Obviously the busser hadn't been trained either, because as my buddy is chewing a piece of his steak, the busser comes over and asks if he was all through, while there is still meat on his plate too boot.Nice beer list and yummy pretzel bread.  I would return and hope for a better service and make a final judgment after that. 2 3
Not impressed. I have heard good things about this place, this is the only reason why I have tried it...3 times. This time is my last.  The first two times I went for brunch.  The last time was for the dinner service.  For dinner, my boyfriend and I ordered the Goat Cheese Deviled Eggs, the Pepper-Crusted Ahi Tuna, and the Mussels with a tomato fennel broth.  We kept the menu because we wanted to order an entree as well, but we hadn't decided yet. Our appetizers came out and after trying them, we were not excited or interested in ordering more.  The Deviled Eggs were fine, couldn't taste the goat cheese, but I could have made the same at home, and for $3 an egg, I should have.  The Mussels were absolutely terrible.  The tomato-fennel broth was bland and had a terrible, mushy texture.  Half the mussel shells were missing the mussels, and they were not fresh.Lastly, the Ahi Tuna. Noticeably frozen tuna. Bland. The pepper crust was so overwhelming and with a delicate fish like tuna, RAW tuna, it was just bad. The chef should know better.I read reviews about the awesome beer list here.... Any of the beers can be found cheaper elsewhere.Won't be back. Don't waste your money. 2 1
We went to Laziza after work for happy hour and it was disappointing, we ordered most of the appetizers, some drinks and a hookah. Of all the appetizers the hummus was the best but everything else was just bland. The service was ok when we actually saw our waiter. For a Hookah lounge I was expecting something a little more intimate and comfortable. I won't be going back to this place again. 2 3
This place is slipping badly. I've been going for many years, and used to be a big fan. But recently they've been cutting quality, and today was the first time I've had a dish I would not order again, it was so poor. 2 1
I wanted to grab a quick bite before flying back to LA.  Service here could hardly be described as quick here, nor could it be described as accurate.  I never did get my drink order that day; not even a glass of water. 2 1
Ordered burgers medium well! They came out pink and bloody ! Gross  ..The sever said yep, we're having a problem with the cook? Wtf ? If you know there's a problem how about fixing it once !? Mfers.. 2 1
Hmmmm...I started out reading other reviews of this place and I'm thinking that maybe a 2nd visit is in order.  Our experience was definitely not like others.We stopped by here for lunch.  $5 lunch special includes your entree, 2 scoops of rice, veggies and a small drink.  We both got the BBQ chicken ... the boneless chicken portion was small, the rice was good and  the veggies consisted of cabbage (and that's it!).We were greeted by a woman on the phone who hung up only long enough to take our order and then returned to the phone.  Since we were the only ones in the place (at 12pm!!), I wondered if her conversation was meant to be entertainment?Considering this place is next door to several other really good restaurants, I can't help but wonder why anyone would choose this particular establishment instead of one of the others?Ample free parking, cause it's a shopping center.  Would we return? I don't know.  Would I recommend?  I just don't know.If we decide to give this place a second chance, I'll update my review. 2 3
This place is no longer Pizzaiolo. Don't fooled, this place has seen a quick  decline in quality in recent months. Crust is hard and makes my jaw hurt (ouch). The sauce usually resembles watered-down catsup (yuck). That being said, I'd probably still smash an XL pepperoni if I had to...but like, reluctantly tho. 2 1
This is a mediocre car wash at best.  Yah they hand wash it but only wash about 70% of the car when it's wet, where it's supposed to be cleaned, then they clean the rest with spray bottles and towels when they're supposed to be drying it.  Especially when it comes to wheels.  When I asked the manager/service writer guy about it he said the owner wants as many cars through as possible, while he was agreeing with me, so they rush them through.  You have to walk the workers around and point out the mistakes and/ or missed parts that you payed for.  They now say there is an inspection person that checks quality but I've never seen a person checking cars ever.  The tire dressing they use and the way they apply it causes it to fling down the side of your vehicle, thus you have to ask them to apply it light, and / or wipe the tires down before you leave.  There are two workers I've noticed that actually work hard and clean your vehicle well.  The rest come and go with little to no training I'm sure.  They waste alot of water I noticed even though they are labeled as a water recycle wash, they even have a river through the dirt area downstream from the wash that has plants and weeds flourishing from the water that is wasted.   I've contacted the SNWA about it to no avail (sp).  The mats aren't actually cleaned also, they apply a chemical and agitate it with a brush... done, nothing removed.  Not the dirt and not the cleaner they applied.  It also takes over an hour for even just a basic wash.  Oh... and the person that sits in your car while it's going through the wash part will rifle through your compartments for whatever reason, steal your change at the least, and mess with your radio if not just to see how loud it will go.  Hope this helps anyone to know what they're getting into.  And check your vehicle before you leave. PS - Just watched them park my wet vehicle in the hot sun next to the two empty spots in the covered shaded area, nice.  Hope not to be back. 2 1
So many people are posting reviews about the quality of service. I gave this rating a 2, because I recognize that Pikto is lacking in some areas, but their ability to reconcile issues is excellent.  I'm quite hard pressed to acknowledge that perhaps its your approach to the Pikto employees that made your experience a bad one.  If you are a jerk when you call and complain, they are less reluctant to help you.  I had problems uploading a layflat book to their new platform and I only had up until 10am the following day. Well, it ended up that it never uploaded and although I called in a panic, I didn't treat them like it was their fault personally.  They recognized the issue and were more than willing to help me.  I wasn't a jerk to them either. So, I ended up getting the service I deserved in light of the mishaps of their online uploading platform.  If you are nice enough, any one who is in the service/retail industry will be willing to resolve your issue. Thanks Pikto! I know some of your stuff isn't perfect, but your product is excellent and I will always come back! 2 5
I hate the fact that I have to give this place such a low rating. Many aspects of it kick ass. I came to Vegas 9/25/13  for my honeymoon and spent my last night at the D. At check in I specifically asked for a nice room and would pay more. What they gave me was a room that was standard and next to the stage outside that blared music until late into the night. After complaints, we were moved to a better room that was quieter. Needless to say, we love old Vegas  but will stay somewhere else next time 2 3
Booked through Priceline.  Disappointing since I was expecting a four star experience. 2 3
I had the cashew chicken. I could do better in my own kitchen and I am not a chef. The chicken tasted old   On the plus side the portions were large and reasonably priced but who wants a lot of old chicken? 2 3
Went for lunch with two friends and ordered the L&V burger ($10) medium with the tots.  Burger was very well done, tots (5) were greasy and unseasoned.  Beer selection of mostly local craft beers was better than average but over-priced (even for Hudson).  Gastropub?  The L&V has a long way to go: basically bar menu/food with over-priced drinks and very average service.  There are a few better places very near this location you may want to try first. 2 3
I give it 2 1/2 stars if I could figure out how to do 2 1/2. Fresh OJ wasn't very fresh. Fruit wasn't particularly great.   I got the Southwest burrito - it was OK, not the best chorizo I've had. Will not be going out of my way to return anytime soon....  May be a good choice if you're in a rush and don't care that much about really awesome food. 2 3
Unless you're trying to kill a $20 and an hour don't waste your time. It's got some cool fish and animals (jellyfish were cool) to see but compared to real aquariums like Shedd in Chicago it comes up so short. It feels more like a Vegas "check the box" than a true attempt at building a great attraction. 2 1
I've now been to Quivey's Grove twice: both times I was completely underwhelmed by the food, although the service is friendly and fantastic. My first entree was the meatloaf. Full disclosure: I make AWESOME meatloaf, so I AM biased. QG's offering was not bad, just forgettable and in need of salt. On my second visit, I ordered the Black Angus Steer tenderloin medallions, which came with a Madeira mushroom cream sauce, sauteed vegetables, and parmesan potato. The first thing that struck me was that nothing on the plate went with anything else. The sauce on the medallions (which were tender and juicy) was excellent: I could imagine serving the entree over mashed potatoes or even polenta. Instead, it waged war on the parmesan potatoes: a nasty, clearly pre-cooked, cheesy potato casserole that more resembled something you might find at a potluck. The other filler, sauteed julienne peppers, also clashed with its plate-mates.  In a word: DISAPPOINTING. QG isn't an inexpensive place to eat, and I would expect quite a lot more from the food for the cost. 2 3
It's the shift-lead, Hannah? Do not blame the teenagers for a terrible shift leader. I guess that is why they don't call you a manager, because you don't manage anything. My smoothie just tasted like dirty ice today. My $8 smoothie because apparently you can only "add" items and not "substitute" them. Again, this is not the teenager's fault, the shift leader must be held accountable. 2 1
Although the food was good, we had an issue with the service.  When asked to accommodate a variation on a menu item the waitress was not willing to even try to the point of rudeness. Then between courses she placed our used silverware that were on our plates back onto the table. When we asked for clean silverware we were given an extremely snide remark by the waitress. Her rudeness ruined the ambiance of the beautiful patio dining. 2 3
We wanted to take my nephew to this restaurant so he could watch the planes. I checked the Yelp reviews before leaving so I really wasn't expecting too much out of this restaurant.I was appreciative because the hostess did help us find a table near the window so we could see the planes. But honestly, that was the only positive.Our food was just not good. My husband's plate had a giant hair (and it clearly wasn't his as he noticed it right after the waitress set it down and he has buzzed hair) in his potatoes. He asked for new potatoes but the waitress did have the mm make a whole new plate. My sister ordered a taco salad without meat and sure enough she had mostly meat in her salad. That was also remade. My nephew was only eating his fries, not his grilled cheese, and we kept encouraging him to eat the grilled cheese. I finally took a bite and spit it out. It tasted awful, almost as if the cheese was spoiled.I will most definitely not be returning. 2 1
whenever I write a 'less than stellar' review, I always wait a few days. I just like to take all emotion out of the review. I have waited almost 2 weeks to write this - mainly because this Papa Murphy is less than a mile from my house and I always root for the local businesses in my neighborhood.Here goes:I have been to this location enough to fill up a punch card (12th visit gets you 50% off your next order)... So I thought - AWESOME! On Halloween, I don't want to cook and we are having people over before going downtown for the Las Vegas Parade. I bring a friend (who has never been to Papa Murphy's). I have talked up the place to her and convinced her that pizza would be better than Mediterranean food for the occasion. We walk in, there are 3 others in the shop, two are waiting for their pizzas and 1 is paying. We walk up to the registers, pick a couple of salads and grab a menu. We we not greeted, but, you know, people get busy - and we are gabbing away anyways. Well.... after standing next to the workers 'building' the pizzas and a few feet from the left register for 5 minutes - Another woman walks in to the shop. The manager or owner (I assume) who is building the pizza, asks another employee to help 'the guests.' The employee proceeds to greet the other woman and start taking her order. After a moment, the 'Manager' asks us if we've been helped. We let her know we hadn't. She proceeded to tell us because we weren't standing right at the register, thats why know one had helped us............ *REMINDER* : I've been here enough to earn the complimentary 50% discount. It's not my first rodeo at this place. AND we did go straight to the registers when we arrived. How would we have picked out the Greek Salads (which are in between the 2 registers).... Needless to say, a place that makes it the guests fault that they weren't helped is not a place that I need to spend money at.... It's really too bad! I have had no issues the other 11 times at this location - but those times I came in after 6pm (this visit was around 1:30pm). I have always been helped by the night male 'manager/owner' (assumption on title, but these are franchises that are proprietor owned)..........I will say, I've never seen it busy at this location, so maybe when they get more than 1 or 2 people in their store at once they get a little "overwhelmed....."But, I think it will be awhile before I return, and needless to say, my friend will never get to try Papa Murphy's because she doesn't like rude service- especially when it's at a pizza place that you have to take home and cook yourself. 2 1
I've been to many KBBQ places. We LOVE getting the AYCE bargains, but this was just disappointing. For a city that is known for it's quality food at cheap prices, this just doesn't cut the mustard. The selection of meat wasn't impressive and the price for this selection was too much. You can get better options at most KBBQ places in and around L.A. for quite a lot cheaper. There were many sides which made it a bit better but it lacked an essential side dish. There was no steamed egg. Truth be told, I probably wont go here again. 2 3
Went in n a Valpak coupon. Had dinner there. It was super slow, but thought maybe because nothing else is open around them.The Super market was closed down. The service was friendly, that's a Pro. the Cons, where do I start. Food was hot on one side, colder on the other or in the core of the meat. Wierd.Food took a lil longer, but that was ok, if it was busy. It was a lil $$$ for the quality of the food. I will not leave Pei Wei again, I swear.My last thought, we should of ate next door at Los Fav taco shop. 2 3
went here yesterday....being from Chicago, I had to check it out.  Fries were terrible, greasy and limp.  Hot Dog was ok, but the bun was hard on the ends.  Prices are pretty good.  The woman that took our order was really nice.  The actual owner was behind the counter flippin burgers and he did not say "hi" or even smile at the customers.   Maybe he was having a bad day.  Overall, I prefer Joey's a lot better, which is also closer to home for me in Glendale.  I just happened to be in Surprise for an appointment, and I saw there sign on the road.  Anything with Chicago in the name, and I will stop!  lol 2 3
I don't know how this place stays in business. The menu is so limited. Would you like chicken or chicken? Chicken in a pita? Chicken on some lettuce? Chicken rolled in a tortilla? And the pita chips are bland! Yuck! And  the potato salad has something in it that is way too tangy. I've only been twice and tried different dishes both times but I just don't get anything greek about this place. 2 1
We used to bring our dog here for his grooming. He was always happy to go and the groomer did a great job on his cut. The problem was that four out of seven times we took him there, they ran two-three hours late having him finished. After missing my brother's birthday dinner, we switched to Doos for Dogs... 2 5
saw employee hork and spit. saw employee picking nose while putting out produce. prices good. most of the staff do not speak English so shopper cannot get help. veggies fresh...fruit less fresh. on-sale OJ often not refrigerated. buy selectively here and you're ok 2 1
Six of us dined and took down a fairly large portion of the menu to share. Highlights included tender grilled octopus, the delicious trout, head on shrimp, and well-priced wines by the glass. Service was very good as well. Unfortunately, not all was great. The beef brisket was actually terrible. Extremely salty, very weak chimichurri, and a giant inedible fat cap. Awful. Papas bravas should have a spicy sauce. These came with a pedestrian aioli. At $45, the paella was not worth the price, as it was relatively small, and I didn't taste even a hint of saffron. Brussels sprouts were bitter and very unevenly cooked. They will have to up their game to succeed in such a pricy spot. Hopefully they can pull it together. 2 3
This is the place to go to if you are out with your friends looking for cheap going out clothes. They know their market they have good items at great prices- which is exactly what the girls who shop there are looking for.With that said- i was not pleased with my experience. The merchandise is cheap- but you get what you pay for- but there were also no small sizes. I'm a xsmall or small depending and there was nothing for me to even try on, everything was a size large. Also, I was shocked that while me and about 5 other girls were in there shopping the two sales girls were in the fitting rooms trying things on! I'm sorry but you need to help your shoppers- not yourself. you do that once you close or before your open but not while your on the clock.Their accessories were cute- $8 sunglasses were pretty great, but i couldnt get myself to buy anything. I didnt want to help them if they werent going to help me. 2 3
I haven't yelped forever n my first yelp ia bt dmv...that's how bored I am. Lets see ky review the vending macines r overpriced. The chairs suck. It smells funny. Pep smell. At least the ac runs well. Maybe I shld do what I did last time n buy someone's numb for 100 bucks...muhaaahh 2 1
This particular location had a lot of their products however, lacked the service you would expect from these places. Walking in, there were two employees standing at the entrance and soon as they saw us, decided that we were not worth their time. Another one did smile at me later but didn't offer any help or assistance voluntarily rather stood there looking beyond the entrance door. Probably waiting for a more rich looking customer.We walked around and found quite a few items we wanted, but no one offered to help even after seeing that we were looking and holding so many different products. This didn't necessarily make us angry, rather disappointed that the workers feel as if they own the brand rather than work for it. We did purchase a few items, a wallet and a cashmere sweater, but didn't feel that happy forking over our money. Whereas if you go across the street to Chanel, could spend thousands of dollars and feel triumphant because of their impeccable service and zeal to help their customers. I don't really recommend this place unless you truly need something from here that you can't get at Holt's. 2 1
Good Servants does an okay job when they show up on time.  I have been using them for about six months now, and I have finally had enough.  They are very disorganized about scheduling.  They have shown up at my house to clean when I never called them.   Each time I had them come clean, they were well over 45 minutes late.  The last time I was supposed to have a cleaning, they were an hour late.  I called and the woman said they were finishing up another house and would be there in 15-20 minutes.  Unfortunately, my time is too valuable and I will be looking for another service. 2 3
I'm sorry, but the only thing authentic about this place is the word China in its name. Yes, I understand it's a chain, but not a large one so I would suggest spicing up your kitchen and serving less corporate chinese. I will give a better rating for the sole fact that I do like their lettuce roles but that's it. 2 3
The food is pretty ok here.. But I found part of a clear plastic bag in my food once. 2 3
I was out looking for a place for a late lunch in rural Geauga County, and found that the pickins are slim.  Mangia's entry on here was pretty good, so we decided to check it out.  I have no complaints with the service, but the food is mediocre at best.  I had the eggplant parmagiana and my partner had the chicken parm.  Both dishes were essentially pre-formed, pre-breaded patties covered by a thin layer of marinara sauce and a slice of provalone that was placed under a heating element.  Both meals came with a side of pasta, which, had it been a steak, would have been great because it was tender and you could cut it with a fork.   But it wasn't a steak ... it was pasta. And pasta shouldn't be "fork tender."Don't get me wrong, it didn't taste bad ... it was perfectly edible, but it's not anything an Italian might recognize as food of the motherland. 2 3
Went for dinner Aug 2012 at the roof patio. Food was ok for a pub I guess, standard menu with no surprises and fair dishes. Service was below average. Too many tv sets around for a patio. Small separate place in the back for smokers - not too friendly for a big open patio. Bit overpriced as well - would rather spend that amount of money to go a restaurant trying a new dish or better cooked. Overall average rating although it looks great from the street view. 2 3
I love the food here, I've never gotten something that I didn't like. The customer service is hit or miss. However, this morning was awful. There were 4 people in line when I came in, no biggie - actually that's the least amount of people I've ever been behind. The young man taking the orders, not only mumbled every word, he also spoke extremely softly - I heard the two customers before me say "Huh?" or "Excuse Me?" several times for him to speak up, while placing their orders.  The employee that was taking money was polite, noticeably stressed, but polite. After paying for my breakfast sandwich, I stepped aside to wait. The other busy bees were running around between the back of the house and front counter getting bagels made, sliced, toasted, boxed... While waiting, I couldn't help but notice the orders that were coming out before mine - 3 out of the 4 were wrong. Wrong bagels in a Baker's Dozen box, the other box's bagels weren't sliced, another gourmet bagel was the wrong bagel all together... I've never seen that many missteps from the employees! Also while waiting (it took quite a while for my order), I overheard someone, who I'm assuming is the Manager, complaining to another customer her annoyance in having to train other employees and how she just "didn't have time for such nonsense." Hmm.. 2 1
I would give them 2.5 stars because the donuts are always on point- when they have them in stock. Can't say the same for the drive-thru service! They are rude and interrupt while placing an order, they are usually out of donuts, but don't tell you until they have already ran your credit card. This has happened 3 out of five times (no matter how early or late I get there).  The problem is, it's the closest one to my house and my kids love them on Saturday mornings as a treat. Oh, and please put back the picture signs with the donut names. This would be helpful at the drive thru. Thank you. 2 3
Definitely not the worst sushi I've ever had. However it wasn't good at all. I would stay away from the tuna it tasted off and very mushy. The only thing good about this restaurant is the service. Lastly, it's very easy to order too much. Keep track of the quantity as they charge for every uneaten piece. 2 1
I really enjoyed the food while eating it, however it seemed to be like clockwork for our whole party, 4 hours after eating made you want to throw up. It ruined our evening events. Also I think that it's absurd to automatically add 20% gratuity for parties of 6 or more. Most places only start to include gratuity after 8 people and at 18% to split the 15-20% debate. It's as if we are tipping them for their inability to handle more than six burgers. I believe that the servers would be more enjoyable if they actually had to work for their money using their personality. 2 3
First of all. I'm a fan of chef ramsay and hope every thing perfect.  This is first time i try this burger.  When i walk to the host two girl cute asian just talk to each another and doesn't look at me. Until o ask for table for 1 they offer me to sit at bar it ok for me but she just point to bar and say go ahead snd back to talk to each another again. The burger need more salt it no test and asian salad is so so. It not matt for 14$ for burger and 13 for salad. In&out is alot bettet. 2 3
I hate leaving bad reviews for nice people but this deserves it.  He did great work and was in and out, which is why he got the two stars he did. But he didn't have all of the necessary equipment to fix a flushing mechanism in a toilet on his truck, when that was what we told him was broken. Seems like he would show up with the necessary tools for the job! To make matters worse, he was referred to us by our leasing company, it took him 2 weeks to get to us. 2 weeks without a flushing toilet!!! I understand it's not a huge job but it's also in out and move on! The most irritating part of it all, $73 for a simple fix. $8 for parts, $65 for labor when he was here for less than 30 minutes! After waiting 2 weeks I am happy to have a flushing toilet again, and he was very friendly, but next time I will be finding someone else. 2 3
Asked our cab driver for the best seafood buffet and the Rio Carnival Buffet was recommended as the best.  Our party of 6 was extremely disappointed as soon as we saw the seafood spread.  Variety was actually pretty good, but nothing screamed quality.  I would not pay the extra for the seafood if I were to do it again.  The regular buffet was an ok value but there are much better buffets for a few bucks more such as the Wicked Spoon at the Cosmopolitan. 2 3
Went to new location behind cracker barrel last night. Really hopping this space will work as it is close and a cool building. Sorrentos moved from a small location by the college and the wait staff is NOT ready. Highly unorganized and not attentive. Sat at bar to get good service but did not receive. They forgot to put in appitizer, were not knowlegable about wine selections and 3 bartenders walked by our empty glasses for 10 minutes. There were only two other groups at the bar!!Knowing my wine I found a nice bottle of of Italian wine from Piedmont region. Wish I could remember the name as it was good. I had to order a bottle since after two glasses we couldnt get someone to pour us another. Ordered calamari app. Which the waitress forgot to put in. nice work. I did like it as the calamari was tender but the batter was a bit oversalted. The marinara was good. I had the veal marsala and my partner had the special halibut with a lemon caper sauce. Both were very tastee and it is worth mentioning the zuchini side with the fish was above average. they were not grilled but also not mushy and finished in a red sauce that was modified from the marinara. The canolis were average at best as the filling was little more than sugar and ricotta and was a bit thin on consistency. We love this location so we will give them another chance probably with the kids in tow. Hopefully they step up the service. 2 3
Pho is served in larger portions but unfortunately don't make up for its lacklustre taste. Haven't tried the other menu items . 2 3
I don't know what happened to this place. I went with my girlfriends on a Saturday night around 9 and the place was dead. Like no one there. The main floor just had the hostesses, same with the patio. The music was all over the place...country then hip hop then rock etc etc it was just kinda weird. I'm not sure if they changed their menus or if menus are different between weekdays and weekends but a lot of it wasn't on the menu (I got the Goat Cheese Bake during my first visit but it wasn't on the menu) and for the price that was paid for each dish, we really didn't get that much food. I got the perogies and although they were scrumptious, it wasn't enough to fill an appetite. The flatbeard is fine and fills you up. The fried shrimp and calamari is basically half an appetizer, even with the side of asparagus. And the Mediterranean chicken kebob is three baby skewers of dry chicken. I can understand if this is one of those places where you pay a bit more for higher quality but we barely got that. We were told by our waitress that there was a burlesque show later on in the night so we finished our food and went downstairs to watch. When nothing happened for about 25 mins we ended up leaving and going to a fest at celebration square. On the patio the waitresses were nice enough to provide our table with a heater and warm blankets. I really hope &co steps it up a bit, I really enjoyed my first time there and I would like to again in the future. 2 3
I guess this place is OK if you live nearby but there is no reason to go out of your way and this place is definitely out of the way.. Dark, depressing atmosphere. Usually dead inside.Food is just OK and actually overpriced. I ordered a Tuna Melt for I believe $8,95. I got the smallest tuna melt I'd ever seen. Seriously, I left still hungry. And oh yeah... this place has the TIGHTEST VIDEO POKER MACHINES IN ALL LAS VEGAS! 2 1
I was with citizens Bank of Massachusetts for 10 years. We  relocated to Squirrel hill and I thought that the service would be just as good. Unfortunately the service got worse. Extremely long lines at the squirrel Hill branch and managers that have their hands tied and can't do anything to help fix problems. Any issues you may have you have to call the 800 number and you have long hold times. I like a bank where I can go in and talk to somebody and I can get something done. I am not a fan of citizens Bank. 2 1
Not really my thing and I am an experienced lifter.  If you are someone who super sets,  would not recommend unless you only like using machines.  It's not organized for efficiency but designed for the masses.  Positive note, the club was clean and the staff was friendly. 2 5
I have never had a bad experience at this nail salon until today.  The tech I requested was busy so I unfortunately had to go with a different tech.  My pedicure went fine, that was just fine.  As for my manicure...this is the first time I have ever recieved a manicure that the tech did not soak my hands in soapy warm water..  Instead used a squirt bottle.  She barely wet my finger tips and then proceeded to barely push back the cuticles.  Needless to say there was not much cuticle to snip off.  Granted, it had only been 4 weeks since my last manicure, but I could see that there was plenty she missed!  I was irritated and told her that I had never had a manicure like this and she gave me some lame answer.  She had been talking and talking to the other techs the whole time until I questioned her about the job she was doing.  Then she got real quiet.  She didn't even put lotion on my hands and massage them like the techs always do there.  She painted my nails and by then I just wanted to get the hell out of there.  I was there an hour before closing time so my guess is she just wanted to get the hell out of there too.  It was the lamest most unprofessional manicure I have ever had.  I can't believe I paid for it.  I should have complained to the girl at the desk but instead I'm on yelp.  Her name starts with an H and ends with a N.  Good luck to you if you are unlucky to get her.  I'll go back to the salon and make sure I stick to the techs I know do a great and professional job.  Again it's the first bad experience I've ever had here.  I have been a customer there for the last two years. 2 1
Was very impressed with decor and even the food the first few days after it opened. However, the last 2 times i have visited the quality of food has clearly deteriorated. I really hope they can maintain a consistent level of quality and the taste of the food. Their menu is quite limited and feel it is extremely important to maintain quality and consistency to succeed. 2 4
Went for a foot massage, the masseuse spent about 10 mins on the foot basically putting lotion and rubbing it in. The rest was spent giving me a basic body rub/massage. It was a half hearted massage (maybe just that masseuse as my friends had a better massage than me)I was like ok whatever but there was more to come. When the time came to pay, the base rate was 22$/hr but tips are fixed: 10$ 15$ 20$. They would not budge on this. I felt like I was coerced to paying this tip. That's a 50% tip. A classic case of "bait n switch". Not cool. Avoid this place. A business should accurately communicate the terms and rates, not advertise one and surprise you with another. 2 1
Hit or miss. I've had some good hair cuts in the past here and always felt that the value was great for the service. My last visit I was dissapointed with the cut. I hate to give a bad review since my stylist Yuna was very nice and gentle with my hair. I asked for a simple cut straight across. What i got instead was uneven and not like the photo I brought with me. The shape of my hair is now rounder than when I came in with a chunk taken out of it :/ 2 3
Why can't a simple order for eggs over easy result in eggs over easy : semi-hard yokes are not that.Once a year I re-try this place and once a year it's a fail. Otherwise this place is fine. 2 1
We came here on a recommendation from a friend, it was close to my parent's house so we didn't have to travel very far, and we didn't want to wait very long to be seated. In the beginning service was slow. They had a party of 12 that was here before us but they were getting dessert after we sat down for about 10 minutes. Seemed like they were more attentive after I whipped out my yelp coupon for free draft beer for checking in. It Nigiri definitely has way too much rice on it. The fish was pretty fresh but sliced so paper thin I could see through it. Almost like they were trying to ration their fish. When the server delivered our combo tempura a freaking ant came with it!!! They don't do half rolls unless it's your very last roll. The rolls are the standard portion of rice but some looked scaled down. In the end the menu is pretty large with a lot of variety just don't expect large portions. Would I come back? Probably not due to the traveling distance. 2 3
I've hesitated writing my review hoping I could write a more positive one...The hotel and the Statehouse are beautiful with excellent views.  The food is hit or miss. That being said, we have had some excellent meals there.  The service is very disappointing and hasn't improved with time.  From the bartenders to the servers no one seems to own their position or seem comfortable. A few of our experiences...We were at the Statehouse for our anniversary and my parents had called to send over a couple glasses of champagne to us.  The host told them that they couldn't seem to find us.  We were one of two tables seated in the restaurant that night. They could have found us if they had tried.  Also, my husbands steak was horrible, shouldn't have been served. We were in the bar another night with 5 bartenders behind the bar discussing who should go home since it was a slow night.  As the only two in the bar we sat listening with empty drinks.A couple friends and I stopped in for drinks and appetizers after the homecoming game.  Yes, it was busy and yes, they knew they would have a huge crowd due to the after party they were hosting. But, they all seemed flustered and irritated. It took at least 20 minutes for someone to acknowledge us.  We asked about the wine and she said she didn't know because it was her first week.  I knew for a fact it wasn't her first week. I hope the  assumption isn't that everyone is a one time customer due to the fact that it's a hotel and people come and go. But, that's how we felt.  I could go on...It's such a beautiful hotel and restaurant but the service does not live up the standards that you should expect to experience in a place like this.  I really do hope they can figure it out and turn things around.  Not sure how many more chances we will give. 2 1
Everytime I order through their mobile app my drink is never prepared in the "estimated time". Many times I arrive and after the 8-12 minutes and they still haven't collected my order from the printer  . Today I arrived 15 minutes after placing a mobile order for an iced flat white, once again my drink wasn't ready. After I enquired about it the barista went to check the printer and my order sticker was still sitting there. Instead of making my drink first she proceeded to make 3 more drinks before mine. The service here is always slow, what is the point of preordering something if you still have to wait a while for it. 2 1
This review is STRICTLY for the nightclub at Lavo.  I've been to Lavo a few times.  I was not impressed at all the first time I was there and have only grudgingly gone back for friends birthdays/bachelorette parties.  I'm a local and I just cant understand the hype about Lavo.  The decoration is cool and its a very sexy vibe but for as much as you expect from their reputation, Lavo is TINY!!!! There's really only one square cut out for a dance floor and the stairs that lead up to it are always wet.  I don't personally think there should be stairs leading on and off a dance floor anyway.  Nevermind the few flights you have to walk up and down to get in and out of the club from the restaurant as is. The music was average. Not really much variety. Just all house music.  And it's so crowded in such a tiny space I've been burned by smokers' cigarettes on more than one occasion.  I'm not even a smoker.  Like I said, I understand the Vegas nightlife and I've seen smaller clubs than Lavo but for how many people rave about this place I think it's way over-hyped. 2 3
For our Vegas getaway we stayed at New York New York. Every time we passed by this place there were tons of people and the place seemed nice, so on our last morning we decided to give it a try. And here starts the reasons for just 2 stars:1. We walked up to the podium a min after the couple ahead of us. Instead of greeting the two of us as well and the host COMPLETELY ignored us! He just acknowledged the first couple and took them to their table, not so much as a smile in our direction. I would have been willing to overlook this if the meal hadn't continued in the wrong direction.Before I go on, a kudos to the management: My bf ordered waffles and I ordered an omelette. About 5 min after our order was taken the manager headed over with a beautiful plate of waffles. He explained that their waffle machine had been broken all morning and it just started working again. The manager didn't want to take the chance that his client wouldn't get the requested order and so decided to let the order go out early. Nicely done.2. My bf didn't want to start eating before me and we figured an egg couldn't take too long, so we kept chatting and waited. The table that was seated after us received their eggs and I was still foodless (this was 20 min after the waffles arrived). Just as I was about to say something I saw our waiter realize the mistake and turn a 180 on his heels back to the kitchen. However, he did not see that I had witnessed his mistake and was expecting him to head over to our table to give a small apology for the wait. Not so. When my omelette finally arrived I expected that to be his opportunity to give a small 'I'm sorry'. Not so. The mistake was never acknowledged, quite the contrary, our waiter ignored us through the whole meal!That should teach me not to expect. 2 1
If you're looking for a location in the downtown that's close to the Eaton Centre, Ryerson Campus etc. you can't do much better. It's ideal. As well, if you're looking to pay as little as possible and still be in a hotel this close to the action, the Bond Place is your place. That said, the rooms are very very small, the TV is incredibly tiny, the bed and pillows are probably some of the most uncomfortable in recent memory (but if you like your mattress VERY hard, you might not mind it too much), and the bathroom is clean but basic (no fancy amenities in there).Can't say much about the restaurant. Ate breakfast in there one morning and the service was good. Not sure what the food is like overall, as what I ate would be pretty tough to make poorly.Overall, like another reviewer said, you get what you pay for. No surprises there. 2 3
This place is ok at best. Debated on giving it two stars but there are some nice things that I did enjoy about my stay. Bed is ok. No fitted sheets and they don't tuck the flat sheets in so that kinda grossed me out. I liked the color scheme and decorations in the room. The showers are weird, the glass partition covers LESS THAN HALF of the shower. The water pressure is great but since there isn't really a shower door water shoots out like a fricken waterfall getting the floors soaking wet. I used all the towels in the room and still couldn't dry the floors. I talked to housekeeping about this (very sweet woman, the rest of the staff treats you like a second class citizen) and she said all the rooms are like this. You can see the bathroom door is warped on the bottom from water damage. The location is great if you're into Freemont St. Its so close, you can hear the live music/DJ from your room loud and clear at 1am on weekdays, later on weekends. The casino has a kind of steampunk/vintage feel with a touch of modern that I really liked. Parking is in a garage off site(free) valet was 7 bucks(even for guests) Long story short, I would stay on the strip next time, really didn't save much money by staying out here at just an ok hotel. 2 3
The first day we were there, the down elevator from the garage walkway to the casino didn't work.  On the day we left, the up elevator from the casino to the garage walkway didn't work.  The room itself was very clean, but the decor was....  Let me just describe it.  The color theme of the room is white.  There is a vinyl headboard which covers the entire part of the wall behind the bed...what era is that??  There are 9 round fluorescent bulbs above the bed which generates white light...from the 80's??  The bathroom has a frosted sliding door that has no lock.  Another wall of the bathroom next to the shower is also frosted glass.  This glass wall is mounted to the wall (of course) with a gap between the wall and the glass, so you can actually look inside and see the entire toilet from that gap.  The sink is a small round bowl sink on top of the counter which has no place to place the soap.  There is a TV inside the bathroom though.  The drapes are controlled by switches next to the bed.  Overall, we didn't like the room because it was weird. 2 3
Memo to self - there are a million hotels in Vegas so don't waste time staying at a hotel that lacks customer service. Been waiting in a check in line for 45 minutes - next time skip Mandalay and stay at Caesars or any of the other truly excellent hotels Vegas has to offer! 2 5
I got an email for a free mascara on my birthday.  I made a trip to the store to pick up the item but they were out of stock.  I was told they were getting a large shipment in a couple of weeks but it's been a month and a half and they don't have it, don't know when it will come in, and won't give a substitute.  I've run into this problem with rain checks too.  I've been waiting over a year for a rain-check product.  I might have to switch over to Sephora as Ulta is not a well-run company in my opinion. 2 1
I used to be regular at the Burrito Boyz franchises in Mississauga and raved about the epic meal that followed a visit.The particular visit at this location left me disappointed. Last Tuesday I ordered a small chicken and shrimp burrito with all the fixings. I was excited to bite into the hot cheesy goodness. Instead the burrito was room temperature at best and the chicken lacked flavour and was missing the crispy bits that usually followed cooking on the flat top.After struggling through a few bites, I asked to have the food reheated. Instead the supervisor was nice enough to have the burrito remade for me, and offered a free drink while I waited. The remade burrito was definitely hot (temperature wise) but overall still lacked flavour. Will I return? Probably not.Two stars is for the service alone. 2 3
I live within walking distance of Park Rd Shopping Ctr... and love the shops and restaurant options.  I want to enjoy Charlotte Cafe but seem to always catch it on an "off" day.  I'm now thinking it's just normal procedure for them. In general it's over-priced for what you get.  I was in with my folks this past Friday for a 9:30am breakfast.  The service was painfully slow.  She told us immediately upon seating they hadn't planned to be "busy today".  Really... on black Friday... at Park Rd Shopping Ctr.?? You didn't expect to be busy??  To be honest I don't blame her.  I think it's just poor management and she was left to deal with the consequences as were the rest of us patrons. When our breakfast finally arrived it wasn't room temperature.  It was cold.  Nothing says good morning like cold eggs. grits, and bacon.    And to top it off... when my dad when to pay the bill it took him 10 minutes and 3 three employees to ring him up.  He was the only person in line at the time and they had no idea what to do.  Quite honestly... I do not understand how they stay in business. 2 1
I just can't figure out how this place got so many stars by so many people. My sis and I picked up our friend at the airport on friday night and we were hungry. So we looked up a good restaurant on trusty Yelp to help us decide. We fell on this place which got great reviews and seemed like it would be fun and delicious. We found the place pretty quickly and stepped right in. We were quickly seated, but service was slow throughout. After about 10-15 min we finally got our drinks...OUR DRINKS. My companions got drinks and they tasted bitter. Not worth $10 in my opinion.The food itself was a disappointment. We ordered their Korean short ribs, ginger mint duck salad, beach mushrooms, and chicken lollipops.My issue is not the size of the dishes, we all knew what tapas are so we were already expecting small portions, but with those small portions and the amount of money we were paying we expected good food. Instead we got pretentious food with unbalanced flavor. If you're going to dress up my food, make sure it tastes as good as it looks.1. The Korean short ribs were okay except for the fact that it was drowned in a very sweet sauce. If the ribs were DRIZZLED with the sauce I think it would have been very successful.2. Ginger mint duck salad, I thought the duck was well cooked, but the sauce was overpowering and bitter.3. Chicken lollipops were way too salty. I had to drink water with every bite of the chicken.4. The only saving grace was the beach mushrooms. It was balanced and just plain delicious. It was a little awkward to eat, but I could easily get over that since the dish was such a treat. If all of my other dishes were as good as this one, I'd be raving about this place.     So after all of this, we didn't even want dessert, which is a shame because I love dessert and it was my birthday. Poor excuse of a meal for the price. I expected more. Not sure if it's the prettiness of the place that people fall in love with, but for me, the food was not up to par. 2 3
Service is good, staff is friendly and knowledgeable. Beer and cocktails are good as well. Food...not so much.  My boyfriend and I shared the Jalapeno Pretzel appetizer which was pretty good, but our entrees.... disappointing.  I got the Baja chicken sandwich and he got the bison burger.   both were super dry. i could not even finish half of mine. He had to drench his in ketchup to be able to get the bison burger down. If i were to go back, it certainly would not be to eat. 2 3
The experience of eating out of a plastic bag with plastic gloves is just too weird and unappetizing. Its also messy.  Ordered the clams.  Ok portion for the money but the Captain's Boils sauce was way too garlicky.  Would go again and try other offerings if they served food on proper dishware. 2 1
Went on a Monday night and it was half full only, which was nice as I heard there are usually line ups. We sat at the bar where we saw all the food being made by a couple of guys who didn't look very happy lol. Everyone who reviewed the restaurant had the momofuku ramen and the pork buns, so I ordered those and the mushroom dan dan. Upon looking at the prices, I was actually a little shocked at how pricey they were. Coming from Van where I tried a lot of ramen, I thought this better be delicious!Pork buns - This dish came really fast and it was good, but not amazing. Brisket was very soft, and probably best tasting dish of the night.  4/5Momofuku ramen - Was only ok as I had way better broth and noodles before for less $. For the small portions and taste, not worth it. The 3 small slices of pork in it was pretty good though. 3/5Mushroom dan dan - I actually liked this dish quite a bit when I started eating it. The sauce was pretty good until you're half way through the noodles because all of the sauce was sinking to the bottom and it got REALLY salty. 3.5/5Everything plus tip came to $50 and both of us weren't exactly stuffed. It was a good experience, but will probably not come back. 3 4
Food is good (not amazing), service is inconsistent and at one point deceptive.  The food is a less fancy version of the main restaurant next door, so if you like "new" French cuisine, you'll enjoy this place.  I like traditional French cuisine with big, rich, and deep flavors, so I was not amazed by the food.  On the food end there isn't much to complain about except that the foie gras course was lost in the soup.  That course needs to be reworked.The service at this place needs retraining. When you pay a certain amount for a meal, you expect a minimum level of service which was not met in the following ways.1. The foie gras course was described as ravioli to me and then as tortellini to the couple next to me.2. My turbot course was visually smaller than the portion recieved by the couple next to me.  The server assured me that it was the same portion because everything gets weighed out, but even if this were the case, why would you serve a visually inconsistent dish to to someone sitting next to a couple eating 2 visually standard portions?  Since I sat at the bar area I observed several turbot courses being plated and mine was the only ine that was nonstandard.  The couple to my left got 2 standard portions and I ordered before them!3. The couple to my right was served salmon with a different preparation instead of turbot without being informed that they ran out of turbot.  Apparently my nonstandard piece was the last one.  The chef did provide them with an extra dish of dover sole as compensation though.  4. They made me wait about 10 minutes after I finished my last course (dessert) before asking if I received the dessert yet, then the server asked if wanted coffee or the check.  They even set a spoon in front of me to make me believe that something was coming.  The waiter then played it off like he made me wait because he didn't want to make a mistake since he almost served the wrong dish before.  If you screwed up and forgot about me just own up to it!Bottom line 3.5/5 for food 2/5 for service. 3 2
I ordered spicy chicken curry that comes with tom yum soup, grilled calamari appetizer and a glass of white wine. It was $26 and change with tax in.Service was ok. Attentive but not very well trained. Breaded calamari was tasty but I realized that most of it was breading and very thin strips inside the breading was calamari. Nice presentation though. On a bed of fresh lettuce in a dish in a shape of a boat. It also had a sauce that was half mayo and I found the mayo too western tasting addition. Soup was very good too. Very comforting on a chill night and just right amount spicy. Spicy chicken curry came in a very big portion and was very spicy. The waitress tried to explain me that albeit not very well. I have a friend who  finds Doritos spicy and I can take quite a bit of heat in my food and this was definitely at my limit if not a bit more. I could not taste the food very much and was sipping water after each bite. I took the leftovers home and warmed it up in coconut cream and that was definitely better. It was just past the dinner hour rush when I finished eating and the restaurant emptied out so I sat sipping my glass of wine watching the world go by outside on the street sans the usual ding of a busy restaurant in the background. My phone was also low on battery so I found an outlet and plugged my phone. Shortly after, the bus boy came and told me that his boss needs the electrical outlet and for me to unplug my phone. It was an odd request that I obliged. When I was on my way out, I passed by the little bench where the outlet was and saw that the owner plugged in 2 machines that were not cordless and battery powered but both had a cord (I would understand if she needed to charge them) so the whole point was that she (owner) did not want me to charge my phone there (and use their electricity). Judging by a comment from the woman with the baby in the review section, this is a good place to come for some cheap thai food but don't expect much from service and having a great experience. If you do, it will only result in a disappointment. 3 2
I was here February 2013 was a long wait. Food wasn't that bad was following Adam of Man vs Food. 3 1
Hey I wouldn't recommend that you have your honeymoon here, but for a last minute room when every casino is booked cuz of queen madonna, the worlds series of poker, and the air show... I'll give it a whirl since I still have fond memories of spending a whole day trying to win stuffed animals and walking 12 miles going around and around considering what to play.  (And i didn't want to stay off the strip)  For nostalgia, memories, or trying to be 12 again, I went upstairs to see if I still had the stuffed animal winning touch.  I was surprised to see that most of the same games were still there!  I concentrated on the Tic-tac-toe since it had the cutest and best price for a first win.  I'm not playing a game where you have to trade 15X to get something decent!  Hint, if you have a room they give you a book of coupons that let you play 2 for 1!  I played a total of 6x or $3.  I won twice!  I guess I still have it.  Hint #2 if your asian and your nice, the gamekeeper might let you lean over the table to float the ball in the right hole.  I got a blue bear and a pink bear that wears a "Property of circus circus hoodie".  Awww how cute!Regarding the rooms... Like I said it's no honeymoon suite, but my room was clean.  I'm a guy, as long as it's clean, i'm straight.  Strangely the lock on my room was broken and I only  realized it when I was leaving for Madonna.  Luckily I didn't have any valuables.  I called the front desk and they said they would send someone to fix it.  No one came and in the morning I called to bitch again.  I ended up talking to a sup and she sent a housekeeper to verify.  She thought I was one of those freeloading leeches that just bitches to get a free room.  Apparently there are alot of freeloading leeching customers.  The housekeeper opened the door while i was completely nekked trying to put my clothes on.  Apparently she didn't mind and just kept on messing with the door.  Finally I got my boxers on.  She left, the sup called me back and I got a free room.  Comped baby! 3 2
The fish is fresh and the portions are generous, but as is common with Chinese run sushi restaurants, they tend to put more rice in the rolls than the fish itself. The all-you-can-eat buffet menu has about 40 different types of rolls which are good, many of which have interesting made up names to them. The hot foods are also tasty too! The tempuras are crunchy and the variety of teppanyakis are scrumptious! The service was fast and the servers are all smiles and patient. Not bad indeed. 3 4
First of all, I had a nice time swimming in the pool with no people around. The water was perfect temperature for me, so it was very relaxing. BUT the reason there was no people, is I am guessing because of the construction that was going on in the spa (on the upper level - didnt affect the pool area). I did not expect the construction and wasnt told on the phone when I was booking an appointment there. So here are the cons & pros:Pros: warm nice water, good steam room (even though very tiny - again because there were no people, it was perfect), very friendly personnel (EXCEPT for the manager - very rude!!!), nice rob and slippers, tea area with nice teas that you can make yourself, cookies, water, apples.Cons: RUDE manager who didnt want to address our concerns and was talking back at us. The clock is not working in the pool area, so there is no way of knowing what time it is (especially inconvenient if you have an appointment booked), construction on the upper level where I was doing my pedicure, a bit cold on the upper level, steam room is very small, and no water anywhere near the pool/steam room area. When we used the towels and wanted new ones, we had to ask personnel to bring them to us (wasnt enough in the pool area, an no one came by to check), water has a lot of chlorine, even though not supposed to. When we addressed our concerns with the manager, she didnt really want to do anything about it or give us a discount. For that price will not be coming back, which is unfortunate, because the personnel there is really nice and did a good job with my manicure. 3 2
Overall: Asian fusion buns with a unique flavor profile twist that includes earl grey, matcha, Hong Kong style, Japanese,  Tawainese and French.Sample: there are  bread samples for you to taste before you buyCleaniness: unlike other Chinese bakeries that reuse the trays and tongs, they do clean it before reusingCost: range from about $ 2.90-5$ for buns- I didn't check the pastriesTaste:  bought the Earl grey twist, matcha red bean bun and it tasted great.Value and would I come back:  probably not - the price seems a bit inflated.  For a one time experience for breakfast or snack, it's not a bad idea. 3 4
The service was very good, and fast. But I did have a problem with the menu being dirty the pages where sticky and  had some dried peaces of food and so was the table. 3 2
Rooms were clean, and well accommodated, but the free internet was spotty at best; you could check your email, but streaming movies or videos was hit or miss.They had great shuttle service to/from airport, and nearby malls, but the places you can go are limited.Great staff, very helpful when dealing with requests. 3 4
Went last night around 6 for he first time.  Had a good cocktail.  Food was OK; service was terrible.  Jess never said boo to us, just put the menus down, took our order, and walked away.  Never smiled once. We split the cranberry & blue cheese salad and fish & chips; both were good and ample for both us; therefore, good value for money.  However, we were disappointed at how slim and uninteresting the menu was.  Shopping at Bass Pro Outdoor World made it a fun evening. 3 2
Came in Saturday around 1120, was told they were a bit busy and to come back at noon. No big deal, ran another errand. Came back at noon and waited 40 minutes for them to even take my car in for work. Lucky for them an oil change takes ~20min and we were able to get out about an hour after we arrived. Great customer service as always but not impressed today with the time it took. 3 2
Food and drinks are really good but the servers are terrible and take forever, they don't check on you to see how everything is and if you need anything. The bussers and food runners do all the work. I don't even understand why they have servers they do nothing. I would rather tip the bussers and food runners. 3 2
Drove all the way from the NW at the recommendation of a friend. Maybe the only Roberto's in town that has Carne Asada Onion Rings. Someone needs to tell the owners they should have that at ALL locations so I dont have to drive so far next time. Came around 3 in the afternoon on Monday and the placed was packed with kids so I ended up taking order to go. Other than that, same great late night eats as other locations! 3 4
I've get lunch here on a regular basis...so why do I keep going back if I only gave 3 stars? The pizza!! There pizza is one of the best I've had, good toppings, thick chewy crust that is amazing. However, I've tried a few other things from their lunch line but the quality and flavor just isn't there. If you go for lunch, get the pizza! 3 4
Just OK. Definitely not Ramen. Noodles are fresh but nothing that makes this place outstanding in Chinatown. 3 4
Yay! I'm glad I finally made it here.  I have been Facebook friends for a while, I really want to take comedy classes or join the improv group or both.  I was there last night. A three star rating is "a-ok" and that's ok. There is plenty of room for improvement, and I'm sure we'll get there eventually.  I remember when this joint was Anderson's 5th Estate! I only realized it was the same location when I parked. This information has nothing to do with review.  I just thought I'd throw some stupid detail in.  It was, actually, kinda cool because I knew where the restrooms were and the layout of the place hasn't changed much - so my anxious self knows where all the fire exits are.I liked the guy who greeted the incoming crowd. Very friendly and just straight up cool. The bar area was so crowded, I would've shut it down if I was a fire Marshall.  But this was all pre-show. We were free to loiter on the patio, roam the parking lot etc. no problem. I need elbow room and I will find it!!  The seating system made sense.  (I went to the 9:30 Lynne Koplitz show, btw, management)  I liked that.My poor little waitress should've had a little back up!  See, I'm not going to bitch about having to wait while she attended the party of 12+ seated next to me. She was overwhelmed and probably over worked. I just had the feeling that the club owners haven't exactly nailed down this detail yet.  What I would have done was assign one person to handle the large party, and another to take care of the overflow in her particular section.  I understand the purpose of a 2 item minimum, but really, by the time my server acknowledged me, I was going to contest it.  I am not that bitchy, but I was about to bitch off.  Yeah. That part could use a lil work.  The show was great. I will go again! I like the acts that they sign. It's a legit comedy scene. Great calendar, and I love open mic. So I will attend again, and I'm sure my rating will improve. The 3 star is my first impression. Xoxo 3 5
At first it was a rocky go but once all the kinks worked out we LOVE the community! The property is nice. The apartments are spacious and luxury. The staff is friendly. The amminities are what we wanted. We couldn't ask for more. The maintance crew is awesome. The parking is a serious problem. They need to designate bike parking. There is also no parking for visitors and ppl who don't live her park in others spaces. I'm really upset that there are a very tenants that continue to park in the handicap parking or where ever they please and the office doesn't do anything. Been trying to get a garage and the staff still hasn't got back to us after months! 3 4
I generally like Majerle's.  I've used the Cotton Room for my birthday celebration a couple of times.   Food is good, it's a good central location and its convenient when we go downtown for a game, D'Backs, Suns or Mercury or shows.   Very disappointed in the service/attitude of the staff tonight.  We were seated in the back section,  we were the second group to be seated back there.  Several other groups came in and were waited on much faster.  Groups that came in after us, had drinks and food before we got drinks.  The groups were leaving when we finally got our food.   NOT happy with today's service and the fact we sat there for sometime without service.  Food was good, no problems with that, I think the waitress was inexperienced or just lazy. 3 2
I give it a 3 1/2, really. We arrived at 10:30 am, taking the advice that the Monarch would be quieter early in the day. The young lady behind the counter greeted us as soon as we walked in, making us feel comfortable in what was definitely a bar setting. She was very generous in suggesting that, even with our Indie Coffee Passports, we could order whatever we liked from their espresso menu. I'm a big fan of soy lattes but was gently steered toward the 'regular' milk version [I was offered 1% or 2% - a nice touch]. My latte was presented in a large cup, the foam poured to create a swirled heart. It proved to be smooth and mild, foamy and thick, easy to drink.  My Passport companion found a comfy looking upholstered sofa, perhaps a bit too comfy, almost touching the ground when sat upon; so we settled in at a table and pulled up a few chairs for our coats and such.  Since there was only one other patron at the time, we didn't think anyone would mind.The crystal chandeliers hanging over the counter were a nice counterpoint to the dark wood benches, tables and chairs, with a big screen centred at the back of the room and eclectic art on the walls. We stayed long enough for the lunch crowd to start filling up the space, groups of two and more at tables, a few people at the bar. Since we'd spent an hour and a half sipping our lattes and basically having the place to ourselves, we bundled up our gear and headed out.  All in all it was an unexpectedly mellow experience and I enjoyed it. 3 4
I won a free trip to Vegas and this is the place that was chosen for my hotel. The hotel itself is decent but outside of that you are in a great part of the strip, you dont have to walk far at all to go to the more popular casinos. There is also fun outside club right outside of the hotel that specializes in mixology, so it is fun watching them make drink. 3 4
All I would like to say is the staff is great and helpful. I love the floor plans, and the location they definitely use the space the best way possible. Having to use a fob to get inside the building is so very annoying especially since you have to use it to get in the gate as well. But that really is their only way of security. But, the most irritating thing I've come across is that there is no parking. You are told that you can buy a covered space for $15 a month or even get a garage with an extra space for $150 a month. Humm I would totally pay the $15 a month so I know when I come home after 6 pm I can park inside the complex. Yeah, only if there was one available. There just isn't enough spaces covered or not to accommodate the residents and definitely not guests. I am a single female that works long hours and I have to park outside of the gate to the complex most nights. I have been lucky that I find the one open space there, shoot if that just didn't happen to be open then I'm not sure where I would park.. the mall or the hotel next door and have to walk over to the apartment complex. Honestly, I don't know what they can do about this problem because there just isn't anymore room to add parking. If I can not purchase a covered space before my lease is up I will definitely move. 3 2
Hot stone massages are great. Definitely warranted after dealing with such helpful (read: incompetent) front desk staff!Also...it's really not hard to spell my name. Paul. PAUL. Not, Pall. Seriously. 3 2
We went into this cupcake shop as recommended by a friend. We are very impressed with the cupcake and cake decoration this place does. We decided to try triple chocolate cupcake and red velvet cupcake as recommended by a friendly staff. My husband decided to try on cronut. He did love the cronut (we've never had the original one so we cannot compare on that). He loved the cronut especially the cream filled in the middle. My cupcakes were ok in texture. However, I love the frosting. It is the first cupcake store that I've ever been to and offered a "not overly sweet" frosting. I'd say I'd go back just to try other flavors. They have friendly staff and made our experience pleasurable. 3 4
So we decided to try this place out since we had a friend visiting from out of town who was already around Kensington.   The service wasn't too bad, but the food took over an hour to come out to us since the place was heaving.  Pretty understandable given the size of the kitchen. I had the El Especial and the scrambled eggs were quite nice, cheesy and creamy like described.   The salsa and sausages were a little bland, but wasn't too bad.   The wife and our friend both had the fish fry and were kinda left asking where the rest of the fish was, but what do you expect for the price?  All in the all, not great.. but not too bad.  Ended up picking up pork rolls from chinatown because wife and friend weren't entirely satisfied. 3 2
Headed here after a night at the movies after spotting it on the drive by.The prices are pretty standard for an asian dessert place, so when the total came to more than $30 it wasn't much of a surprise.Ordered the Matcha Sago with Red Bean and Mochi (~$6.45), Black Glutinous Rice with Mochi, Mango, and Coconut Milk (~$6.45), Mango Sago with Coconut Jelly and Mango (~$5.45), Mango Slush (~$5), Curry Fish/Beef Balls- 6 pcs (~$5), and Glutinous Rice Balls with Peanut and Syrup- 5 or 6 pcs (~$3.45).The taste overall for each of these items wasn't bad; was pretty good and not too the sweet. The matcha sago was a little bland, but oh well just won't order it next time. The mochi could have been a little better, because with these desserts I was expecting the boiled kind of mochi but they use the mochi you find at the toppings bar at frozen yogurt self-serve places. A little disappointed about that, but will also know to not order stuff with mochi in it next time.But the problem with each of them (minus the fish balls and the rice balls with peanut of course) was that they WEREN'T COLD ENOUGH. They were honestly only a little under room temperature, and that made them a lot less enjoyable than they could have been.But other than that, not bad at all! They don't seat many people but I go a seat right away on a weeknight. May come back again. 3 2
They do an excellent job here and I was very satisfied with the end result of my nails. However, they definitely find every way to make an extra buck. Which is okay, as long as they let the customer know. I came in asking for all matte black nails and one silver nail. I knew the matte would cost a few extra bucks but I didn't care. But what I didn't know is that she was going to use a gel polish for my silver nail without asking me first, when I know they have regular polish in silver, therefore charging me an extra $25 or so for one nail per hand. 3 2
On time and reasonable service fees.  Seems to listen to what customer wants and knows what he's doing.  Quite friendly but professional.  Also seems thorough but takes his time; for the work he did for me, could've taken about 20 minutes at the most, since he basically fixed the drip by exchanging parts in the faucet but ended up spending an hour.  Just a note; he charges a separate visit fee in addition to his hourly rate. I didn't complain since when I called him I thought it was for a bigger problem and turned out it was nothing.  Overall, it wasn't a bad experience. 3 2
Review for Large Groups (15-20)If you make a reservation for a large group here, be prepared to wait a very long time in order for them to put tables together. Also be prepared to be very hungry since they will take their time to prepare all the steaks and serve them together.Food: The steak was fine. After waiting so long though, I could have probably eaten shoe leather dipped in au jus and would have been happy. For the price I paid, I wish I could tell you that it was the best steak I ever had, but it wasn't. Service: Man, these guys are great, except when they have to serve a large group. There will be miscommunications that will lead to overcharges. Should you be so brave as to go in a large group, I recommend placing one person in charge of communicating with one waiter, after everybody orders initially. Ambiance & Decor: It was dark and I was way too hungry to take note of it and to care.Summary:Food: Steak. Service: Get it together, people. Ambiance & Decor: Hungry people don't care. I would not recommend the experience of eating here in a large group, but if you do, please make sure you have effective communication with the wait staff. 3 2
Had the curry bowl today with saag paneer and beef madras, plus naan. The whole wheat naan was not bad for whole wheat and was lightly toasted to warm up. Saag paneer was delicious, but wish there was more cheese pieces in there. beef was tender with nice spice. 3 4
Must echo Brian O. about the lack of circulation in the booth area. Not good when the temp is 113 degrees, no matter how many times the server refills your water. By the way, our service was good and efficient, and we liked the guacamole prepared tableside. Also, we liked the many vegetarian options and the way the shrimp tacos were prepared. I hardly ever venture out to Glendale, but at least now I know of a decent Mexican restaurant there. 3 4
I've had a plain pizza and a lamb gyro, both good. As they market the coffee too, I thought I'd stop in for a cup. I ordered a small iced coffee and waited for over 10 minutes for it. Not sure how it would have gone had I ordered a more complicated espresso drink. Stick to ordering food here. 3 2
Thumbs Up is a good place to enjoy some Korean cuisine if you're not looking for fancy surroundings. It's sparse where the kitchen takes about  1/4 of the restaurant, so overall the place can hold about 20 people.I ordered the Pork Bone from here and found it to be okay but definitely not the best as people have stated before me (beef was tender but I thought the broth could have been more flavoured). I assume what's good about this place that keeps people coming back for more are the huge portions, low prices and super friendly staff. Dishes are about $5 - $7 each and a side of kimchi and pickled daikons are always refillable.Yup, A great place for a cheap fixed meal. 3 4
This was the first shop I decided to try wedding dresses at I had no idea what I wanted and i guess that if your a bride who doesn't know what you want or what your looking for this is not the best place to start the ladies were really helpful but having to pull dresses on your own is so overwhelming there we're so many dresses and they all looked the same I tried on about 5 dresses and sometimes found myself needing help to either put them on or take them off so that's another thing if you are going don't go alone and go with someone your comfortable with that can help you get in and out of the dresses overall I left there feeling overwhelmed and with the thought that I was not going to ever find a dress because I hated how I looked in each one of the ones I tried on I would say go here after you have gone to other places to look and know exactly what your looking for 3 2
I've been here dozens of times over the past few years. This place is good, but it has a few annoying qualities.Pros:The food is delicious. The prices are reasonable. The staff is friendly and efficient.  Also, the free peanuts are a plus.Cons:The buns at this location taste weird. I've eaten at other Five Guys locations and the buns at this one just plain taste weird. I don't know why.The tables are dirty. I don't like sitting down to a table smeared with someone else's cheeseburger-grease. This, plus the loud crappy music being blasted, means I'm not taking anyone here for a date, or on any kind of business lunch.It's dumb that they serve all hamburgers in a brown paper bag. I know it's probably part of some silly tradition, but the bag means that the tables get messy because you have to rip open the bag and grease goes everywhere. Also, the fries and bun get soggy inside the bag.  Note: this does not happen on a McDonald's tray.If the restaurant would change its dumb, backwards policy of serving all food in ghetto paper bags and the workers would wipe down the tables more than once a year, this place would be a five-star restaurant, easy. 3 2
We chose this hotel because of the recommendations we read on-line.  The hotel is certainly very unique.  We were in Pittsburgh to see a Pirates game.  Our original plans were to walk to the game but we did not feel safe enough in that neighborhood to walk.The room we stayed in was small but comfortable.  The bathroom was nice sized but the shower stall is much too small.  The toilet seat was very loose, so, I had to tighten it.  Also, the in room coffee service was not good.The shuttle driver was terrific and very accommodating.The continental breakfast buffet was terrific and nicely displayed.I thought the TV was too small but the picture was good.  Had we planned on staying there for more than one night, I would have asked to change rooms.Having said all this we would stay here again.  The hotel staff was very nice and we loved the atmosphere of the hotel. 3 4
This place is roomy. Membership required.  Pool and dart boards with pleanty of room.  TVs are abuntant.  Overall good enviroment. 3 4
My husband and I were catching a show at the V Theater and decided to visit this eatery. I'd say it's higher end fast food -- you order at the counter and the food is delivered to your table. It's more expensive then your usual fast food but is much cheaper than a sit down restaurant on the Strip. I had a lobster roll for about $13 and a Lobster Mary for $14. We shared a lobster bisque for $9. The lobster roll was so so, the bread seemed like a folded piece of Texas toast rather than an actual roll. The lobster meat also didn't have a lot of flavor. The Lobster Mary was fun because it's served with a piece of claw meat as garnish. The lobster bisque was blah. It was too salty and oily for my taste. If you don't want to spend $50 per person on your meal in Vegas, this is an okay place but just know the food quality is not that great. 3 2
I've been here many times before and it really just depends on the night. Some nights service is fast and great others it takes forever. You better order everything you want from the beginning or else it'll take forever to get just one additional sauce. Today our server Kimberlee was great. 3 5
Low prices, huuuuge portions, I would have loved this place in university. That being said, their rolls go heavy on the fillers like rice and fake crab (impossible to avoid in this place) and skimp on the nice sashimi meat. We ordered alcohol, apps, and the most expensive thing on the menu (large party tray) for just two of us, but they didn't bring one of those little freebie side salads, which I've sort of come to expect at little sushi places. Side note: we will definitely order their ramen again, as take-out, great broth. 3 4
Atmosphere is cool.  Fish tacos are fresh but missing something in the taste.  Steak tacos were better.  Make reservations.  I would go back but not hurry back. 3 2
To preface this: I think smiling banana leaf has some of the best thai food in pittsburgh.Why did I give it 3 stars?  Their main waitress is absolutely awful. She is rude and ruins the experience nearly every time. I have friends that refuse to go to smiling banana leaf with me because of how rude the waitress is. 3 2
A nice cappucino with beautiful design. Breakfast food selection is limited with just croissants or strudel. Seating is limited with a few chairs and stools for the location. The chairs they do have are nice. Staff was very friendly. The aesthetic is rustic with distressed wood and ceramic tub to place used dishes in. A nice place to pop in for a few. 3 4
Left the performance feeling misled.  This is NOT your typical Cirque du Soleil performance - it felt more like a musical.  As others touched on, this was more like a tribute.  What they should have done was name it Viva Elvis in large font, and in very small font, state "by Cirque du Soleil."  Yes, there were some acrobatic performances (trampoline was very cool) but if you go in thinking you will see a lot of amazing feats, be prepared to be disappointed.  What you will actually get are images of Elvis growing up, and many of his hit songs, some sung by him, some by the performers."O" is definitely my favorite.  KA was really good as well.On a positive note, there was some sort of promotion that we were not aware of, yet without us knowing or asking, we were given a 30% discount.  What a great surprise! 3 5
Food was good but pricey. Gave you large portions enough to share. Restroom was disgusting. 3 2
This restaurant is hidden in the country side of Gastonia...who would've there would be a seafood restaurant in this part..but here it was. The menu had a great selection of seafood and for those who are not into seafood..there is an excellent selection of pasta and steaks all at a reasonable price. I had the crab cakes, which was delicious. I took away 1 star because service was not that great our waitress was not attentive to our table..and I took away another star because the salad bar looked a bit messy. Over all the food was good and the price was good. It was comfortable. I will definitely come back and give it a second try. 3 4
So this was a converted property...less than a year old since Marriott's purchase.  Great service, particularly in the new concierge lounge (open since Dec. 2012).  Renovations look well done, but be prepared for small rooms and worn carpeting.  Overall, I'd stay here again primarily because of the service (and lower price vs. the airport Marriott).  Clean, comfortable, etc...your average Marriott trying to be European, but the folks there really do try hard and want you to come back.  Why stay there....because it's downtown, service is fantastic and price.  Why stay somewhere else...because you want to be outside downtown or you're your a Starwood Platinum. 3 4
Kind of tucked away and hard to notice, especially being next to the really glammed out Ella's Deli. But worth a visit if you're looking for a good gyro or kebab. :]The donuts are alright too. They have a wide variety! Myself, I really rather like their cookies. They also offer homemade baklava.Really though I can reccomend their sandwiches with a side of the seasoned fries. Quite yummy! Vegetarian options also available such as potato kahbi or falafel sandwiches. And they had a lot of beverages to choose from too.Although the location is not ideal, it's worth a stop if you're in that part of town. :] 3 4
When you walk into Korean Village you will be quickly greeted by their friendly staff. The restaurant is roomy with a nice atmosphere and has large comfy booth seatings - my fave! The menu is extensive with many options from platters to BBQs and the usual Korean dishes (pork bone soup, bibimbap etc.). My partner and I ended up sharing the assorted Grilling BBQ Platter (pork, beef, chicken, seafood). The selection of meat was not bad but just a bit over-marinated in sauce which made eating it quite salty. Prices in comparison to their serving portions are not very filling but other than that, the service is excellent as the waitress was helpful in coming back and forth to check on our cooking meats. Overall, fun experience with attentive staff that really want you to enjoy your time there.         Note: take notice of the many pictures of celebrities and newspaper articles on their wall that have eaten here. 3 4
Ok disclaimer, the food here is pretty good.. Like 4 stars good. I would even say it's my go to Korean restaurant here in calgary. We were craving Korean tonight so of course we decided to come here. We knew it closed at 10 so we walked in the door by 9pm. To our disappointment we were turned away by staff saying they were closed. I politely pointed out to the staff that the open sign was still on so it was misleading. He proceeded to correct me saying the open sign was off. I walked outside and there it was, a bright ass sign saying "open" with the hours printed underneath (sign said 10 btw). I understand restaurants closing 30 minutes early if they're slow but a whole hour? That seems pretty unreasonable. 3 2
My husband and I stayed here last weekend for a much-needed Vegas getaway. The particular room we stayed in was alright..."A-OK" as my 3-star rating can attest, but honestly? Despite the additional kitchen sink and wine glasses in the cabinets, our room in particular wasn't any more special than a Hampton or Garden Inn. Maybe I'm spoiled by suites at the likes of the Venetian when I travel to Vegas. They're clean and comfortable, and if the price is right...as everyone says, you don't really spend all that much time in the room anyway in Vegas, right? Least you're not likely to find a dead hooker in your mattress or anything. It's also kind of far from the action of the strip, located essentially across from the Sahara and a good few blocks from the Stratosphere. While I'm not a high-rollin' Vegas snob in the least, keep this in mind if this is your first time in Vegas. No casino and no crazy cigarette smell, which is nice, depending on your preference. Hilton Grand Vacations definitely has perks...a 24-hr. convenience shop if you want a late-night sandwich or want to split a bottle of post-cocktail champagne or wine with your sweetie. Nice exercise room. There's also a cool rec room with foozball and such if you're stuck here for a business meeting or what have you. Seems like the perks are better if you're a time share owner here. I'm a measly Hilton Silver member so that's probably why I got an "eh" room. I'm also going to be honest and knock off an additional star for the constant barrage of phone calls I received booking AND staying at this place. I was called at least once a day on my cell prior to arrival (whilst playing phone tag...I'm somewhat respectful and try to return all calls) to "ensure check-in was smooth", which basically translated to me as "Purchase our time share plan!" They will also call your room once a day to try to sell their time shares on to you (loud phone ringing in your room in Vegas is always kind of startling, especially when you're trying to sleep off that last 4am cocktail...)I'd recommend this place if you're already over the hooplah of the Vegas strip and want a somewhat-inbetween getaway. Overall it's clean, comfortable and reasonably priced. In other words (and I abhor this saying but) it is what it is! 3 4
Been dropping in here for several years now, the odd lunch or breakfast. The food is tasty, plain cooking, nothing uber-creative. Fresh ingredients, always. Service can be slow or reasonable, depending on the capacity. Plenty of coffees and teas. I see all these reviews about friendly service, and I guess that's fair for the most part ... still, there is this one lady who serves and takes orders who's always busy and really hustles ... but always looks like she's just swallowed a glass of vinegar. I have NEVER seen her smile. Takes away a little bit from an otherwise pleasant experience. 3 4
No liquor, had very good hot sauce, made me have the toots after but all Mexican food does lol. I would give this place a try if you're looking for a chillPlace to eat it but you can also get out of quick. 3 4
Aw man, I really wanted to love this place. Got lost as mapquest told me to turn into 6th street but it's just off of 6th. When I walked in, felt like I was in the 70's. Pretty small space but cute interior with classic oldies playing in the background. Ordered the root beer float, nutella, fruit loops, smores, bacon fritter, mexican, blackberry, and lemon meringue donuts with a salted caramel almond milk latte all for about $25. The root beer float, nutella, smores, and bacon fritter were pretty good (not pictured: the fritter and nutella because I ate them before I snapped a pic); everything else, I'd pass on. The coatings on the donuts were very melty and I wasn't too fond of the fillings in them. It was runny! Tip: have a bunch of napkins on you while eating them because I spilled all sorts of fillings on myself and had to lick my fingers off. They also have their own homemade syrups for their coffee drinks (salted caramel, vanilla, and hazelnut) but the latte I got was just alright.Overall, cool spot, friendly staff, and okay donuts that are on the pricier side. I'll give it another try but for now, I still prefer pinkbox and ronald's. 3 4
Food portions are very small, and very overpriced.  Was underwhelmed with the tacos, meatballs ,guac and cevice. Nothing special. However the Mojitos were delivious and the patio is lovely. Will be back for a drink only. 3 2
Their claim to fame, the Smoked Meat, is pretty good. But everything else I've tried has been just OK (or in some cases unavailable due to weird supply shortages). Soups are OK, knish was OK, beef brisket OK, fries were soggy and greasy, meatloaf was overpowered by thyme or rosemary (don't recall which)..I really wanted to like this place, but unless I order a smoked meat sandwich I usually end up disappointed. 3 2
My first 3 star review.I really can't write that the food was terrible because it really wasn't. The problem is that it was nothing special. The burger had gristle and was salty, boring. The toppings are nothing special. Offering one "special" topping and one generic topping is not worth the prices they ask. $11.00 for a combo? I'd rather go to Moxies and get a burger from them for the same price. Much better. All the hype for these "specialty burger houses" just makes the disappointment they offer that much worse. Lower the prices, offer more selection and give more fries, then you might be worth the hype. As it stands these places Hero burger/South St/Five guys are nothing more than hyped up dives with not much more to offer than the "regular" burger dives. 3 2
Had dinner here a few nights ago, overall it was nice but I certainly didn't leave thinking it was all that. Spent a while looking at the menu. For one there are no capitol letters and the font can't be any bigger than size 10 so I sort of found it difficult to read. Secondly, nothing really sounded that good, maybe they switch it up often. Girlfriend had some sort of girly pear drink in a martini glass, this probably stood out the most. It almost tasted like drinking a fresh pear but with a little booze, quite good. On the other hand, my Coors Light tasted like beer. Several different artisan type breads were offered, we tried a couple, I like the pretzel one the best. For dinner I had the mushroom risotto and GF had a steak. Risotto was fine, GF's steak came pre-cut up into little pieces. Is this supposed to be for the dog? We both thought that was pretty odd and basically cheating if they're trying to see how well they cooked it. To wrap it up, we had the tiramisu. Our waiter said it was the best ever (I hate it when wait staff say that). It was good, I mean it's not like I'm not going to eat a big cup of tiramisu but it was by no means the best ever. It was on the dry side actually. Mph, we tried it but I don't think we will come back. 3 2
Atmosphere - a bar for bicyclers with bikes hanging all over and arty photographs of Pittsburgh and/or bicycles or both some for sale. On walking in I thought we'd made a mistake on seeing the very small bar with a couple tables then walked up a couple stairs in the back to a room with 10-12 tables. Mid-Sunday afternoon there were a couple beer drinkers and as we left a Triathlon group of 10-15 came for a meeting.Service - surprisingly excellent for a bar considering we were the only ones eating at the time and brought 2 kids with us. Kids were offered coloring books and a selection of markers. One small topping mistake with a burger was quickly remedied and even the chef/cook apologized in passing which was exceptionally nice.Food - the menu is fun with wild mixes of toppings (peanut butter bacon burger, burger on a salad) that looked fun to try. The kids' meals (usually 2.99) were actually free (Sunday special) and there are a few typical offerings that come with fries, applesauce or celery/carrots. Burger 1 - Primanti style with egg, cole slaw, fries - was a strong good. 3 starsBurger 2 - Veggie (all burgers can be made turkey or veggie) boca-style dipped in hot sauce with hot pepper cheese, bacon (yes!), lettuce, tomatoe, blue cheese dressing on side. Delicious. Bun was soft yet not too squishy. Onion rings - can choose for .95 extra instead of sides. Delicious beer batter, perfectly cooked real onions inside, generous serving. Could have used a little more salt in batter but forgiven because tasted homemade instead of an oversalted mix.Pretzel appetizer - yummy, typical baked not fried, served with a yummy cheese that seemed like a real cheese spread made with butter instead of plastic nacho cheese. If so quite surprising.One surprise is that most of the choices on the menu were not very healthy for what you'd think would be a healthy-eating bicycling crowd. Maybe if you triathlon then you don't need to watch what you're eating. The salads were few and very simple. More thought went into the burgers and the sandwiches. There were a a couple simple vegetarian with cheese paninis and the veg burger options and the seitan wings that we didn't try.Overall primarily a bar with fun and pretty good sandwiches and burger and a couple salads. I'd return for fabulous happy hours and daily specials. $5 burger night for example. $10 any sandwich and a beer night. 3 4
This is one of my favorite restaurants in Arizona!  Great food, drinks and really unique and nice atmosphere.  However, tonight's service was not on par!  Our server skipped me when going around the table to take orders and then she left quick.  When something was said when the food was brought out she told me she thought I wasn't eating.  Well, I never said that I wasnt eating but did say I was not drinking.  Either way, as a server you should never assume. Then when I paid for my diet coke. .. $2.45, I gave her a $10 and she brought me $7 even back!  (Do the math) granted .55 is not a huge chunk but that is not right!  I was very disappointed, then when we asked who the manager was we were told it was that young lady who was our server. . Of course. 3 2
I went to this place on my birthday because I had driven by so many times and needless to say was interested. I loved the overall atmosphere, it was so fun and the waitress was very nice. The menu does have a TON of choices but as far as the foods quality goes, I wasn't in love with it. It was a good time though so i'd probably go back. 3 4
All depends on when you go.  The course itself speaks for itself ( top notch) however I went Sunday afternoon and it was only $60, then went again Wednesday morning and it was $160.  So I recommend check the times for your price range. 3 4
Very serviceable the few times I've been. Won't blow you away but the food is good. The Las Vegas roll is delicious. Tootsie rolls are good too. A bit pricey if you really get in a sushi mood. Atmosphere is good and service is generally good. Decor is a bit weird especially if you get seated in the awkward area in the back near the rest rooms. 3 4
Pros: Environment, waitress serviceNot so con: Asian Chicken Sesame SaladCons: Not know their Wi-Fi password Is it a good restaurant for kids? NoIs it good choice for big groups? NoIs the parking lot enough to accommodate the customers? No parking lotAround 12:00pm after I found that the St Lawrence market does not open on Mondays, I started to find a good place to have lunch on Old Toronto and I discover the The Corner Place. When we arrived, we could sit on any place because the place was not crowded.The service was friendly and nice and the salad did not take so much time to arrive. But, at least, for me, when I arrive at place where the Wi-Fi is available I like to have access. I tried all the variations provided by the waitress and none worked. On the end, she asked me to look for one of the customers and ask him how they connect. Very bad negative point for me.Overall, the salad was okay. To be true, I prefer the Asian Chicken Sesame salad from Panera Bread. The dried noodle was very hard to eat and most of the salad components were cut in chunks instead of niece pieces to eat with a fork. What makes a mess while you are eating. Well... I did not get excited with the food this time. But I intend to come back here again next time that I visit Toronto, I notice other dishes on the menu that called my attention. 3 2
This is a pretty good Metro. (and Yes, 3 stars is good for a Metro... it's not like we're talking Longo's!)Highlights:- Huge store- Fresh seafood with a wide variety- Excellent meat department- Bakery- Deli- Decent size produce usually well-stocked and fresh fruits and vegetables- Wine rack- Private parking lot- Close to the Beer Store and a gas stationTips:- Stay away from the hot food section and "The Creeper" (see Anton K's Review) 3 4
Don't get me wrong- the food is great! Fresh and tasty and better than any Greek place around. But the service sucks! In all the times we have come here, we have never gotten our food in less than an hour and our order has never been right. Not even once. This place needs some decent wait staff and  to get organized. If it did it could be one of the best restaurants in town. 3 5
I came here yesterday for my first time after wanting to try it out for months. The decor is too die for, so adorable! We got seated right away, I would of preferred the patio, but since it was Valentines Day I was happy we got seated at all without a wait. Our cute and bubbly comes in to greet us and we immediately ask to order the guacamole and she apologizes and says they are out and she should mention they're also out of flour tortillas?! Um, what? Mexican restaurant that doesn't have guac... you would think that would be simple to remake. But, of course maybe they didn't think they'd as busy this weekend being Valentines day and all. The great thing is they have happy hour all day on Sundays and the drinks were amazing and delicious and pretty and anything else you can think of. The food on the other hand was nothing spectacular. I will definitely be back to give them another try when they might be more prepared and not so busy. The place was too cute and I've heard too many great things to not try them out again. 3 5
Eyebrows are done well.  Pedicures ok, nothing that makes you want to tip. (Which I always do) Every time I get my nails done,  they break within the week. Definately need a makeover and might attract a lil less ghetto.  I've seen a fight, and yes they kicked them out,  but I still was annoyed by the yelling. Salon overall needs maintenance and cleaning.  I go because they are a family owned business,  but starting to make the drive just a couple miles away.  Much happier with my busy schedule, and attention in just remembering my name. Customer service is probably the least happiest with in this place. 3 2
Very mixed feelings about this hotel.Location is very close to ASU's tempe campus, so it's convenient if you're visiting ASU. The surrounding city of the hotel is fillllled with methamphetamine addicts. And yes, it is very creepy- and that is coming from a 24 year old male.The customer service INSIDE the hotel was great. The breakfast buffet also tasted good. The hotel rooms are nice, although they only have $5 water available which is annoying and the fridge is LOCKED so you can't store any of your drinks.The reason why I docked 2 stars was not so much the tweakers, as it was the LOUD clunk sound whenever the AC turns off. From what I've heard, this happens in every room.So, if you need to sleep with AC at night (and you will, in the summer) - be SURE to buy or bring ear plugs. It's the only way to get through the night - trust me.... 3 2
Super cool idea and I love the elevaotr... but the regular rooms are meh. For how much I wanted to spend it would have been nice to have something nicer... Still a really pretty hotel and the Titanic meuseum was really cool. 3 4
Amazing customer service, went there with no appointment and they fit myself and 4 of my bridesmaids in to shop for bridesmaids dresses. We had one designer and style in mind that we were hoping for, but unfortunately David's Bridal only carries "David's Bridal" brand gowns/dresses. Beautiful, but slightly disappointing.The bridesmaids dresses and special occasion dresses are all grouped together, so tread lightly before getting attached - as the special occasion frocks are only available as they would be in a retail store, whatever sizes and colours they have, is all they have.Besides those two slight flaws, I would recommend to friends based on the wonderful customer service the ladies working there provided. 3 5
Brio is one of the nicest places in Town Square, especially when you can seat outside. I was there at  least two times a week but recently they reduced the menu and left out some of my favorite meals. So disappointed... 3 4
Nothing special unfortunately. That didn't come to a surprise though. Tiptoeing the line just like every fredricos.. 3 2
Not my favorite place in town . Sorry not sorry #brysontiller Go to famous faces across the street . Not bad just not my favorite . 3 1
Food is good, but does the sushi chef have to drink red wine while making the rolls?  Cleanliness and observation = 5 out of 10.  I left my purse by accident and they didn't see it.  I first called to make sure, and they said "no."  I then go to the restaurant physically, and they say they "still don't see it."  I'm driving back home and a I get a call from them.  They find it under the sushi bar.  Staff is nice, yet I still can't trust them. 3 2
I just went to the Friday night gourmet buffet last week, and that's the 3rd time for me and my husband to be in a bellagio buffet. We had very great food the last 2 times we visited the buffet, so we went again this time we visited vegas. However, we felt disappointed this time as we think the food quality overall was not as good this time.The desserts are all great, but the meat and entree were just ok. And we are meat eaters......so that's why we were disappointed. They did have more variety and meat choices for the gourmet buffet (Fri and Sat only), they had kobe sirloin, grilled quail, prime rib, beef wellington, lamb rack, ostrich, duck breast, etc for the gourmet buffet. However, they are all too bloody raw except beef wellington and ostrich. In the past, usually there would be options to choose from medium rare to medium well, but this time everything is medium rare except beef wellington and ostrich. The chef who was serving lamb rack was nice enough to grill the lamb to the degree that the customer requested, however, the one who served kobe sirloin and prime rib was probably too busy to cater people's requests, so everyone got a piece of raw meat. I passed by many people's table and noticed that they gave up on the raw meat after the rim (usually is more cooked) has been eaten. It's just a big waste of food when they serve meat that is too raw. So in a sense, I like Wynn better for the meat, but the dessert at bellagio buffet is un-beatable. I think if someone is going for a really nice piece of meat, then Wynn is better. If you are all for the desserts, then bellagio is the place to go. But I do feel disappointed at the bellagio buffet when comparing with our past bellagio buffet experience. I've heard that some restaurants quality goes down due to recession....I don't know if bellagio buffet would be one of them....... well....it makes me to think twice whether I wanted to revisit bellagio buffet for future. 3 2
They offer 20% discount via text yet when you attempt to get it they've I it after tax has been added..... that is not right. It should be before tax and the lady at the window says her boss says it has to be after tax because he has to pay tax on the whole bill so it needs to be paid by the customer. How is that good customer service or a discount? Yes it covers the sales tax plus 11 percent... but don't lie and say 20 percent. Food is amazing though and that is why I come back. 3 2
Pretty good. We thought to go check out a place up the block, because it had great yelp reviews. Apparently, so did 500 other people, but they thought quicker. The line was down the block and around the corner, so we walked around and saw an empty table here. Glad we did.I had a salad and juice, boy friend had the special - huevos rancheros with chili verde. I was happy, he liked his but said it wasn't worth what I paid for it. Saw a ton of people with french toast that looked unbelievably good, and the breakfast sandwich croissants looked great too. I won't drive across town for it, but any time I'm in the strip won't mind stopping in for a bite. 3 4
There are a few vegan options here, and they are labelled clearly on the chalkboard near the cashier (though they don't always write everything they're serving on the board). Service was friendly and quick, I ordered the sweet potato and rapini pie, which wasn't as tasty as the dish my friends ordered (the cauliflower and soy protein pie). They have a vegan cheesecake that is phenomenal.It's a cozy little space, and there were a few other folks there when we walked in on Saturday, but it didn't feel too crowded.I'll have to try their coffee next time. 3 4
RA sushi is wonderful. Every waiter/waitress that has ever served me at RA (any of their phoenix metro locations) has been wonderful. They're fantastic at making recommendations on sushi that you might like based on your taste and the drinks there are also great. I have never had anything there that I didn't enjoy. It has a hip and fun atmosphere and it's a great place to go with a group of friends so you can get different flavors of sushi and just split them. The only thing that bothers me sometimes when I'm there is the volume of the music. It could be a little bit quieter just so conversation is easier, but other than that I have no complaints. 4 5
We had the Shrimp Burrito & the Carne Asada Chimichanga special. The special came with rice, re-fried beans and a drink. The food was really good, the chimichanga & the burrito were both large. The rice and re-fried beans are very average so don't get your hopes up. The decor is a combo of cafeteria and take out style, kinda like a "Baja Fresh" remix, but not many people go there for the ambiance. However I will repeat , the main entrees were good. A great value when compared to taco bell or dell taco, we had more than we could eat with drinks and spent less than $17.        :-) 4 3
Four stars for being a godsend. I was so sick of paying $3-5 for a bottle of soda or water. I got my drinks, my snacks, a big Icee, and the $40 limit in cash back (take that, $4.99 ATM fees!), all right in my hotel. Lots of cheap souvenirs, which I might be back for. I can also see this being awesome if you didn't bring enough lotion to avoid skin lizardification from the desert and hotel showers, or maybe some Tums after a night at the buffet. 4 3
I visited this restaurant only a few weeks after returning from Rome, Italy. I was very surprised to find authentic Italian tastes in Old Montreal! Their mushroom risotto was very delicious and and recommended. Our waitress was very friendly and helpful when we were making our dinner decisions. I'd definitely go back for a romantic dinner or when I crave authentic Italian! 4 5
There is really not much to say than a great atmosphere and the most courteous service. One of the most innovative things about it is that you get to order from a tablet other than using pen and paper. The food comes almost instantly. Pro-tip if you ever want to go there. Start of by eating anything that doesn't have any rice otherwise your belly would be already packed. My experience was indeed enjoyable and delectable... 4 5
We've been to Tokoyo lobby twice. Both times were great. I'll start by saying I gave it four stars instead of five because it is small, small, small inside and the ambiance isn't fantastic. But the things you must do for good sushi! I can't recall for certain the name of our favorite roll, but I believe it was the Glendale roll. Deep fried goodness is all I can say! I know, it isn't traditional sushi, but I just can't do raw fish! Nuff said. We tried two other kinds which were good as well, but the deep fried goodness overshadowed the other ones and I have erased them from my memory. The pot stickers were ok, not fabulous. The green tea was great and came in cute little tea pots. I haven't had sake here and I don't know why, since I usually get sake. Guess I'd better head back for some more sake and sushi! 4 3
Great food and drinks. Hate that I always have to make a reservation to eat there, but other than that, great place. 4 5
Went here with a party of 8 for my birthday last year.  We ordered two of the Feast thingy's (All American Feast, I think it's called)...They serve them on a garbage can lid. Comes with ribs, chicken, and brisket or pulled pork, with 2 big sides and cornbread muffins.  Oh, and the fries, that are scattered all over the lid. My god, ALL of the food was good.  The ribs, were delicious fall off the bone, variety, the pulled pork was amazing (I had the pulled pork sandwich for lunch one time as well).  I love the different kinds of bbq sauce.  Their desserts are actually pretty friggin' good as well.  Their bread pudding is diabetic shock, but it's absolutely delicious.  The prices, really aren't that bad, either.  It's about $60 for one of the Feasts, and it really does serve about 5 people.   I've been here 3 times now, and will definitely come back again. 4 5
The service was great. I ordered the Works Scramble and while it was tasty it was a bit heavy on the salty feta. The portions are big. 4 3
One of the most wonderful Thai massages I have received in Toronto. A beautiful space and my therapist was focused, attentive and very effective in relieving some back and neck pain I was having. A truly amazing experience.My *only* complaint is that is seems strange to tip an RMT -- I consider this a medical service, and it makes the price prohibitive for some when you include tax and tip on top of the base price. Otherwise, highly recommended. 4 5
I'm not sure why there are so many negative comments, I had a good experience here.  The main reason I tried this place is because of the location, only being about 5 minutes away from my house.  Christina did my nails, extremely helpful and nice.  She took her time to get me the the exact color I wanted, talked to me and offered me a drink.  I went in an hour before closing and the receptionist was afraid I wouldn't be able to squeeze in a pedicure, but Christina was fast and efficient to make sure I had enough time.  Another woman (I forgot her name :( ) did my pedicure when everyone was already packed up and ready to leave so I really appreciated that.  It seriously was the best pedicure I've ever had, all the tough skin I had on my feet gone.  A lot of people complain about the laziness of the owner, but I didn't see him fooling around.  A nail lady's phone was going off and he was attentive to put her ringer on silent, and sorting through the receipts with the receptionist. Only downside...the owner of the place was there today, and a bit standoffish.  I wouldn't say rude...but not friendly.  He interrupted my pedicure to have the lady check a yelp review (I'm assuming) because it was regarding a complaint and it was in a different language she could understand.  I didn't mind but it seemed unprofessional.  He kind of was staring at me, so I just said hello and he ignored me. :/ I would have given it five stars.  However, I work in an office, and a lot of ladies ask about my nails since I'm constantly working with my hands, and I will recommend this place and Christina! 4 3
While the flood greatly impacted the zoo, it is amazing to hear how they dealt with the flood emergency. Talking to the employees there, you can see how much they care about the animals and how much they love what they do. The new penguin exhibit is lovely. The Africa exhibit is also great. I was lucky enough to be able to do the Behind the Scenes experience with the giraffes, where you get to get up close and personal. Would recommend visiting on a weekday or perhaps in winter, when it won't be quite as busy. On a nice summer weekend day, the crowds can be a little much to handle and take away from the experience. 4 5
One of the best philly cheese steaks I've had.  Have not really had anything else from them, but when I order this is pretty much what I get.  They deliver and that is awesome!  Really great if you are looking for a philly cheesesteak.  They chop the meat up very small and diced though. 4 5
Drive thru for hash browns and OJ. The lady was super efficient, which I loved.I noticed the drive thru line was quickly conquered by the morning team. Great job! 4 5
For high quality and good selection of vinyl, this store certainly has plenty to offer for audiophiles and novices alike. 4 5
Mac and Cheese is super as were the chicken philly and sourdough onion rings! Will come back for sure. 4 5
This place is great! Very delicious food with very great service. Some of the best Indian food I have found in Toronto!! I would do take out though, not a lot of seating and it seems to be where cab drivers hang out. 4 5
I had tried to come here a few years back but they were closed - the hours of operation are quite short and obviously didn't pay attention to it.My girlfriends and I took a quick trip to Vegas all I can say about this place is WOW!  The food and the service were both fantastic!  We ordered soup to start.  Based on the waiter's recommendation, I had the Tom Kha Kai with prawns which was perfectly balanced sour and hot. I like heat, a lot.  The 6 was plenty hot.  For the main dishes, we ordered the Panang Curry, Pad Ped, and Seafood Drunken Noodles to share.  Oh.  My.  God.  Beautiful presentation, so incredibly flavorful, perfect texture, just the right amount of heat (4), absolutely delicious!  My girlfriends and I couldn't stop talking about how enjoyable the meal was.  I will definitely visit again on my next trip! 4 5
So I do check Yelp from time to time, and I made an account today for this place. Just wanted to respond to people saying the ice cream was fake/didn't melt/tasted like "whip" cream.. I had it today, enjoyed it, and yes it did melt and it is only February folks. Saw it was family owned, and the workers there were super nice and very friendly with my daughter, so I just wanted to throw a positive review to counteract the weirdly negative ones.Ice cream was good. There was nothing weird about it. Employees were great. Didn't try the food but I had the Old Fashioned Cherry Amaretto, daughter had a dipped cone, and wife had Butter Pecan (all for about $7). The place is not new (in fact, I remembered having been there when it was a DQ as a kid.. 20 years ago. The windows curve over the last row of tables and it jogged my memory), so I do think a little effort into the atmosphere could help. The best Ice Cream I have ever had was Greater's in KY, so no it wasn't that. But this place is a solid ice cream parlor to take the family. 4 3
Pho Hung has been going downhill in their food/service, so I've been searching for a replacement pho place. (I felt like a cheater for walking in...)I really don't understand the low ratings for Pho Orchid. I had great service and great food. The pho was nice and hot when it arrived and the beansprouts were fresh. The soup was definitely more flavorful than the watered down stuff Pho Hung's been serving. I didn't think the meat was microwaved or old like others did. Springrolls were crispy and perfectly cooked, but I wish they gave me more sauce. They had orange slices in the water (which was a little strange), but it was a hot day so I didn't mind. The food came quickly (under 10 minutes) and the waiter got me extra limes when I requested it. He came back to check on me once and got my my bill when I needed it. Pricing is similar to other pho places, but more expensive than Pho Hung. I don't mind though; enen the small is a huge portion.Sure, this place is in the basement and the windows face the street, but it is definitely not a dump. Everything at least feels clean and the atmosphere is nice (didn't smell a whiff of cigarette smoke) They have their namesake orchids all around too. I've been here twice now and I enjoyed it both times. It's not the best pho ever, but it does a good job. 4 3
Until recently I thought I had found the best cheese curds in town--now that I've tried Tipsy Cow's, I know I have found them! Decent to above average beer selection and friendly staff make this a great place to check out on The Square. 4 5
The 2-storey brick building was very nice, complete with chandeliers. I stopped here before heading to the Cuyahoga trail, which is just down the hill. The food was hot and good. Staff was very friendly and I didn't have to wait long for the food. My only complaint is that the pop machines are behind the counter so it's annoying to have to ask for a refill. I'm from out of state, so perhaps this is normal in Ohio McDonald's. 4 3
Busy holiday weekend, but all the staff from the ticket counter, concessions, and rest room attendants we really nice. Smiling without a hint of annoyance due to working on a holiday weekend with heavy traffic. It would have been a 3 due to smelly restroom but before I left, they were already on it. Service counts a lot.Seats were comfortable with good leg room. 4 3
Food: 4/5Service: 3/5Cleanliness: 3.5/5Price: $$I have a confession to make. I love cake. During my undergrad days, I ate a slice of cake a day. It was my food that allowed me to destress and its delicious taste in my mouth was so addicting. I can proudly admit that I was a regular at Future Bistro over the 5 years I was in Toronto because I was one of those who got their card stamped for every slice of cake that was ordered.My ultimate favourite cake is the Red velvet, but here at Future Bistro, I tend to gravitate towards cakes that I had never tried before. It's better if you go with a few friends or as a group, then you can try many different cakes at once. :P The service at the bistro seems like it can be a little improved; it does get quite busy during peak hours and many things are self serve (cutlery for example).The bistro offers over a dozen different kinds of cakes for you to choose from, not including its pies and other baked goods. I haven't heard one complain about how bad a cake tasted here so I think it's quite safe to go out of your comfort zone and try one that you had never tried before. I tend to gravitate towards cakes that have caramel in them while I'm here.The Super Caramel Crunch is my ultimate favourite at Future Bistro. It is layers of caramel and whipped cream which I absolutely love. Some might think it's a tad bit too sweet, but I beg to differ. It's the perfect amount of sweetness for me and I can (sometimes) finish this thing before you get to take a bite. It's quite light and fluffy compared to other denser cakes, so if you're a bit too full from that dinner you just had or want something less filling, this might be a good choice.If you go to U of T, chances are you have probably walked past this bistro many times. The bistro opens their windows for the summer and has a great patio outside for you to enjoy. Not only do they serve great desserts, the bistro has great tapas and drinks to share with your friends as well! It really is a great place to end your night whether you get something sweet or savoury (or both). I would highly recommend you to visit if you love cake like me or want to end your night at a nice bistro with lots of locals! 4 5
There were so many people and the line was long so we decided to do take out. The food was good and very filling. The only downside is that it only accepts cash and if you don't have Canadian dollar and want to pay with US dollar, they do almost 1:1. The food was $28 Canadian dollar and the lady at the cashier asked me to pay $26 US dollar.(which is $32 Canadian dollar) 4 2
So a good friend and myself decided to eat out today while on break from class. I remember her telling me once that she had never eaten at a Panda before so I recommended we eat at the one near campus. She agreed. I had anticipated that there would be 1 or 2 people in front of us ordering their food.Was I right?NoThis restaurant was dead. Absolutely dead, no one except those working there was there. I gave it a 4 because of that. Overall, as always I love the food. But being today was a religious holiday I couldn't eat certain foods. that was the only down side but nothing that would bring me down or stop me from eating panda. 4 3
Small but good facility.Wewent pretty late on a Saturday , but they still entertained us and kept the facilities open for as long as we needed. 4 3
If you can handle a 1-2hr wait for a 'bay', then it's all worth it as long as you know what to expect.  We ended up waiting about 90 minutes on a Friday afternoon in the middle of spring training - had plenty of drinks and food at the bar.Basically Top Golf is golf's version of bowling.  You get a couch, a waitress and a TV.  Then you can play a variety of games with your friends ... there are computer chips in each ball so the system knows where your shot goes.  You can make it as serious or non-serious as you'd like.  The scoring itself is a bit gimmicky - if you make one shot, the next is worth double etc.  Sometimes the chips in the balls don't register your score even though the shots go in a net (happened at least 6 times in 2 hours for us)  - We had a bay on the 3rd floor, and from that high up, even if you shank a shot, it usually manages to roll in to some kind of net for points.  So, if you're a terrible golfer, go higher up!All in all, we had a good time.  If you are in a casual group and have inexperienced golfers, then this place is great.  If you are a hard-core golfer, then it's probably better to just go out an play one of the dozens of courses in the area. 4 3
this place has legit mexican fare, the burritos were great and tostadas were excellent too, I highly recommened this place over say a chain place like chipotle or taco del mar 4 5
$1.50 TACOS!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Yum!This place was recommended to us by a local. We asked where to get a good cheap taco and this place hit the nail on the head. Two hippies are on the right track with this place. It's a bit small and it took about 20 min to get my food (they were really busy) but it was worth it. If I lived in Phoenix I would come here daily. A word about the fish tacos...they are good but seem as though they might use canned fish instead of fresh grilled chunks like most places. Considering the price this is acceptable!The drinks and baked goods looked great though I haven't yet tried any. I'll save those for next time I'm in town. 4 3
Those yuca fries ... absolutely delicious with the dip.Actual chicken is also very good, especially when combined with their sauces. They have daily deals as well which I suggest trying. 4 5
I joined this gym after leaving Fitness 1. This gym isn't perfect but is as close to perfect as I could ask for. I like the long hours the gym provides for daycare. And daycare will change dirty diapers!!! And for the most part I really do like the gym daycare employees (except I had an experience where the daycare manager was extremely rude, but I forgave that one instance because I figured she was having a bad day).I also enjoy the towel service. & The equipment is great. The classes seem great though I have yet to attend a class. But I wish the gym would add free wifi for members to use while working out (so that I can watch netflix while working out), add some more channels to the equipment's tvs (I wish they would add e, bravo, mtv) and add a laundry shoot for towels inside the locker rooms. I even put in a request for the laundry shoot but Mountainside obviously just ignored my request. I also wish this location & all other locations would have a water service that they provide in their Scottsdale location. It seems like the west valley is constantly getting the short end of the stick and this is another example of that isn't it? & might be wrong but I think the Scottsdale location also has better tv channels than the Surprise gym does.But despite those gripes I'm still a fan. This is the best gym in Surprise. 4 2
This past week was only my third time playing in a tournament, so I have few points of reference (only the MGM if you must know). Right now the price is $125 for $8,000 in chips. As I said in my quick tip: comfy chairs. They also lean back quiet a ways too, that caught me by surprise.All of dealers were nice. All of them! They were professional and made small talk sometimes and happily greeted the regulars. I thought it was a good poker crowd. It seemed like everyone was there to enjoy themselves.My only con was I was at table 7, which was in the corner and we were constantly neglected by the cocktail waitress. I only wanted a water every now and then, but some people at our table were getting really irritated by the fact that she wouldn't come by. Our dealer had to yell at her at one point. Four hours later and with 18 out of 80 players left, another player and I went all in...I lost on the river, teehee. Good times though.Also, some well known players were there. That guy won 1.6 million last week? The big guy with the beard. He was one of them. IDK who he is, but a lot of the people at my table were excited to see him. That's all. 4 3
Very cool place..and concept.  I loved that I could play digital Connect Four at the bar while eating and drinking!It's not cheap by any means, but considering how big the rolls and sashimi is..it's well worth it.  What we ate there would have cost $200 in NYC so I considerate it a deal.Downside:  very packed and some of the staff were snobby.Upside:  The food outweighed the snobby staff..haha 4 3
I went to Bingo Monday's and had a great time with friends. The lamb sliders are AMAZING! Love the outdoor seating. I would definitely recommend this place if you need something fun to do on a Monday night. 4 5
Nearly everything about this place is perfect - I love the high quality of the produce, the uniqueness of their health & beauty area, THE BULK BINS, the constant introduction of new items and willingness to order former ones... I could go on all day. They are out of my budget for full grocery shopping, but a fun regular stop for special treats and items I can't buy (vegan choc chip cookies) or won't buy (cilantro, green onions) at Woodmans (srsly woodman's cilantro is practically composted, gross). However, and what I'm docking a star for, is the inconsistent level of service from the staff. Some people are terrific and so willing to stop and see if you need help, or are just generally pleasant - especially the folks working the front desk, bulk, deli/juice bar areas. Others - almost always cashiers - seem so bothered to be there! Sorry I'm buying stuff, sorry I said Hi and asked how your day was going, sorry I said sure I'll CHIP and yes I'd like a receipt, sorry I forgot and left the unused fork and napkin on top of my box of hot food when I put it on the belt and you had to ask me to remove it. SORRY, ok??? Stop glaring at me, stop wrinkling your nose at what I'm buying, stop rolling your eyes when everything doesn't fit into my cloth bag and I have to ask for a paper one. I still love the stores, I will continue to shop there forever, but I do hope that they'll either hire friendlier cashiers or add in some self-check lanes. 4 2
I've been here on several occasions. The food is always so yummy. I like to get The Over Easy. So flavorful. The french toast is amazing (both versions), and to top it all off, they have FRESH SQUEEZED OJ!! Omg. I love fresh juice (This also makes for excellent mimosas). The ambiance is nice and casual. They play great music and if you can avoid their busy hour, the wait is never long. I've felt unsure about the service in the past, but had a great experience the last time. Wish I could remember the servers name, but he was very attentive. Overall, definitely recommend for breakfast/brunch 4 5
I  like this store, I am not much of a thrift store person but I like the vintage stuff in this store, some stuff is overpriced, some is under.. but I like it. 4 3
Ordered a large sausage pepperoni for pick up, ready in 25, pretty good, nothing to write to grandma about, but no complaints. 5/5 will be back 4 3
I don't understand why this restaurant has such bad reviews. I live next door so I pick up food fairly often. Everything I've tried has been really tasty. (General Tao, shrimp in lobster sauce, noodles, sushi...) 4 3
Went here after playing golf with some friends.  A friend used to go there with his dad.  I was pleasantly surprised and will be back again.   The beer mugs were super ice cold!!!   I would describe it as a traditional Mariscos place that I would frequent on special occasions growing up in Mexico.   By no means is it fancy but it is clean and service is good.   I had the ceviche and mixed tostadas were very good!  With an ice cold beer... does not get any better.   Will be the new place after golf. 4 3
While in the end we did not purchase an Audi, we had a great experience at this dealership. Our sales associate Ben was knowledgeable, friendly, and enthusiastic about the product. I didn't feel pressured during the process and he was more than willing to answer any and all questions/concerns via email and phone. If you're in the market for an Audi definitely check out Audi of Mississauga. 4 5
My husband & I were in Vegas last week (9/8-9/11) and we had dinner at this restaurant Friday night. This is one of the restaurants inside Wynnhttp://www.wynnlasvegas.com/#dining/bartolotta/The staff was really nice and we were seated right away even though we did not have a reservation. Their specialty is seafood - most of which flown in daily, majority from Italy and the mediterranean.  They show you the fish cart (fresh of course on ice)-explain where it came from, how they cook it, etc. They also have very good bread - 5 kinds that they serve you prior to your meal order.  If you want a sommelier to help you select your wine, he's there also.  We ordered a pretty good size fish (from Italy) white meat, tender and when it arrived, served table-side:  removed the bones and served it with the richest and smoothest mashed potatoes and fresh, sauteed vegetables.  We had appetizers also prior our meal and both fantastic. The dessert was equally wonderful! I should have taken photos with my iphone so you can see how beautiful they present their food.This is definitely a place we will go back to when in Vegas - the prices are reasonable.Great food and great service - that's a winner in my book! 4 5
Delicious! Seriously never had a better breakfast. The only reason it isn't 5 stars is because the female server was rude and abrupt. I noticed the other staff members were extremely friendly, but she was not. 4 3
I can honestly say Yay! I'm a fan.  The food is various and tasty.  The portions are correct, and priced accordingly.  I do find the 59 Cents for the soup mix-ins is a little pricy, but the soup doesn't need anything.  I think I may be cheating on my husband with the Thai Lobster Curry soup.If I could change anything, it would be for the staff to just chill out.  When I go, I have someone open the door for me, ask me if I need a menu, then the salad person is all chipper, etc.  Really.  Please chill.  You're freaking me out, man. 4 3
Their turkey club croissant is amazing. Such a good lunch stop! 4 5
777 is all you need to know when visiting Mr. Lucky's.I had heard from a friend about this off the menu deal that gave me a steak, 3 shrimp skewers, and some mashed potatoes, BOMB.com for the $7.77 price tag.  AND there's nothing a little A1 and ketchup couldn't fix. For what it is, I can't complain.  You get a whole lotta bang for not a lotta bucks.   I say you pocket the savings and go help support the local dance bars, win win for all. 4 1
Go here now.Sit at the bar.Don't look at the menu.Order the fish tacos.Enough said, great quality, reasonable price, for an airport, one of the best I've had anywhere in NA. 4 5
Busy place, but they took me rather quickly and the lady did a great job on my pedicure 4 5
Food was great and beer selection was alright. Great place to watch the Panthers game. 4 3
This place is an absolute gem of the bar scene in toronto. Incredibly hip and minimalist, with an almost claustrophobic atmosphere when full. That tight feeling however makes it feel warm and cozy, and with the dim lighting and walls adorned with signs and knick knacks this places charm has fully won me over. It takes some time to get your pint refilled, but the wait is worth it, with a sincerely eclectic lineup of both microbrews and classics. Hit up the atm, squeeze through the crowd, and sip down some tasty suds....this place cannot be missed 4 5
The Lizard's management appears consistently to value the benefits is keeping their draft beer lines pristinely clean - that and their attitude towards reasonably priced draft beer specials will keep any aficionado supremely happy. If you're a beer fan in general the more than 100 bottle list will keep you fluid. Food wise, the burgers are the best around at the price; wings are NOT up to Anchor Bar in Buffalo standard by any imaginative stretch, but locally, again, are hard to beat. As a plus, the service staff is the most professional in this class of restaurant you're likely to find anywhere and aside from the to be expected occasional malcontents a great group of actual professionals. Enjoy!By the way, the current manager, Kevin, obviously beloved by his staff, is either moving on to better and better venues or the top management of the L understands his professionalism and is clearly promoting him!!! 4 5
The pho here is so good.  I wonder how I've never came across this place.  The pho broth here is on point.  Not to heavily salty and just the perfect amount of sweetness.  Service isn't the greatest but it's not terrible. 4 3
4 stars for the family meal, if you get it on a good night (3 large entree, 1 lrg fried rice, 1 lrg white rice, 4 egg roll, 4 crab puff $24.00) .We've eaten here maybe 10 times, the last visit was last month. That order was the best one yet, I actually think I got the owner's order or CE saw their Yelp reviews and fixed the problems.Anyway... I think I got the owner's order because the broccoli beef was mostly beef and only 3 broccoli, usually it's the other way around. I'm a huge broccoli fan so I never complained, but was in total shock when I opened the paper box.The fried rice had egg in it..... what???? I've been here how many times and this is the first time egg ever slipped into the fried rice haha. Lastly, they are coupon nazi's, they don't care if you are GOD himself, if you don't have the coupon you ain't getting the deal. 4 3
had dinner there - ordered the international sampler and thought it was good but i wish i just ordered one thing. i didn't love the hummus so much, but the italian (lasagna?) was quite delicious! i noticed on the smoothie/juice menu that you can add honey or bee pollen, which isn't vegan. ok ok, i'm not vegan either, but i used to be and the mixed messages bother me! :) that said, it was good and probably the healthiest option in this crazy town of all you can eat fattening buffets. 4 3
My friend and I just had a lovely lunch in the courtyard. The tuna nicoise salad was very good- nicely presented, fresh veggies, perfectly cooked tuna. Joe, the affable, warm and friendly young waiter was very accommodating when I asked to have one of the grilled chicken sandwiches served on a bed of salad instead of focaccia. While I would have liked more seasoning, that's just a personal preference. And the freshly brewed ice tea is very refreshing and tasty. Kathy, the owner, was very welcoming and told us all about her story, and her daughter Emily. We will definitely be coming back and bringing our husbands. A must try for a casual breakfast or lunch if you live in north Scottsdale and wondering where to go. We wish Kathy all the best in her new endeavor. 4 5
Ditto everything Sam G. said about the food, and want to add that my in-laws constantly rave about the veal sandwich.  Also want to mention the coffee is really wonderful.  Best latte in Queen West (and goodness knows there's a lot of competition).  It's a great neighborhood spot, with lots of cab drivers, families with kids, older Portuguese gentlemen watching football.  It's family-run and the family and the whole staff are lovely.  They have a high chair and super clean bathrooms (though no changing table). 4 5
Had the best banana waffles there. Serving was huuuge, and coctails were tasty as well. 4 5
Great Show.  My 7 year old also loved it and got most of the shows.  There are some adult innuendos that made it fun for the adults as well.The magic was old fashioned but still amazing.We got free tickets (with a purchase of a drink) after we went to the Grand Canyon through Viator. 4 5
That is not so bad as people complains. The air crew are nice and friendly. Please pre-arrange your check in and pay the luggage. Otherwise I didn't see any issues. Even it's very easy and efficient to get your checked luggage. The landing is better than the virgin airline. I didn't see this air company so "cheap" so described by those unhappy customers. I would recommend this airline company. 4 2
This is not my closest grocery store but it's my favorite to go to.  I like that they carry everything that I typically need, I find other locations don't carry everything and I have to go to other stores to finish my shopping.I do not like the new bakery though....this isn't totally bad since the baked good section no longer tempts me which is all in all better for my waistline:) 4 3
Always pretty good food! Great price. Awesome hot sauce. Love the traditional portuguese food! 4 5
The menu is classic Chinese restaurant; the food on the menu is authentic; and the staff here knows it. The menu is packed with stuff that if your mom didn't make it, you probably have no idea what is actually coming with the [insert meat here.] This place is great for a group (the larger the better) and even better if you are with others who enjoy Chinese food (make some Chinese friends if possible!).If you are going to a Chinese restaurant for the first time and this is the one you have stumbled upon it may be a little difficult to appreciate a gem like Fugu. You are not really supposed to eat the food and think: "omg, this was like the totally best thing I have ever eaten." You are not supposed to order something that you like and you are not supposed to order something for yourself. You order things that your friends like and you order a lot (more than you could possibly imagine eating). You eat a little bit of everything (you share!). And you focus on spending the meal with your mates and not with the food (talk!). Make sure you eat like a pig though because it is good to be bold towards food. At the end you have a great dining experience and a memory you can share with good friends for a long time. 4 5
The called themselves "The healthiest frozen yogurt in America..." Can't confirm that, but it's very tasty and light. The Spicy Mango is wonderful. At first, I thought it was strange but it was yummy and tingly. Disneyland dole whip is also delish. 4 5
So i just got married on 7-15-16 on the terrace gazebo. It was absolutely beautiful for a small intimate wedding. Staff was great, everyone was very helpful and seems genuinely happy for you. I booked a reservation for a ceremony over the phone and i was told on the spot what times were available that day. I took the 930pm which was perfect for us cuz it was not too hot outside. Now i live in LA and didnt come down till 4am the morning of the wedding. So naturally all my planning was via email and or phone calls. Everything still came out beautiful and exactly the way we planned it.I didnt wanna pay over $95 for just 4 pictures so i chose the normal $299 package with no added photos.Day of i was assigned my own photographer.Now my photographer Roger was great! He took great poses and was very sweet.  He even offered to take poses we personally wanted. He took over 170 pictures.The next day when i went to see my pictures i was thrilled!! It was so amazing i nearly cried. And nearly cried again once we saw how much the pictures are.  Now luckily my husband is the sweetest man in the world and payed over $ 700 so we can keep all our shots.So my suggestion is to all u lovely couples, when choosing ur packages do not worry about a package with pictures. DO NOT ADD a photo session because ur photographer will take pictures for u anyways and the packages u are offered once u see all your pictures will be completely different But i couldnt be happier. Truely it was amazing 4 5
Can I say milkshakes to die for!!!  SOOO many choices and an awesome vibe!! We both were happy with our meals, offbeat takes on classic diner foods. 4 5
We went to Harlem on July 6th for Summerlicious Lunch.   This place has character, its comfortable, with a very cozy feel.  Great atmosphere, Great food. The service was great. The server was very engaging and genuinely nice and attentive. We had the Catfish sandwich and the vegetarian curry with coconut rice and for desert the Plaintain in brown sugar caramel sauce. (very delectable a definite must have). I would recommend this venue. It is a delightful experience 4 5
I just had my first cevapi meal here and cannot believe I have been missing this place!  I am always on the look out for these places with my Serb husband, so discovering RM was a treat. Cevapi are delicious, and so were the spreads (kajmak and urnebes). I don't think they are trying to compete with places like Southstreet or Hero as it is a Slavic restaurant, but that being said I will take a burger from Royal Meats any day.  It's authentic and tasty Serbian grill.As for the service, which people seem to complain about, it really is a cultural thing.  Eastern Euros just don't do the fake pleasantries many of us westerners are used to.  If super friendliness is what you're after with your burger, go to Southstreet and revel in having a smiling 19 year old slather guacamole on your whole wheat burger. 4 5
So I love Bomberos. I like the fire pit, and the trees, and the decor. But the thing I love the most is the atun escabeche(sp). Salty, sweet, and delicious.  As a side note, my 7 year old daughter loves to come here to hang out and read, apparently Junie B. Jones books fit in really well with the ham and cheese sandwich. I highly recommend it. 4 5
This was some of the best Mediterranean "fast" food I've ever had in the West. Casual atmosphere, friendly staff, convenient. Ask for a sampler of their sauces. 4 5
I can say that is one of my favourite burger. It's simple maded but delicous. Grilled Cheese menns two slices of melted American cheese, spread with onions on a freshly baked bun is one of the secret menu. Marvelous! You also can order a double cheeseburger... 4 5
At first I was a little confused with how the place was set up, where to order what I wanted. The staff was okay, chatting with each other while I looked around. Finally a cook explained the set up. I had the vegetarian tacos and my boyfriend had chicken tacos. Flavors were good. salsa bar was overwhelming, I wish they would label the 8 different salsa. Mexican corn was beyond good. Dj playing in the corner on Saturday night was a great surprise.  Planning on coming back again. 4 3
Filet sliders - goodTomato soup & Brie sandwhich - mehSurf & Turf (shrimp, chorizo & tomato) covered in a salsa verse - excellente 4 3
I've never had a bad meal here.  And while I wouldn't say I've had a mind-blowingly great meal here, everything I've had has been a well-executed, slightly-upscale take on the "supper club" food I grew up with.  Well, one exception on that "mind-blowing" thing - the fried cheese curds are amazing. It's a feat to elevate something as heavy as fried cheese to a crispy, transcendent little morsel, but they do an excellent job (and offer a wide variety of tasty dipping sauces.  I prefer the smoked paprika).Breakfast, lunch, dinner - always solid, always delicious.   Breakfast/brunch here is a hidden gem - fresh scrambled eggs, house-cured smoked salmon, granola with Door county cherries, and other takes on brunchy classics make appearances, and there's even a few actual good options for vegetarians.I've always had fresh ingredients, excellent preparation and seasoning, generous but not overwhelming portions.  Oh, and they have one of the better Friday fish fries in town, especially the walleye.  I've heard their Saturday prime rib is delicious, too, but I've never actually been able to get a table on a Saturday night to try it.And therein lies the restaurant's main problem.  The Old Fashioned is a victim of its own success.  Even after the expansion into the old L'Etoile space, the restaurant is seemingly always uncomfortably crowded, loud, and the waits for a table are often unreasonably long.  If you do choose to wait, you can either pack into the bar area, stand outside, or try to cram yourself into the tiny vestibule.  It's not really something they can do terribly much about (although I do wish I didn't feel like I was running a gauntlet past the bar to get to the restrooms), but it is uncomfortable enough that when they say "it'll be about an hour wait for a table" I usually go elsewhere. 4 3
I've been to this firehouse a few times recently and have been pretty pleased. The first few times the service has been a bit slow and lacking personality. However I took my wife with me this last visit and there was a bar tender with a broken foot who had us almost in tears from laughing so hard. There were a few older gentlemen a few seats down from us and she was joking with them and chatting about their family and her kids. This bar now seems to be more of a local place to hang out with good company rather than a typical sports bar that you just go to from time to time.  If there were a better selection of craft beers the firehouse would have 5 stars easily!  Not even a decent IPA! The bartender was knowledgeable about beer however the bar had nothing good to offer.  We were  also introduced to the eli steak which was delicious! It is not on the menu, which makes no sense to us but we will be back for it! 4 3
This is one of Las Vegas' hidden gems.  Unfortunately it's become well known (which is why I didn't give it 5 stars).The deep fried whole lobster is nothing short of incredible.  Definitely my favorite Thai Food in Las Vegas 4 5
I get take out there 3 or 4 times a month every month  since the store opened a couple of years ago.  I've never had a bad sandwich and never met an unplesant employee.  Clean & polite & decent prices. 4 2
I've been at this location a few times. Great food. The servers are okay---not great. But I just wish the place was bigger. Sometimes you can't get a table to get some dinner. 4 3
This is the some of the yummiest Chinese food I've had since moving to AZ, and absolutely the yummiest Chinese delivery I have had since moving here.  I've only found three or four places total that have delivered, and all of them have been mediocre or worse, except for Asia Lee.  Everything I've gotten from them is delicious; last time I ordered Szechuan Beef, Pork Egg Foo Yung, and the free Chicken Fried Rice that comes with any order of $15 or more.  I wasn't a huge fan of the pork that came with the Egg Foo Yung, but the egg patties themselves are savory and delightful.  The Szechuan Beef is my absolute favorite, and it made a great lunch when I reheated it the next day, as welll.  I've never been inside the restaurant, so I can't vouch either way for the last review, but honestly, why would I go to the restaurant when I can have all the yumminess delivered right to my door? 4 5
The family and I have gone for the 'pumpkin patch' the last 3 years (we don't get live Christmas trees).  Great pumpkin selection, reasonable prices.  Wish they had a few more food vendors due to family food allergies.  Definitely enjoy going and making great family memories. 4 5
We were there in the afternoon and the place was pretty empty but the food was excellent we ordered the Korean BBQ combo for 2-3 people and it was plenty of food for us, I would say it feeds 4 people. We ordered spring rolls and dumplings as appetizers and it was really good. I highly recommend this place. 4 5
Food was def on point! Got fried whiting, greens and mac and cheese! The greens and the fish stood out the most! Mac and cheese good but not great!! Greens were seasoned to perfection with a perfect hit of sweetness. Fish was rather thin in my opinion but seasoned pretty well....Their whiting is a joke compared to Mert's!! Nevertheless food was good and I will definately be back when Im back in the area!! 4 3
We had heard of Buldogis from fellow yelper Anthony S, but had never made it out there because it was so far from where we live. One random day, Kalila and I found ourselves on that side of town and took advantage of it by finally trying this place out.My favorite food is hot dogs, so I definitely had high standards and high expectations.I ordered the beef buldogi dog and kaliia had the banh mi dog. We also got the chicken wings with a side of asian ginger sauce.The beef bulgogi dog was very delicious and flavorful. The meat was tender. The bulgogi mayo was a great compliment to the hot dog.Kalila's banh mi dog was really good as well. The sriracha mayo was perfect for her. Not too spicy and not too mayo-y. The pork belly and banh mi slaw worked well with the hot dog.The hot dogs themselves are thick and juicy. Each hot dog is really loaded up with its' toppings so you get your money's worth... if not more.The chicken wings were not anything special. I was looking forward to the asian ginger sauce being something similar to the asian zing sauce at buffalo wild wings, but it wasn't even close. The asian ginger sauce was more like an oil and you could barely even taste it. Somewhat of a disappointment since their hot dogs were so good that the same amazement couldn't transfer over to the chicken wings, but it's ok. You're not really ever going to go to bulDOGis for chicken wings. You will go and get hooked on their amazing hot dogs.I just couldn't resist another hot dog. I then ordered the buckeye dog. The corn relish was the business. The bacon was crispy. It was awesome all around.They have a large menu and plenty more foods to try.Aside from the menu behind the counter, they have an additional menu of specials written on a chalkboard wall to the left.There are clean restrooms inside (separate men & women, individual use).They have 2 tv's and if you ask for the remote, they will allow you to change the channel. We watched the rebels lose to SDSU. Our stomachs were happy, but we left heartbroken.MUST TRY THIS PLACE. 4 3
I don't even remember why we decided to go here...but we did and it was a hit w/ the out of town friends.  We came here twice with friends & family from Chicago and Arizona.  They were very impressed w/ the place!!  The price is alright.  But, would I pay $30+ to hang out and freeze my butt for fun...no I would not.  You get black fury boots, thin gloves, jacket and 2 drink tickets.  When I first walked in, I was really impressed.  It was bright, had a bar, bar counters and seats.  After a while, it gets cold.  And the music they play is not the kind I really listen to...I believe it's house music?   Overall it was a good experience...a must see in Vegas.  We would definitely come back to show more friends from out-of-town...only because it's different. 4 3
My wife and I were eager to try this restaurant having just finished a five year stint in Washington DC where we became big fans of Chef Jose Andres.  China Poblano didn't disappoint.We sat at the Dim Sum/Noodle Bar (there's also a Taco Bar as well as regular dining tables) overlooking chefs meticulously preparing different dim sum dishes.  My wife ordered a margarita, which comes topped with a salt foam in lieu of the traditional salt-rimmed glass, while I ordered a Singapore Sling.  Both were quite tasty.While we looked over the unique menu we ordered up some lengua tacos (don't knock 'em until you try 'em), which were one of our favorites at Oyamel (a Jose Andres restaurant in DC).  The tacos were as delicious as we remembered them.Meanwhile, the dim sum chefs in front of us inspired us to try some lamb pot stickers which had a nice flavor highlighted by some cumin and other seasonings.  A gentleman next to us was eating some type of Chinese sandwich which looked and smelt fantastic. We decided to get one for ourselves to see if it tasted as good as it looked.  Sure enough, the Rou Jia Mo sandwich was simply awesome.  My wife and I agreed that it would make a great late night snack...especially if you had a few drinks.The one downside about most of the dishes at China Poblano is their size.  If you go on an empty stomach, plan on ordering a few dishes.  Of course, that also means you get to try more dishes which is something I can live with.Now that my wife and I are based on the West Coast we go to Vegas often, and now that Jose Andres has a great place like China Poblano here I'm guessing we'll be frequent visitors. 4 5
I first heard about this place from Cleveland Magazine's 2010 edition that focused on Cleveland's best diners.  We decided to check it out on a Saturday morning at about 10 a.m. The address is on Lorain, but consider parking on a side street to avoid the metered spaces out in front of the restaurant.  We parked on the north side of Lorain, because it seemed to be a slightly better neighborhood than on the south side, and only had to walk a quarter of a block to the front door.We were lucky when we got there, because there was just one open table and it was a two-top. Actually there seemed to be a charmed quality to the morning, because the place was continually full, but it seemed like every time a party walked in, one of the tables would finish up and leave ... no one ever seemed to wait more than 2-3 minutes before they got a table.The ambiance of the place was interesting.  As for the decor, it looked a little schizophrenic.  One side of the restaurant is sort of an industrial-80s homage, while the other side is a neo-graffiti mural of a Japanese-style monster attacking Cleveland.  It almost seemed like there were two owners who each got to choose the decoration for their side of the room.  The crowd was incredibly diverse for Cleveland.  There were a few families with kids, while at another table there were a group of bikers, and at another was a table of gentlemen of three different ethnicities. It was a mix of different races, economic groups, ages, and social statuses.The service was pretty quick.  We had a very attentive waitress who welcomed us and informed us that the restaurant had been in the newspaper that morning, and told us that she'd bring us the article to read.  We found this charming, although we didn't really care so much about reading the review.The menu is extensive and the prices are surprisingly low.  We took advantage of the the economical options to try out a few extra dishes.I ordered the "Three Eggs with Two Sausage patties, hashbrowns andtoast" for only $4. I also ordered a side of three pancakes FOR $3.50.My partner got the "buiscuits and gravy" which came with three eggs, and hashbrowns, for $5. He also got a side of corned beef hash for $2.50.Overall the food was just fine; it's exactly what you expect from breakfast food at a diner. My critique is that nothing was extraordinary.  The eggs were done very well.  Mine were scrambled, and were fluffy, without being too moist or too dry.  My partner had his over easy, and they were perfection.  The pancakes were light and very hot, which made them perfect for soaking up the butter.  There were a few minor disappointments though. The hashbrowns were mushy, without any real crust to them.  I think they were frozen potato strips that were kept on the griddle for too long without enough oil to make them crisp.The gravy for the biscuits was a little underwhelming, and may have come ready made.  The corned beef hash also seemed like it was from a can. Again, it tasted okay, but these are simple dishes that can be done easily and well from scratch.I mentioned before that the waitress was very attentive; unfortunately, the kitchen was a somewhat slow.  Despite the delay, the waitress did an amazing job of keeping our coffee full, and letting us know about where things stood in the kitchen.  While we would have liked our food about 10 minutes sooner than we got it, the customer service more than made up for the delay, and she waitress could hardy have done a better job of making sure we knew we had not been forgotten.Overall we really enjoyed our meal and will definitely be back. 4 3
I had a chicken caesar wrap, the wrap was a green one denoting it was spinach. A pretty standard green flour tortilla wrap, but the contents were certainly worth the money. They load the wrap with real chicken breast meat that appears to be cut off a rotisserie chicken! It's very good along with the fresh romaine, and shredded asiago (?) Cheese stuffed inside. It was rolled nice & tight so it wasn't messy at all. My only gripe would be that they need to add more Caesar dressing or make the chicken more moist. I mean, it is loaded with chicken but the breast meat can be a bit dry. All in all, would def go back to to get a Wrap, or their pot pie-heard it was to die for good :) 4 3
Had salmon Benedict which was pretty tasty and the side potatoes were great.  The real surprise was was the fruit bowl that came with breakfast - best I've ever had! 4 5
For a discount sushi restaurant, this fits the bill! They give generous portions and their soup and house salad is good. Their salad dressing is just the right combination of soy and sesame - very addictive - I am trying to replicate the recipe at home. The service is average to slow, but never intentional rudeness that I have experienced - more that they are overrun with fewer servers than they should have... but if you need something - just ask for it. I like their teriyaki bento boxes, and the S7 lunch special - spicy honour roll & unagi roll. 4 3
First let me say, we ended up here after leaving another resort that did not meet our expectations. One step inside the front doors of this place and you know it's going to be a wonderful stay. All I have to say is you get what you pay for. Resort has absolutely stunning grounds and 10 pools! How can you not love that. Very nice Adult only pool with bar and grotto. The other pools with kids were still very nice and I found all of the kids to be well behaved. There were not tons of them as this is mostly an adult place anyway. Did I mention the grounds were stunning...we paid for a room with a garden view and it was worth it. I just loved sitting on our balcony taking in the view. Only weird part is that you share a balcony with the room next door which I did not like and proved to be a problem later on. Ate at SWB, food was good, prices were in line with resort fare I guess. Enjoyed the martinis at Cafe Due. Didn't have a chance to try Alto, though I hear it's out of this world. Live music was wonderful, I really enjoyed the Falmenco on Saturday night. Staff was always very polite, although poolside service is incredibly slow and the drinks are not that strong. For $9 solo cup pina colada I'd like a little rum please....I'm just saying. Back to the balcony issue. Our neighbors decide to have a large get together with their patio door open....this meant I could hear everything...I'd had fantasies about smothering the loud cackling woman who was keeping me awake with a pillow. By 1:15 am I had had enough and had to call the front desk. They said they had a "no tolerance" policy and would send security up. 30 minutes later no relief and no security in sight...I think I just finally passed out. The only other downside were the beds. Very uncomfortable and had a spring in my back all night. For the life of me I don't understand why hotels have to be this way. You pay a high price, you offer 5-star dining, you have the word "resort" in your name..lets find a way to put in comfortable matresses....mkay? Would have given them 5-stars if not for the issues listed above. 4 3
This small Pizza Restaurant in Parkdale is one of the favorites amongst my friends.  I have only had the pizza there and it is delicious.  It is served on a raised pizza serving tray and is cheesey and authentic.  In the summer the back patio is great. Be sure to check out the photos of the staff from 30 years ago! 4 5
Love love love it..... Al pastor is bomb not huge on the ground beef empanadas are life.... Over all great 4 5
I ordered rangoons and Pad Thai for delivery through grub hub. My order arrived in about half the predicted time--score! The rangoons were a bit too cream cheesy for my taste, but the Pad Thai was mmm-mmm good. The only thing is that I'd probably order the spiciest rather than medium-spicy, since I'm a chili head. Overall, two thumbs up: the feel-good restaurant of the year. 4 3
Pizza is terrific, perfect combination of sauce, cheese and toppings. Beer is real cheap and bar is non smoking. Haven't eaten much other than pizza. Not impressed with hoagies, but i'll stick with getting their pizza and beer. Defiantly will return/ 4 5
Get the cheese! Get the cheese! Get the cheese! I could come here just for that! Otherwise the wine selection is great (obviously a lot of French wines). The salmon and lentil dish I've had was prepared really well. The service could use a smidge of help though- I feel like it could be better or maybe the two servers I've had at different times were having off days. Otherwise it's not just a perfect date spot, it's a perfect any occasion spot! 4 3
this place is great. came here about twice now. food is exceptional. i got the nachos and some friends got very different entrees. i am a nacho fan and these nacho were really good. not to mention the size of these things. i love the rainbow sugar they have. i think i consumed a bit too much. the second time i tried this place. it seemed like the prices went up and the portion size got smaller. probably the only reason why i have not gone back. oh wells, this place is good. would recommend for first timers. its a fun place to be. 4 5
The staff was excellent across the board.  Helpful and knowledgeable with none of the grumpiness you might expect from people who sit behind bullet-proof glass and help people navigate through complicated exercises in paperwork.I am American and was going to file a Consular Report of Birth Abroad.  Your experience may be different if you are going to apply for a visa to visit the U.S. The line was definitely longer for visas, and as one reviewer notes, if it's busy you may very well spend time waiting outside.A couple of things could be improved:1. The list of things you can't bring inside that's posted on the web site is different from the one posted outside the building where you get in line.  The web site specifically says no cell phones, but in fact they will allow you to check a cell phone at security and pick it up when you're done.  The web site doesn't say anything about large purses or backpacks, but the sign outside says they are prohibited (although they did let me bring in my backpack full of art supplies to keep my five year old occupied while we waited).  I should have snapped a photo of the poster outside that lists prohibited items.  It's plainly visible from the street if you want to have a look in advance.2. They have an interesting interpretation of the word "appointment."  It doesn't mean come at a certain pre-agreed time and someone will see you at that time give or take a few minutes like it does in the rest of the world.  It means come at that time, take a number, and depending on how busy we are we will call you in 1-2 hours. Tip: don't kill yourself getting your Express Post envelope before your appointment.  You can duck out to the Staples across the street to get it while you're waiting for your number to be called.  Just make sure you get a slip of paper giving you permission to re-enter without waiting in line again. 4 1
Great tea selection in a coffeehouse that's unique 'cause it's in a converted gas station. 4 5
The only place where I get yummy red bean or green sesame balls.  Also their steamed pork buns are my favorite.  This is where I order birthday cakes - mocha cake with coconut filling is a must-have! 4 5
This is a great place to get something different for lunch or a quick dinner.  I love the chicken masala wrap.  As the other reviewers have said, it is a "Chipotle" type setup, as in, you choose your rice, your protein, veggies, and sauce.  It's really an excellent wrap.  I also love the Bombay spice iced tea - yum!  I can't believe people are sitting next door eating a bland Jimmy Johns sandwich when they could be having one of these exotic concoctions.  I am really sad people are giving this place bad reviews, but I never went to the original location, so I'm not sure what they are comparing it to.  If you are coming in looking for a traditional Indian restaurant, that is not what this is, so set your expectations accordingly. 4 3
Pleasantly surprised at how good the food tasted. Asian flavors were spot on with the pad thai and bun. Next time will have to try a burger, it looked real good. Will come back for sure. Lose one star for slow service, not the sole servers fault, i think they only had one cook. Worth the wait though. 4 3
I got right in and it took me only 15 minutes for my oil change, on a Saturday.  It is a little overpriced in my opinion, but what oil specialty shop isn't. What bugs me about these places is they try to vet sell you on stuff even when you want just an oil change. Theses guys weren't too pushy. Super nice and friendly. Gave me $7 off for being a new customer! Don't forget to ask if your new 4 2
Nacho Daddy...I've tried you again and again and you have not let me down.In my initial review I was sad for the poor starving children and the wastefulness of the portions you serve.  I've now learned "how" to order off of your menu so I don't leave feeling less like a human because of my gluttonous ways.  Your bloody Mary's are amazing, but the Medium gave me enough kick without adding the habanero.  Half medium half mild suits my tastes (even though I always thought I could handle a kick).We love everything your restaurant has to offer for a quick bite after a long day wrangling cats (I mean kids), from the brunch menu (huevos nachos LOVE...but share), fajitas, mahi mahi tacos, ceviche, chips and salsa...oh and yes my margarita is always amazing. 4 5
My wife just brought home a fish taco, pretty good.  Not amazing but one of the best I have had in a while.  I don't want to set expectations too high but worth a try! 4 3
Came here with 3 friends on a Saturday night. Slight wait for a table.. maybe 15 minutes, the place was busy, but that was expected. They have a very very very extensive drink list, which includes beer, cider, meade and other tasty beverages! A definite go just for the drinks alone! We all ordered food, I had the burger on special - a twist on a Thanksgiving sandwich... that slightly reminded me of Melt's turkey bomb sandwich. Came with sweet potato fries - which were good! While the food might not blow you out of the water, having a good bar with a good selection of choices and decent food is nice. Will be back! 4 3
I stayed at the Aria for three days and it was like Heaven.  The hotel is gigantic and beautiful to look at- lots of massive, dramatic art, giant chunks of granite and walls of glass, etc.  In one restaurant the dividers between the banquettes were made of cross sections of huge wasps' nests.  Difficult to describe, but so cool in person.  I was there for work, so I didn't have to pay for anything (except gambling, where it took me about 20 minutes to wipe out my checking account), which is extremely fortunate, since breakfast for three came to about $125 one morning.  The linens were unbelievable, and the bed was amazing.  I spent most of the last day by the pool, where the crowd was so friendly- everyone was so glad to be at such a fabulous place!  Everyone that worked there was ultra hot and genuinely warm and friendly.  I highly recommend the Aria for anybody with a lot of money to spend on unbridled luxury for a few days.  There's really no reason to leave the hotel once you get there- it has everything, and a LOT of it.  One of our waiters told us that the hotel has over 10,000 employees.   My one complaint is the horrible cell service, but then that's probably my own fault (AT&T). 4 5
5 Stars: This place is fantastic!  I love it, think you'll love it, hope all my friends love it, wish I could eat here all the time and hope I'll own a place just like it in my retirement.or5 Stars:  As in, it meets the expectations it sets for itself perfectly well.This falls into the latter category.This is a place in my area I go when I'm craving Pad Thai now now NOW.It's cheap.  They give you lots.  It's pretty fast.Done.I've had shrimp pad thai--  found the amount of noodles soak up all the sauce-- I ask for extra.. sauce that is, not noodles- it's obscene, the lid barely shuts.  Hey, value for money.  Their green curry's also quite good.It seems like they did the interior decor recently.  However, although quite nice-- they did try to bring a bit of Thailand with the wooden furniture I suppose, I wouldn't describe the atmosphere to be all that wonderful.  Also a little fancy to drop in just for lunch imo- cloth napkins and all.  Tries too hard, you know? 5 4
My daughter called to tell me her car will turn over but won't start at 4:30pm on a Friday. Problem, I live in Asheville she's going to college in Charlotte. Call AAA have the vehicle towed to this AAA service center. Then I see the reviews. I went into worry mode. I've managed auto part stores and have heard of horror stories. But I can't do anything being so far away, so I wait. Next morning I call them to hear the bad news, guess what Shane says the technicians started the car right up. Checked it out to make sure nothing else going on. He assumes that since the car was on an incline and had low gas that it wasn't getting enough fuel but everything was good. When I asked if I could give him payment over the phone, surprised again, he said not necessary that there was no charge. Thanks for letting a distant dad not have to worry. 5 1
My favorite Mexican restaurant in the Valley, and there are a bunch of good ones here.  The atmosphere is a little schlocky but still cool.  The service is usually top notch, and the food is terrific.My wife gets the Salad Carbon - see the previous review.  I usually get the Pollo con Cheso - a chimi-style enchilada with a spicy white cream sauce.  Heaping portions with rice and beans that actually taste good.  5 Stars. 5 4
Have taken several cars to this place.  Always one time and it is fixed.  Recently had a noise issue.  It wasn't my transmission but they fixed it anyway and did not charge me because it was a simple fix.  Great service. 5 4
pork belly appetizer delish.steak tacos, delish.bread pudding delish. waitress a sweetie.whole experience the best. 5 4
I've spent almost 2 years here and just wanted to give a solid review before I move to another state. I think this is one of the best apartment complexes in the Vegas area. The property is attractive and immaculate. Apartments are modern. It's all set on a golf course with views of the strip. Within 3 minutes you can be to Whole Foods, Starbucks, banks or the Freeway. You can get to strip in a good day in about 10 mins. The one and only downside is you can hear your neighbors pipes and stuff, but isn't that every apartment. Yes, your rent might go up after your lease, but again, that's typical. 5 4
I love this place! I go here for breakfast 3 times a week and I'm never disappointed. Get their breakfast sandwhich with a latte to go ..yum!!! Cute family business with a friendly atmosphere. Even though they are always busy, their service is very fast.  I don't know about the review on 11/29 but the bagels are always fresh and out of the oven when i come. Their cream cheese is home made and delicious!! Definitely a 5 star restaurant. 5 4
Pretty much perfect. Unless you want low carb or gluten free. Great food, great service, great atmosphere. Also perfect for mothers day! Ask someone in the hotel for directions if you get lost. 5 4
I've been coming here for over 10 years. I have introduced friends from all backgrounds to Baras doubles and have seen girls knees buckle when they took the first bite of doubles. It may not be the swankiest ambiance but their food will not disappoint. 5 2
this place is sooO lovely! stumbled across it a few months ago. such a cute little date spot and the pastries are morsels of heaven. although it is a bit pricey it's totally worth it and I never mind supporting a quality local business. Treat yo self to Coquette for sure! 5 4
Love this place!! The food reminds me of Thanksgiving back home. So one thing that really stood out to me..I called to see if they had banana pudding. The lady answered and told me yeah. Cool..we head to the restaurant. About two minutes later I receive a call back and it's the lady from NaNas and she says, "I'm so sorry to be calling..just wanted to let you know that I went to double check and were actually out of banana pudding right now. I didn't want you to drive all this way just to find out we didn't have it". So this may seem pretty simple, but it was a big deal to me. She didn't have to call back - she was so nice and personable. We still ate there of course lol. I was too stuffed for desert anyway. But really friendly people, gave food suggestions and samples. Would recommend. 5 4
Very delicious food. The atmosphere was cozy. And service was very quick. This was my first time trying Ethiopian food and I have to say it won't be my last. 5 4
I was introduced to Sunrise Coffee by a friend of mine. We'll just call him Shmorey Smurratt.  The most hipstering, skinny jean wearin, never heard of his music havin, indie book readin, fingerless glove using, riding a bike to school, taking close up pictures in weird angles, film school student being, messy hair and beard having, thrift store shoppin and super elitist i know.Well, he told me this place was good. I tried it. He was right. 5 2
Family owned.  Inexpensive. I call my order in and its ready in ten minutes.      Internet jukebox..  nice employees.   Ten times better than competition 5 4
Imagine those hardware stores you see on tv / movies where the you can go and know that you will get reliable help, well Rolliers is that place. The concept of customer service and expertise is not something of a past era. I have been here more than a dozen times for reasons and I have never left disappointed. I walked in with door knob pieces for a 100 year old door - not only did they know exactly what I was looking for, they had dozens to choose from to make sure that I had the exact ones I needed. I could only imagine the look of bewilderment that I would get if I walked into that big orange or blue "home centers" with the same questions. I have gone back since and will continue to go back over and over again because I trust what I am told when I ask questions - something that is hard to find these days. Yeah, some of the items might be a little more costly (not much from my experience) but that extra pays for customer service that you don't get from someplace that is concerned with shareholder profits. I would rather pay a little more and know that I am getting what I need for the job the first time rather than wasting my time over and over again. 5 1
Amber the bartender is awesome. Very nice and happy!  Plus the wings were super HOT unlike the other native I go to. I'll be back! 5 4
Food was Great. I order Lamb CousCous and my friend ordered Duck. It was rally good. Well cooked and delicious. The waiter was awesome. so friendly and kind 5 4
I visit the Fitchburg location at least once a week and the staff is great.  Where else can you find such a great selection of wines for under $10?  The staff has always gone above and beyond for me - whether it be putting together a wine basket, expediting my order because I'm in a hurry or making great wine recommendations. 5 4
Had an outing with the girl's, and it was great first time here and I'll definitely be going back. Great food!!!! The Duce  itself is quite different,  but food. I recommend it 5 4
Lunch here is soo good!  Their house noodles are amazing. They are perfectly spiced and cooked everytime!  Comes with soup, an egg roll, and tea when you eat in.  All for 7.95. So worth it.  I dont even have to order anymore.  I go so often they dont even give me a menu!  One server is much better than the rest , but nothing beats these noodles for me!!!! 5 4
Everything from start to finish was perfect.  I went for my anniversary last night and it hit the spot.  The host was lovely and seated us right away.  We were twenty minutes late and he wasn't bothered in the least.  Told us we did him a favor since the reservation before us lingered.  We eat meat occasionally but ended up ordering entirely from the vegetarian menu.  I had the mushroom salad which was wonderful.  My husband had the gnocchi, which I was jealous of and if I had a longer arm I would have eaten half of.  My main was the tortelloni and my husband's the tortiere.  Both were delicious.  I wouldn't change a thing.  The Bellwoods Brewery beer from just down the road was nice and the wines by the glass were interesting.  4 oz pours may not seem like a bargain at $9 - $15 or more, but I guess the alternative is to make it 5oz pours and jack up the price by 25%.  We got the dessert board for two, which I feared might just be a bunch of fancy sweets prepped earlier in the day by a pastry chef who was long gone by evening.  Turns out it was, but that was ok.  The madeleines were lemony with a little crispness around the edges.  A square of nougat was chewy and nutty.  The vibe was lively though not too loud.  As luck would have it they played one of my favorite albums of all time during the second half of our dinner.  I read a lot of other reviews and my assessment is that Woodlot is a victim of its own success.  People love to find a reason to take down really popular and trendy places so they can feel good about their superior discernment.  Don't be fooled.  This is one of the best casual restaurants in Toronto and it deserves five stars on Yelp. 5 3
My husband is peter piper pizza #1 fan, and I must say I have gotten to love it to. Today I placed a care your order and was pleasantly  surprised that the phone only ringed once and one picked up so super friendly with a great attitude. Once I got there I proceeded to pay the girl in front was very helpful and with a good attitude. I asked for a cup of water and the manager asked if I was waiting for a Carry out and he gave an actual drink cup. I thought that was very nice. I'm happy to see that people take pride in serving well with a great attitude. After being in many fast food places and stores people really have bad attitudes and are not helpful I was happy to be treated well. And not to forget the food it was delicious as always. 5 4
I ordered from here online and I was very impressed at how quickly and accurately the order was processed and delivered. It was delivered in less than the expected wait time, and the sandwiches were wrapped and packaged very nicely. It's very obvious that this place loves good sandwiches. 5 4
This is the best fish and chips place in Mississauga I've been to. I've only had their halibut and chips, and stick to it, though I'd eventually like to try some of their other fish (if I can get past the halibut!)I've only ever gotten take out here but it is served pretty quickly and properly for fish and chips, in a cardboard box. I can't stand places that use styrofoam as it makes the fish soggy. Thankfully, these guys do it old fashioned!Their fish is lightly battered and crisp. The fries as delicious and obviously fresh. I also believe they are double fried. The home made tartar sauce is good, though they usually give you the packets with your to-go bag, I would like their homemade stuff! It's much better! 5 4
I LOVED my experience at R Salon. Cool atmosphere and nice people. Kenzie was sweet and gave the best head massage EVER!! I loved the results-she did exactly what I hoped she would do with my hair. I didn't want anything but they also have coffee, lemonade, tea, and snacks for their customers!! 5 4
Came with friends to celebrate wedding anniversary, we liked the food and the wine (great selection), but what made us give a 5 stars was the service from our waiter Pedro. He helped us get started with the tapas menu, great suggestions and the way he handled the wine made the meal complete. Would for sure visit again and we hope Pedro still there. 5 4
We had a great experIence , the waiter was super nice and helpfull, the kids chicken fIngeRs were delicious and so was the chicken pot pie! Salads and soup were fresh and tasty, also the poppy seed little munchkins were yummy!!! 5 4
Had the Chimi, Tacos and Bugogi fries.  Had no ides what to expect of the fusion taste.   Simply put, I was blown away.  Definitely on our return to list of places! 5 1
Great healthy veggie options with environmentally sensitive packaging. I had the 5 star salad. Delicious!! Service was fast and friendly.   Clean upscale decor. 5 4
You walk into Joel Robuchon and know that every detail is going to be taken care of. The interior was so beautiful. We sat in their atrium which had a wall covered in beautiful green flowers and were nice and secluded; we felt like we could be a little louder here than in the somber, yet gorgeous dining room. The wait staff was phenomenal and they seemed to adapt their personalities to their customers - they could tell that we wanted to be a little bit more laid back than the atmosphere so they brought it down a notch for us. The food was nothing if not spectacularly presented and everything was very flavorful. One of my favorites was a tomato and mozzarella salad - now that would sound simple if you were dining at any other restaurant, but here it was quite a masterpiece. I also enjoyed the Pea soup, the turbot and the lamb. (I normally don't eat quite so many dishes, but all of the menu choices were Prix fix.) My favorite things about the restaurant are the cheese and pastry carts - the things that add ceremony to the evening and that make a dinner at this restaurant an experience rather than a meal. I guess my only complaint is that the dinner was so well orchestrated it seemed as if some of the soul was missing. 5 4
I have been taking my kids here for years and they really like it! They really enjoy open gym every other Saturday night from 6-8:30pm. 5 4
SO much fun!! The show was about an hour and a half long and filled with great music, comedy, and, of course, awesome dancing. A lot of the music is geared for a younger crowd so some people may not care for it. But it was a blast! 5 4
Breakfast served 24 hours, waitstaff is efficient and friendly, drinks are a good pour, what more do you need? 5 4
Quickly became a staple and the go to place for half of my office. Simple, fast, flavourful and Good for you! If this was the standard for fast food the world would be a better place. 5 4
We opted to try the place despite some of the bad reviews. The place is very quaint and sets the mood. The tv didn't bother me as I had my back to it. We had the lasagne and squash ravioli. Both were amazing!  Best food since we've been in Italy! Good size portions. The brusetta was fresh tasting and the bread crispy. The waitress was from Venice and only in the country for three weeks. She was attentive and the service was great. Worth a visit. 5 4
Been on an exhausting hunt to find a place to get a great facial where you aren't paying for the location/decor & where you aren't pummelled with selling while trying to relax and enjoy.  Finally found it here.  Janina was gracious and welcoming, even though I showed up an hour early, my mistake.  Felt immediately like my business was appreciated.  I was paired with one of her newer employees who did a wonderful job but with a guided oversee by Janina which shows a great deal of care and attention on her part.  She patted my hand and told me a joke.  It was a really pleasant experience.  I was upsold on a moisturizing treatment but she was right, I needed it and it wasn't done in an aggressive way but more a recommendation.  Saw a huge difference in my face, especially the yucky frown line in between my eyebrows.  I now trust her recommendations and will be open to hear about her products in the future.  Because she is charging a reasonable price for her services I will go more often rather than treating a facial like a luxury.  You would think spa owners would understand that.  It's not a luxury environment so if that's your thing, probably not the place for you.  I'm okay with a few less leather couches and water features to get a quality experience.  Really happy to have found her. 5 4
The staff over at Big Frog was very helpful. They were able to design a custom logo for me from a picture I had on my phone. I stopped over at the store and was able to have an order placed within 20 minutes. This was a last minute idea that I had and Big Frog was able  to  turn around my order within 2 days. I wanted to have something special for my out of town guests that attended our party. The shirts were a big hit. 5 4
5 stars. The restaurant looked a little mis-leading, almost furnished like a smitty's but the food was insane. Honestly one of the best meals I have had from start to finish. I was blown away. Fantastic service as well. Just amazing. The rooms were different from your average hotel. Nice fixtures on everything. Wine glasses. Hot water kettle. Nice steam room and hot tub in the basement. I'll be holding all hotels to this standard now! 5 4
I am often way too lazy to write a review but this place is so amazing that I must do it.  After reading on Yelp! about all the goodness of this place, I gave it a try. I love middle eastern food and grew up in NY where we have very good middle eastern food.  I was greeted very warmly by the owner, Isam.  I told him I heard about their famous lemonade so I will have that and something else he would recommend.  He gave me a sweet smile and told me that the lemonade is on the house as it is my first time.  (how nice!)  I ordered to go the Lebanese chicken (one breast split in halves, rice, tabouli, and one large fluffy, pillowy pita made fresh) and the falafel (smaller than I'm used to but very tasty) that came with tahini sauce that is very very good.  I finished my drink before the food came and he gave me a free refill! I wanted to get a lemonade for my coworker to go, and he gave me that for free too! He was very easy to speak with.  I hate going to places where the food is great but the owner makes you feel like you should beg (think Seinfeld and the soup nazi).  But this guy was very nice.  There was a lady behind me who went for the first time yesterday, and came back today with her friend.  The owner immediately recognized her and apologized to her for something.  It turned out that there was a guy (I think from the store next door) that was bothering her as she walked in yesterday.  She told the owner about it. The owner (after she left) spoke to the guy and he apologized to her for what he did yesterday.  The owner also apologized for the guy's behavior.  What a man!My food was really really good.  And when he packed my food in the bag, he gave me two big slices of bahkalava on the house (again)!!I am definitely coming back and bringing more people. 5 4
I love this club. Absolutely beautiful. Fun times always had. Music is mostly house but they sneak in a few songs to dance to. The club is indoors and outdoors. People were outside in 30 degree weather. Good times had whether one is freezing or not! The club was stupid packed but it was new years weekend. I wouldn't expect anything less. 5 4
Wow, this place was so good!! My parents and I stopped by around 11:15am on a Sunday for brunch and even though we were told the wait might be 45min-1 hr, we were seated in 30min. We all really liked our orders. Our server was very friendly and even the other workers that ran out the food were very accommodating. My dad got the jambalaya omelet ($11) which comes with Cajun home fries and toast... he loved the unique combo of jambalaya in an omelet and raved about the Cajun home fries. My mom got the cinnamon apple walnut French toast ($11) which also comes with home fries. She also loved her meal. I got the carminator ($12) and enjoyed it very much however the mixed veggies in it were cut into very large chunks that overpowered the other ingredients if you bit into the wrap the wrong way. Overall we had an awesome experience and delightful meal and will definitely be back again!! 5 4
I always make sure to stop at the good egg whenever I'm in Phoenix it's my favorite place to eat breakfast or lunch they have the best biscuits and gravy in town. The place is always clean and the staff is very helpful and friendly keep it up good egg! 5 4
